INTRODUCTION.
It
was the original intention of the author of the Dancing Feather
to have extended that work to fifty chapters, or the usual length of a novel
of two volumes. But the editor of the paper to whom it was
communicated
in weekly numbers, requested, after six chapters had been published,
that it should be limited to ten chapters. This desire of the publisher the
author complied with, though with injury both to the plot and the
harmonious
construction of the Romance. The favorable reception of The
Dancing Feather, even in this abridged character, induced its publisher to
reprint and re-issue it in a cheap octavo form. Its unlooked for popularity
in this shape, and the frequent calls for it even now, has induced the writer
to carry out, in some degree, his first intention, and to present the public
with a
Sequel
, commencing with the night of the mysterious departure
from her anchoring ground of the schooner The Dancing Featherto
the story with which title the reader is referred.
Now a word in reply to certain questions which have been very
perseveringly
put to the author in relation to the identity of Morris Grme and
Carleton, by several readers of both sexes, who have done him the honor to
glance over the pages of The Dancing Feather; to which, as they are all
embraced in the following anonymous note, some time since received
through the post, we shall reply by copying our answer to the writer:
Mr. Author
:
Sir
I have just finished the perusal of your novel, The Dancing
Feather, and must say it has greatly interested me, and especially my aunt,
to whom I read it aloud. But we are both equally at fault about one of
your chief characters; and taking cover under an anonymous signature, I
have resolved to write to you to know all about it. The difficulty (and
who can bear a mystery, especially at the end of a novel, where all
mysteries
ought
to be cleared up?) I want to have explained is this:
Aunt says the buccanneer Captain was Morris Grme, and I am supported
by two cousins of mine in the opinion that it was Carleton; and I think I
shall show you, Mr. Author, that
you
have made a
mistake
; for the
following
conversation occurs in the fifth chapter between Hayward and Morris
Grme:
` Recent events have confirmed my suspicions that you are a
What
? demanded Grme in a slow tone.
NayI may be wrong. But I firmly believe I saw you one of the
foremost in a party of freebooters who boarded and robbed the brig in which
I came passenger.
Morris Grme pleasantly smiled at this charge, twirled his mustache and
laughed aloud.
Truly, Hayward, you have a good memory. I was
not
there, nor could
you have seen me therefore. '
This settles the question here. But in the last chapter comes the
difficulty
!
In this are these words from the lips of Morris Grme, when he
surprises Blanche on the shore at Colonel Powel's country seat
` But you (to Blanche) whose name I have breathed when my
thoughts were purest, pardon me the insult that I dared to offer on our
former
meeting, and pray for me when I am gone. '
Now, Mr. Author, if Morris Grme was the captain, how is it that
you have made him say, with the evident intention that the reader should
receive it as the fact, that he was
not
there? If Morris Grme was the
leader, where was Carletonwho hovers like a mist among the scenes;
indistinct, and hardly a character of the novel, and yet, the pirate chief?
Either Morris Grme and Carleton were one and the same person, under
two names, which I cannot believe, (though my brother Tom does, and
insists
upon it,) or in the last chapter you meant to have written Carleton
instead of Morris Grme, and made the
former
the hero of the
interview
with Blanche. Tell me if this is not the true state of the matter,
and that you very unpardonably and carelessly forgot the plot of your own
story, and left your intelligent readers in as great a mist as you have left
Carleton. You may reply by a line in Mr. Clapp's Evening Gazette, which
my uncle takes, or through the Post Office, to
Your humble servant,
J. T. T.
P. S.
Who
did Blanche marry, and what did you hurry her out of the
way so soon for? You say he is a naval hero; but she had no right to
marry any hero, naval or military, who did not figure in the story! I
don't like the way Blanche is laid on the shelf.
Newburyport, Oct. 10, 1842.
THE AUTHOR'S REPLY THROUGH THE POST OFFICE.
Miss
; for such the style and character of your letter, as well
as the graceful penmanship betray you, I acknowledge the honor of
receiving
your inquisitorial missile, duly by post, and take pleasure in
replying
to it. I must confess myself guilty of a slip of the pen, and throw
myself upon the clemency of the fair tribunal before which I find myself
arraigned. Carleton is a
real
character. His outline was only
sketched
when I altered the frame-work of my story, to reduce it to the size
desired
by its publisher. If the original plan had been carried out, Carlton
would have come forth in bold relief from his misty indistinctness, and
been the
hero
of the novel. But as ten chapters were quite too confined
a space for
two
heroes to figure in, I resolved quietly to drop him and make
his Lieutenant, Morris Grme, my chief character. But some of the
chapters
had already been printed with Carleton a principal character. I
therefore
was under the necessity of alluding to him occasionally lest some
reader, as observing and critical as you have proved yourself to have been,
should accuse me of
forgetting
a personage of my story (for my readers
were not in the secret') My error was, I perceive, and which has given
rise to the difficulty to which I owe the honor of this correspondence, in
quite
forgetting at the winding up that such a misty personage as
Carleton had been introduced, and referring his acts to Morris Grme! If
Carleton's name had taken the place of Morris Grme's in the text, the
mystery
you speak of would not have occurred: nor would the honor of receiving
your note, now have been mine to acknowledge! If I should one day de
cide on publishing a Sequel to The Dancing Feather, be assurred
that neither Carleton nor Blanch Hillary, the
true hero and heroine
of
that
novel in its original form! shall be forgotten; nor the
subsequent
career of
Morris Grme (whom I should still, perhaps, make the
hero
;) for the
supposition
with which a clever friend of mine interpolated, unknown to me,
the last paragraph but one in that print, that the Dancing Feather with her
Captain and Lieutenants had foundered in the Gulf of Mexico, turns out
to have been incorrect; the vessel in question proving to have been a
Carthagenian
Cruiser, on board which Red Fred had shipped. The career of
the Dancing Feather, and with her, of Carleton and Morris Grme, from
the night of her bird-like flight from the cove is fully known to me and
may one day afford material for a second Tale, in which rest assured, fair
questioner, I shall take pleasure in explaining the difficulties with which
you have charged me, touching the first story. In the meanwhile I have
the honor to be, very sincerely
Yours,
The Author of the Dancing Feather
.
P. S.In reply to your postcript, usually the most important part of a
lady's letter, I answer that Blanche
should have been
the heroine and
married
the hero. But what could I do, dear young lady, condensing forty
chapters into one? But heroines sometimes survive their marriage
and are heroines still. If I should publish a sequel you may hear of
Blanche yet, and her naval hero to boot.
To J. T. T.
In fulfilment of the intention hinted at in the above letter, we
now beg leave to offer to the readers of The Dancing Feather
A Sequel to that novel, in which the original plan is carried
out; though with certain alterations in the construction, as the
introduction
of new characters and new scenes have rendered
necessary
.
CHAPTER I.
We
will introduce our story with quoting a closing paragraph
from the previous Tale:
That night the head of Blanche Ilillary rested uncasily upon
her pillow, for many a wild vision flitted through it. About
midnight
she rose from her couch and gazed upon the beautiful scene
without. The round, full moon was high up in the Heaven and
shone on the tided waters whose surface grew each moment
rougher
under the effect of a fresh and increasing breeze from the west.
The Dancing Feather rode restlessly at anchor as if impatient to
spread her snowy wings and skim the waters like a bouyant
seabird
.
And lo! as she gazed upon the schooner Blanche Hillary
thought she perceived figures moving on her deck. Was this a
sport of her imagination? Some figures clustered near the
schooner's
hows, and it actually seemed as if her head swung free!
Sluggishly now she shook out her sails as if by an act of volition.
There could be no mistake! Up went the foretopsail! the square
foresail, jib and flying jib were hoisted simultaneously! A tall
figure suddenly appeared at the stern with his hand resting on the
tiller; the bellying sails filled freely with the wind; and, with a
rushing sound like that of many wings, the Dancing Feather was
once more upon the waters!
As the gray turrets of the Gothic villa, before which the
schooner
had been riding at anchor, blended with the dark woodlands,
that towered around in the hazy distance, the tall helmsman left
his post to another, and walking to the stern, stood, with folded
arms, gazing in the direction of the villa until it was wholly lost to
his view by an intervening headland.
Now, fare thee well, sweet Blanche, he said with tenderness
mingled with bitterness in his deep tones. But twice only have
I met thee, yet twice has my inmost being been moved by your
grace and beauty! Yet I am despisednay pitied and forgiven' A
criminal! to be pardonedan outcast to be commisserated! yes
such am I; and for me to think of her is folly. Love me she never can
pure and proud and beautiful as she is! How her lip curved as
she bid me leave heryet methinks I did discover a tear glittering
amid the dark lashes that ever keep in softest shadow her deep
blue eyes. But on me never will beam those eyes in love
never
Vide last chapter of The Dancing Feather.
shall they upon another! These last words were spoken with
sudden and intense feeling, while his dark eyes flashed beneath
his meeting brows like meteors beneath a storm-cloud. He turned
and paced the deck with a fiery step, which gradually slackened
and, with his manner, became subdned and slow. He leaned over
the taffrail and gazed into the dark tide which, coldly silvered by
the moon gleamed past as the vessel flew onward. Suddenly a
hand was lightly laid upon his shoulder. He started, for he had
heard no footstep, and looked into a face that fixed its gaze upon
his. It was a woman'soh, how darkly beautiful! how full of
expression
,
love and passion! she moved not her hand from its
gentle
and timid resting place upon his arm; but she bent down ward
her gaze as it encountered the stern, angry surprised glance that
met her look.
Eve! he at length repeated in a tone of displeasure.
Be not angry, dear Carlton, she said laying her other arm
upon
his shoulder as if to soothe and caress him into gentleness.
How came you on board? not in the boats, surely? Did I not
forbid
your following me further! We are nothing to each other
now, Eve!
Yet you are every thing to me, Carleton? she answered
passionately. For you I have sacrificed all dear to woman in this
life; nay all dear to her being in the life to come! for my love to
you is crime to Heaven, for I worship thee and thou art my god!
In thee I live and exist, and out of thee all is dark and unlovely!
Heaven is where thou arthell where thou art not! Nay,
Carleton
bend not those eyes upon me in wrath, that once only beamed
upon me with love, and shone ever into my heart like the
summer-sunshine
upon the fountain, in whose faithful bosom
mirrored
its own bright image! Thus is thy image mirrored in
my bosom, Carleton, and though thou, my sun, seest it not for the
clouds that thy wayward humor hath drawn between, yet 'tis
there!
This is idle, Eve, he said with impatience, yet in a tone in
which her sensitive ear detected a gentler mood than he would
show. But how is it, that I find you here when four hours since
I left you in the city?
Carleton your presence is to me life! your absence the darkness
of the tomb to my soul! You told me notyou breathed not to
me, when you bade me, farewell, and commanded me to forget you,
that you were going to leave me forever. My heart is a faithful
monitor, and love hath an omnisciency that is not of earth. I
secretly
followed you to the place in the Park, where you met
Morris
Grme, and heard your plot arranged! I heard you tell him
how you had the day before seen the schooner riding at her
anchor
,
and was confident that with twenty good men, you could cut
her out, and that it must be done to night. Morris Grme told
you he could have the men in one hour, if you would provide
boats to proceed to the cove
And you overheard all this! Stupid that I was! Others
were listeners too!
No! I stood cautiously in the shadow of the tree beneath which
you met. After being satisfied of your intention, I watched your
departure together. I then made up my mind, and returning to my
room, selected a wardrobe and seeking the carriage-stand, drove
rapidly along the water-road until I saw the spiral masts of the
Dancing Feather, glittering in the moonlight above the tree.
Here dismissing the coach I proceeded on foot through the wooded
lawn to the silent cove. All was still and strangely beautiful. I
thought sweetly of you Carleton, kindly of all things, and solemnly
of Heaven! The stars gazed down holy and still like eyes of love
and watchfulness; the branches of the trees depending over the
water waved gently in the low night wind; the moon-beams slept
upon the quiet waters, and the green-sward beneath the tree,
smiled as they fell through the branches of the trees upon it. Oh,
I shall never forget the thoughts that filled my soul as I stood in
that spot of lonely loveliness and peace! I could hear my heart
beat! My eyes filled with tears, and my inmost nature felt that
God was there! The stars repeated God is here! the winds sighed
through the grove, God is here! the moonlit waters smiledGod
is here! and a voice in my bosom echoed God is everywhere. Oh
Carleton, if you had been with me you would have believed!
But, my little Eve, he said smiling and tapping her brow
this deck is no Bishop's desk. I would hear thy tale, rather!
His brow though still slightly overcast was no longer forbidding,
and as his features were lighted up with the smile that came upon
them like the summer sunshine, and were exceedingly fine
and expressive. She smiled as he smiled, like a fountain
reflecting
the sun-beams, and leaning her head a moment upon his
manly bosom, she breathed in a low, grateful tone Good, noble,
generous Carleton!
But to thy story Eve! I would know the mystery of thy
presence
here, he said playfully; but do not give me a history, child,
I beseech thee! Thy faith is a pretty one and certainly hath made
thee most poetical!
I looked along the dark shadowy shore of the romantic inlet
and at length discovered a boat secured to the bank. I sprung
into
this and releasing it from the land with the aid of an oar soon
reached the schooner, which, as I approached it, seemed like a beat
tiful thing of life sleeping upon the water. As I stepped on board
I sent the boat shoreward with a push, but it long floated about
distressed and lost ere I saw it cast upon the land far from where I
embarked. How lonely then was the quiet deck and all around! I
seemed the only living being on earth! To relieve the oppressing
sense of loneliness I leaned here, where you now lean Carleton, and
bent my gaze long and steadily in the direction from which I looked
for your boat. Wearily passed the hours, till the moon had go
to the midheavens, and many a new and strangely bright star had
risen from the East and ascended far into the skies. I knew it
was midnight, and yet the same deep, unbroken repose reigned
around! I grew nervous and then began to feel alarm! Yet I
knew you would come! I knew whatever you and Morris Grme
undertook, you would accomplish. I trusted and hoped and
waited
with my eyes still watching the far water. At length the soft
night wind, that had moaned through the wood on shore like the
sound of a far off and indistinct organ breathing a requiem for the
dead, began to strengthen and to curl the surface of the water.
The ripple soon increased to small heaving waves, and these soon
broke, heaving up delicate pearls of foam. These pearls were
shattered
before the increasing increasing wind and melted into snowy
caps and the Dancing Feather began to move; at first, with a gen
tle murmur about her bows; but the motion soon became quite
apparent and it was not long before, as if instinct with life and
feeling the free-seaward wind, she began to fret and champ at her
curbing chain like a spirited war horse impatiently held in when
the trumpet sounds the charge! I caught the spirit of the time,
Carlton, and as I looked up to the tall masts and saw the sails
bound to the slender yards, I felt a desire to possess the power to
unloose them to the winds and let the noble vessel free!
Brave and beautiful! Thou art worthy to be a sailor's bride,
Eve! he said with admiration, and now I dare say, if we had
not come as we did, you would have followed the bent of your mind
and gone to the mast-head and let her sails fly and severed the
cable
and set her free!
No, Carleton, I should not have gone leaving thee behind!
she said with feeling. But my longing gaze in the direction of
the city was at length rewarded I saw a dark object scarcely
distinguishable from the deep shadows of the shore along which it
seemed to be stealing as if for covert. I watched its progress with a
bounding heart and hushed breathing. I feared it would vanish;
that my wishes had created to the eye what my heart would have
had there! But onward swiftly and silently it came! gradually its
outline became distinct and I could then hear faintly the muffled
fall of oars! I bent over the quarter-railing in earnest scrutiny as
I discerned forms of men standing out in the dark moving
mass. Suddenly the advancing barge shot out from the deep
covert of the shore into the broad moon-light and I recognized in
the stern, not your commanding figure, noble Carleton, but Morris
Grme's! My heart sunk within me! Had I placed myself in that
reckless man's power! The barge now came nearer and clearer
into view towards the schooner; and, joy! I saw you stand up in
her bows, your person revealed boldly and distinctly against the
bright water. Your proud eye was upon the object of your daring
adventure and you stood as if impatient to leap on board, and once
more tread her decks her lord.
Thou did'st see and read me aright, Eve. Yet I saw thee
not!
Fearing now to be discovered, and knowing my life and
happiness
were near, I hastened from my post of watching and
descended
to secrete myself in the cabin! as I reached it I heard
your foot strike upon the deck! In one of the gorgeously furnished
state-rooms I remained until the bustle and confusion of getting
underweigh had subsided, when with a prayer in my heart for
courage, and strengthened by my love, I came from my covert
into the main-cabin. Morris Grme was there! Before I could
retreat he discovered me, with the exclamation,
Eve Innes! Carleton has then changed his mind! He said
he was to leave thee behind!
He knows nothing of my being here! I learned your plot and
anticipated him.
If this be true, thou will not be long our guest, lady! he said
significantly, and then turned from me. I came to the deck and
beheld you leaning moodily over the quarter. I knew you were
unhappyI knew, Carleton, you were thinking of your deserted
Eve! and were repenting that you had left her! I approached in
the trusting strength of my love, and in the remembrance how
dearly once you loved me! But when I met your frown
The few last words of this strange, beautiful creature who hung
on his arm and bosom were not pleasant to him. He knew he was
not thinking of Eve, but of Blanche Hillary! His darkening brow
checked her voice. He drew himself from her caress! she bent
her head and misinterpreting the cause of the sudden displeasure
in his looks, she said,
Nay, forgive me! I meant not to reprove thee, because you
frowned! If I am but near thee, Carleton, I will gladly let thee
frown upon me! I will learn to love even thy frowns, because
thine
, and strive to convert them into smiles!
I know not whether to be pleased or angry at thy conduct,
Eve, said Carleton after remaining silent a few moments, while
her dark eyes watched with eloquent emotion, the troubled
expression
of his countenance. But at present thou mayest
remain
!
Return into the cabin, and by and by I will tell thee what
my decision is!
Oh, Carleton, listen not to Morris Grme! Thou knowest
he loves me not well. Listen only to the voice of love in your
own generous bosom.
Fear not Eve, I will do thee no wrong! Morris thou well
knowest will be in none of my counsels touching thee! I have
not forgotten that thy love and honor met, with proper reproof,
his licentious freedom, and that he is no fit confidant between me
and thee! Good night, Eve!
Softly she repeated the words, and then slowly retired from the
deck, passing on the way Morris Grme, who haughtily stepped
aside for her to pass. He then walked aft to the spot where
Carleton
stood leaning thoughtfully over the quarter railing, looking
with an absent gaze down upon the eddying waters as they danced
and hurried away beneath the counter of the rapidly moving
vessel.
CHAPTER II.
The young Captain heard the step of his Lieutenant as he came
aft, and instantly altering his position and changing the whole
expression
of his countenance, he said to him in a cheerful
congratulatory
tone,
Well, Morris, we have succeeded beyond our hopes! Here
we have beneath us, once more, our tried friend, The Dancing
Feather, who is bounding over the waves again as if she knew
her master once more trod her decks.
Yes, Carleton, we have achieved a gallant deed, and one
becoming
us! answered Grme. See how gracefully the pretty
creature carries herself and how merrily she dances to the breeze,
he added, his eye proudly watching her as she moved swifty
and almost noiselessly through the water. But, Carleton, we
have on board a.
Yes, interrupted Carleton, who evidently desired to avoid
allusion
to Eve, no doubt plenty of stores; for I learned that
Colonel
Powel had her fitted for a cruise on which he was going to
start to-morrow evening. But I shall have the runs and hold
examined
as soon as it is day; and also see how we are ofi for spars,
duck and especially small arms.
I have been examining the racks, and find two pairs of horse
pistols, a rifle and two manton guns, with a horn or two of powder
and a case of balls.
These with the pistols and side-arms which we brought in the
boat will be of service to help us to more. I find the gun-ports are not
sealed up, as I feared they would have been when converted into
a yacht, and we must somehow manage to find guns for them!
Her former guns are sold and are now dispersed in half-a-dozen
merchant-men.
I thought we were to have no passengers, Captain Carleton,
abruptly spoke Grme, seeing his chief disposed to avoid the
subject of his thoughts.
I am commander of my own vessel, answered Carleton, his
haughty and quick spirit breaking out.
If you are to carry your leman, I will carry mine!
answered
Morris Grme. When I asked you, that I might decide
what to do with reference to Ellen, you said we were to leave
both! How is it now that I find Eve Innes on board?
Morris, said Carleton in a quiet manner and speaking in a
singularly distinct under tone peculiar to him when much moved,
I do not wish to have a difference with you, nor will I! Eve,
herself told you in the cabin, for you knew of her presence here
before I did, that she became aware of our intention and
anticipated
us!
What is your purpose with her? asked or rather demanded
Morris half crossing the deck and returning.
I have come to no determination, Morris, he said more
naturally
.
She is resolved to accompany me, and I don't know
how I can avoid it.
Easily! The shore is not two hundred fathoms distant, and
the quarter boat hangs from the cranes.
I understand you; but I have not made up my mind;
answered
Carleton evidently troubled and undecided. The truth is,
Morris, I do not want her here, neither do I like to put her on shore.
Her lively presence will relieve the tedium of my cruise and
The truth is, you preconcerted the meeting on board, and she is
here by your appointment. I watched her first meeting with you!
You betrayed by no start of surprise your ignorance of her being on
board! You have deceived me Carleton! Not that I care to have
her here!
Upon my life, Morris, I did you no wrong! If you say, send
Eve ashore, I will do so. And Carleton fixed his gaze upon the
face of his Lietenant and friend with a look as if he feared he
would require the alternative.
Grme paused a moment, and then with a singular expression
darkening his handsome but vice-hardened countenance, he said
dryly,
I have no wish to dictate to you, Carleton. As she is on board
let her remain. On the whole, he added suddenly changing his
manner, I am not sorry to get rid of Ellen, for she has grown
very grasping and bold of late, and I detest anything in a woman
like boldness or want of modesty. She was once a sweet, loving
girl, and I would have married her had I remained in society? for
we were engaged before I was in College.
Indeed. I did not know you knew her out of New York!
Yes! When she heard I had left College and was in New
York she wrote me that her esteem and love for me were
unchangand
that if I would consent, she would fly from her father's roof
and share with me my fortunes!
Of course she knew not what those fortunes were? observed
Carleton, at the same time giving an order aside to the helmsman
to luff a little more to clear a sloop at anchor ahead.
No, answered Morris Grme lightly laughing. She came
and I met her at the hotel! Artless as she was lovely and
devoted as she was imprudent, I received her with rapture, and not
without many tears and reproaches, she became my wedless
bride!
She expected you would have married, her, Morris? was it
not so?
Or she would never have flown to my arms, answered the
young man with cool indifference.
It would have been more manly, Grme, said
Carleton
,
to have shown her her imprudence and sent her in safety
and honor back to the roof she had left in sorrow and dishonor!
This is excellent morality, Carleton, coming from your
mouth, answered the Lieutenant with a sneer on his handsome
lip; Ellen Innes's love survived mine and my honor, and when
without ascertaining this fact, she threw herself upon me for
protection
,
she deserved to become what she is! Yet, poor girl, it
well nigh broke her heart, when she found she was not a wife!
But her love was deeper than her resentment, and so that she
believed
I loved her, she was happy!
Upon my soul! I pity her, and wish she were with you on board,
Morris, said Carleton with feeling.
Thank you, Carleton; on the whole I am content to have her
on shore. She has money, and when that is gone she has
beauty!
And would you thus idly cast her upon the world? said
Carleton
quickly.
Hath a too fondly loving woman ne'er been cast aside before,
that you must look so very virtuous at the thought, Carleton?
He was silent with the conviction that that very night he would
have acted precisely a similar part towards one who had a still
dearer claim to his continued protection, for Carleton had wooed
and won, and wedded Eve! Yes, Eve Innes was the buccaneer's
bride! his lawful wife! But this is not the place for the narration we
shall yet be called upon to give, touching the strange union of these
two! His conscience smote him at the other's words, and turning
away from him he looked over the side of the vessel making no
reply.
Grme watched him a moment, and then finding him disposed
to remain silent, he walked away towards the fore-part of the
vessel
as if to watch a sail that was crossing the bows. Yes, I see
Carleton loves his little beauty still! It is plain the plan was
concerted
which placed her on board! Let him carry her! Perhaps
the charming creature may not be so haughty at sea as on land!
The Gods be thanked, I brought not Ellen, for time is we were
seperated! besides she would be sadly in the way of my proposed
flirtation with Carleton's pretty one! If ever I was fascinated by
a woman, and yet loved her not, it is by this sweet, proud, cold,
vexing enchantress! Thanks, good Captain! The lady
may
releive
the tedium of the cruise!
Thus significantly repeating Carleton's words, this bold, daring
and singularly reckless young man, continued to walk the waist
in a thoughtful mood, till the dashing of waters ahead warned him
of the proximity of Hurl-Gate.
Hitherto, the `Dancing Feather' had been easily gliding along the
picturesque shores, moving past silent villas and gardens and lawns
sleeping in the moonlight, meeting at intervals sloops or brigantines
under full canvass stretching away towards the city, or going past
others which were crowding sail sea-ward, or rather Sound-ward.
After said had been once made on her, impelled by the breeze,
she had glided from her moorings before the incredulous and
bewildered
gaze of Blanche Hillary, the schooner had kept on her
course, solely under the guidance of the helm. Not a rope had
been pulled, nor the set of the well-ordered canvass altered to this
time. The small crew with which they had boarded her, were
quietly leaning over the bows, or standing in the fore-rigging
gazing
at the shores as they glided past. The order and stillness on
board, were such that no person would have suspected she had
half an hour before been taken possession of at her moorings!
But Carleton and Morris Grme, were no ordinary leaders in such
an expedition, as they had so daringly planned and felicitously
executed. Their men, many of whom they had eight months
before
commanded the Dancing Feather, were picked and known.
They were but twenty in all; but more than enough for working
the schooner, but not the third part of a full compliment, had
she been armed as before her seizure and conversion into a yacht.
The schooner still remained nearly the same as she had been
originally
constructed. Her paint had been altered, and she was now
perfectly
black, with the exception of a narrow scarlet line, or ribbon,
running along her bead and relieving it. Her canvass was new and
in perfect order; her blocks, rigging, and all her hamper were in
thorough preservation. Every thing drew well, and every rope
was in its place. In fact she had been made in all points fit for sea
by Colonel Powel, and all that was necessary was a crew; which,
however, proved a very different one, from that which he had
probably anticipated. Of the schooner, and her sailing qualities
we have already given a description in the former portion of this
story. Her cabins were now richer than before, being furnished
with every luxury that could contribute to their elegance and
comfort. A library of bookseven a harp and guitar, were not
wanting! The latter instrument drew the eye of Eve Innes, as
she descended into the cabin, and taking it up, she struck its chords
like one familiar with the strings. Her voice accompanied one or
two of the careless notes she struck. It was touchingly sweet and
sadin tender harmony with the sorrow and love's fear that lay
at her heart. She threw it aside a moment after, and leaning her
head upon her gemmed hand, wept long and silently.
Still glided on the Dancing Feather past the pleasant shores,
her path over the moonlit waves. Before her suddenly roared the
surges
of Hurl Gate! It was not until their loud, near roar struck his
ears, that Carleton was roused to a sense of his responsibility. He
sprung into the main rigging, and looked ahead! On either hand
dark rocks frowned and menaced him, while a whirlpool foamed in
the narrow strait between! He sprang to the helm, and took the
destiny of the vessel in his own hand. Morris Grme was for
ward, standing on the heel of the bow-sprit, and ever and anon, his
clear voice rose above the roar of the mad waves, giving directions
how to steer. Calm and resolute Carleton stood at his post, and
guided her on towards the perilous passagea passage at that time
less familiar than now to mariners, and greatly dreaded.
Port a little! cried Morris, from the heel of the bow-sprit.
Ay, port! repeated his commander, who, with the assistance
of one of his men, could hardly govern the schooner, which now
began to jump about in the irregular sea, like some frightened
steed, whom his rider would force into some present and visible
danger, which he vainly plunges on every side to avoid.
Steady! sounded the loud, seaman-like voice of Grme.
Steady it is! answered Carleton, in an even tone, which he
could just hear.
The Dancing Feather was now in her greatest peril, and truly
did she then earn her appellation. Like a feather she was tossed
upon the convolving, uplifting, far-sinking waves! All was
commotion
and imminent danger to life and matter. For a moment
or two the vessel staggered and reeled over, as if fairly conquered
by the waves: and then, while every man expected to see her the
next instant plunge madly into the wild, wrathful bosom of the
maelstrom, she righted herself, gathered new energy, struggled
upward and onward, came to her course, and again obeyed her
helm.
Bravo! that like to have been her mortal struggle, cried
Morris; But the gallant little schooner will [always come atop!
See how she shakes the water from her sides like a Newfoundland
dog! Luff a little! we will soon be out of this infernal place!
Luff it is! answered Carleton in the same] unmoved tone.
Steady as you are!
The schooner now altered her course a little, and went flying
like the wind through a narrow strait confined by rocks, between
which, it being ebb tide, the whole body of water raced with as
tonishing velocity. The top-sail collapsed with the rapidity of her
motion and though the wind was high, once flapped against the
fore-topmast, with a loud report. The rocks being left astern,
gradually her speed lessened, and she moved along with the wind
free over smoother water and a more open sea.
I never passed Hurl Gate with the water so wild, said
Carleton
,
as Morris came aft. I thought at one moment we should
have foundered!
It was a narrow escape, said Morris laughing. Now that
we are through this passage, let us set every thing that will draw;
and as the wind is north-west she will carry her studden-sails.
Let her remain under what sail she has for a while, Morris,'
replied Carleton, walking towards the compannion way. She
will make nine knots with this breeze, which will place as many
leagues between us and pursuit by morning, as we will want.
What are your future plans, Carleton? asked Morris, as he
saw him descending into the cabin. What is the schooner's
destination
?
I received your note that you wanted to meet me in
the Park at eight o'clock, and there only briefly heard from you a
plan to retake our vessel, which for eight months had been out of
our possession. You explained the plan which I consented to, and
obtained the men. The plan has been successful, and once more,
thank the Gods, we are on the broad deep with the Dancing
Feather our home. Now, what is our purpose, good Captain?
I have not wholly decided what course to pursue, but will do
so soon!
Nay, Carleton, have I not as deep an interest in this discision
as yourself. I am willing to yield to your nominal superiority in
command; but as we have both been equally active in re-taking
the schooner, it is but natural we should be equally interested in
her destination.
You are, perhaps right, Morris, answered Carleton, with
unexpected
mildness; for few men were more impatient of dictation
or opposition than he. I
was
your commander under our former
organization, and when we were scattered the compact was
virtually
annulled. I have no right to command the schooner beyond
any that you have, save that but for me, she would now be anchored
before Colonel Powel's villa! With you, Grme, he said
somewhat
sternly, I want no quarrel.
Nor will I quarrel, Carleton. I cheerfully yield to you the
command, but insist on being consulted and advised on any
important
occasion. This is certainly one.
True, and we will by and by see what we had best resolve on.
I will propose to you my own plan, and hear yours, if you have
any to offer. As it is, we have taken fortune on board, and
followed
her, all blinded as she is!
Then you have no definite aim in view? said Morris with
animation.
No, truly I have not, answered Carleton with a smile that on
the instant, restored good feeling between the young men.
Then I have one you will embrace when you hear it.
That I will do by and by, answered Carleton, descending the
stairs to the cabin. Hold the deck till I come up, Morris, and I
will then muster the men and have the watches properly
organized
.
With these words the young captain disappeared to the
interview
with Eve.
Thou hast a gentle treasure there caged, my good Captain,
for
so
thou may'st be till my own time come! but I will ere long
teach thy pretty bird to peck from other hands save thine. But
let this be for another day and hour. Now let me mature my half
conceived plans.
Thus speaking he paced the quarter-deck, now with a quick
turn, now with a slower: now stopping full; now moving on and
altogether seeming like a man in excited thought. How beautiful
was the night or rather morning, for it was now three o'clock.
The moon was in its western field, white and clear as silver, with
which it tipped the bursting waves. The shores on either hand, a
league asunder, were dark and wooded, with here and there a bright
spot indicating the position of some half-embowered villa. Astern
the shores met together in the narrow gorge through which they had
so lately passed, and before them opened the broad waters of the
Sound. They were not alone upon the moonlit wave. Astern,
abeam, ahead, gleamed the white sails of many a fair craft; some
beating toward the city; others crossing their track to some
main-land port; while others stood toward the open Sound on the
same course with the schooner. Near them, just forward of the
beam, sailed a brig, schooner-rigged aft, which had kept ahead
of them since passing Hurl-Gate; but she was now rapidly
neared
under the additional impulse of a top-mast studden-sail, which
Morris, observing her speed, had quit his walk to and fro on the
quarter deck to set. He stood near the main rigging with a hand
upon a stay watching her. She was so near that he could
distinguish
the helmsman, whose tarpaulin glistened in the moonlight.
Save him he saw no one on her decks. Swiftly and rapidly she
glided over the waters that leaped sportively about her sharp bows
everything drawing free and looking seaman-like. As Morris
watched her and prided himself on the superior sailing of the
schooner, which was fast overhauling the brig, to his surprise, as
if without hands, up rose from her deck a large ball of canvass
which, unfolding itself like a huge bird spreading its wings, d
played the broad surface of a lower studden-sail, which soared to
its boom, and then, pressed outward by the wind, at once took the
rounded shape and fair proportions of the other drawing sails, and
gave a new impetus to the vessel.
That is no merchantman, or, if so, she is commanded by a man
from the navy! he said, turning to the helmsman, in whose bushy
red head and peculiarly wicked countenance, no one who had seen
Red Fred at the Brown Jug, would have failed to recognize that
personage.
So I was thinking, master Morris, answered Fred, giving a
hitch to his trowsers, changing his tobacco from one cheek into the
other, ejecting a shower of saliva into a spit box at his feet, and
then giving the wheel a turn and a half to windward; I never
saw a stun' sail set in that man-o'-wa' style, afore, on board a
trading
craft. But in my eye, Mr. Grme, she doesn't look so much
like a coaster as she might be! Look at her sheer and cut-water!
and the sweep o' the counter! See the set o' them masts, and
how square her fore yard is, and how dd a-taunto she looks.
I'm blowed, if I should be surprised to see four ports open in her
sides, and as many bull-dogs run their muzzles out.
Here Red Fred gave the wheel a half turn back, and brought the
schooner a little more up, for she had fallen off a point during his
remarks upon the brig.
I believe you are half right, Fred, said Morris, after looking
again narrowly at her. One of you hand me my glass from the
beckets, he said to a group of men who were in the waist
leaning
over the schooner's gazing at the brigantine, which was
now about a quarter of a mile to leeward, two points forward of the
beam, and running very free. Her speed had evidently increased
since the studdensail was set, for she was then but a point forward,
or else the schooner had fallen off.
Have you fallen away any? he demanded of the helmsman.
No, sir, not a hair line. She is gaining!
So I thought. Bear a hand with my glass, boy.
This order was addressed to a lad about sixteen years of age,
who, when Grme called for the spy-glass, was standing alone,
leaning against the capstan, a little apart from the men who were
gathered in the waist, and who, on hearing it, sprang for the
companion
way. He lingered, probably attracted by some words
overheard
from the cabin; but the second stern demand of the
lieutenant
was quickly heeded. As the lad handed the glass he
quietly
drew back and resumed his former position against the capstan
Morris, adjusting it for night use, levelled the instrument at the
brig. Her decks were at once brought close and distinct to the
sight. He could see the shadow of every rope and spar traced
upon
them by the moonlight with beautiful distinctness' at her helm
stood a nearly clad ordinary seaman. No other man was aft, but
the companion doors were open, and a cloak and a book, aye, and
a lady's glove lay upon the weather settee. He carried his glass
slowly forward and saw that the running rigging was neatly
coiled
,
as on board naval vessels, instead of being hung from pins.
Forward, under the black shadow of the fore-sail were grouped
several seamen, engaged in watching the schooner, and evidently
interested in outsailing her. He again ranged her decks with his
glass, for her bulwarks were unusually low, and he himself was in
the main rigging of his own vessel, to discover the officer of the
watch. But such a person was no where visible. One object
arrested
his attention, and that was a bright brass guna nine
pounder
on
a carriage opposite the leeward port. He immediately
turned his glass to examine the side near him, to see if he could
discover a fellow-port to it, and detected one. He then ascended
the rigging twenty feet, and again brought his glass to bear upon
the deck, and by this means he overlooked the bulwark and saw
enough of a gun-carriage to assure him that she carried at least two
guns. He now directed his glass to her spars and top-hamper,
and after a brief examination was satisfied that she was an armed
vessel. He was about to withdraw his eye from the lens when it
was arrested by a figure in the fore-top rigging of the brig, which,
on closer inspection, he saw was a man with a spy-glass in his
hand, which was directed down upon the schooner's decks.
Morris
kept his glass levelled until he saw the other remove his, when
he tried to get a look at his features! But the other, as it divining
his purpose, and not choosing to gratify his curiosity, turned away
and directed his glass to a sloop on his lee beam. Grme gave
once more a narrow scrutiny of the brig's decks, and then closing
his spy-glass descended to the quarter-deck.
What do you make her out, Mr. Morris? inquired Red Fred
with that freedom which their former companionship on shore
somewhat authorized. She looks suspicious, and in my opinion
means to make our better acquaintance before we part company.
If we only had the schooner in her old trim, we might court
the intimacy, said Morris. She carries a pair of your bull-dogs,
Fred, and a watch of eight men.
That will give her a crew of sixteen, besides cook, and
steward
,
and captain, and mates, said Fred. We are even handed
and four more, if that was all. What do you take her to be, sir?
Hadn't I better keep the schooner away a point and run her closer
aboard, Mr. Morris? I see we have gained on her since the
spencer
was set.
Yes, keep away a little. I would like to take a nigher view of
her. She is not in the service, for there is no vessel in it of her
description; besides, her armament is not naval. She is more
likely a fancy merchant brig, owned by a dandy captain, or a yacht
from the Provinces.
I've seen such craft with your fancy skippers, said Fred,
throwing the wheel smartly to windward half a dozen spokes and
then checking it. There was one from Baltimore come into
Havana
when I was there, and all the Spanish went to see it. She
was a full-rigged brig, and every thing about her was in apple-pie
style! Her capstan was silver plated, and had silver sockets for
the bars. Her running gear was all of white manilla-grass, and
and every block and dead-eye about her was polished like
mahogany
.
Her decks were white as snow, and only fit for a fine lady to
walk over. I went into her cabin, and blaze me if I ever saw such
finery in a theatre! The companion-way was carved and
ornamented
with silverthe hand-rail was silverthe stair-rods were
silver, and every thing was edged and set with silver. I never
saw any thing so rich! Carpets were laid so thick you could not
hear a step, and such carpets for beauty was never seen by my
eye! The furniture was a little beyond any thing in that country.
It was all bird's eye maple, gilt and silvered. A pianny was where
the transum ought to ha' been, and looking glasses were so plenty
that I could not turn without seeing myself. The state rooms
were large, and furnished off in great style, and the steerage was
as handsome a drawing-room as any body's parlor in York. I
looked round for the captain, expecting, you see, of course to see
a little dapper gentry, half sailor and half green-horn, finackeed off
in long togs and ruffle-shirt risbands. But, shiver my mizzen, if
I wasn't shown as the captain of the craft as well-built,
thoroughbred
a seaman from keel to truck as ever I'd wish to lay eyes on.
He was a handsome chap too, and had a keen eye for a pretty lass,
or I am mistaken. He had been a middy, but having had a
fortin
left him he got leave for three years, and built himself that
craft, and so sailed about on a blow-any-way cruise, just for
pleasure
!
This was two years ago, and I dare say he is cruising yet;
and if that chap hadn't a schooner rig aft, I should say it was the
same craft, for I never see two profiles so much alike.
I shouldn't be surprised, Fred, said Morris, again looking at
her, if she was some such craft as you describe. It would be a
feather in our schooner's cap if we could take her guns out of her,
But we can't do this without guns unless we run her aboard.
And that could be easily done, Mr. Morris, said Fred cooly,
grasping at the same time the lower spoke of the wheel, as if in
readiness to put the schooner away towards her.
I believe it would, answered Morris with animation. But
keep her steady! We sail together now, and there is time enough.
I will speak to Carleton.
Thus speaking, Morris advanced to the companion-way to make
known the suspicious character of the vessel, while Fred,
impatient
to lay alongside and carry out his reckless suggestion, kept
gradually edging the schooner nigher and nigher to the stranger.
CHAPTER III.
When Carleton descended into the cabin, Eve was seated on a
low ottoman, her face buried in her hands while tears were slowly
trickling along their azure tinted veins down to the beautiful wrist.
Her long and beautiful auburn hair, fell in disregarded luxuriance
about her neck and over her moulded arm and sylph-like figure,
the soft and touching drapery of woman's grief! She heard his well
known step, and brushing the tears from her dark eyes she threw
back her glorious hair and rose to meet him! What love! what
deep affection was in her sweet aspect, as she advanced towards
him! Whatsoever power there is in female fascination; whatsoever
charm there is in woman's idolatory was inscribed by love's finger
on every feature! She sprang towards him! She hung upon his
manly bosom, as the ivy entwines its trusting tendrils around the
oak.
Carleton, dearest Carleton! you have not forgotten me! Oh,
if you knew how heavily the hours passed when you were away!
I am envious of all others, that keep you from me! I would be
with you ever! Ever be looking up, thus! into your eyes, that
now beam upon me so kindly! ever by your side, knowing that
whenever I lift my gaze, it will rest upon your beloved features!'
You are silly, Eve, to love so wildly, he said, slightly
drawing
her to his side and imprinting a kiss upon her pure forehead; and
he looked as he spoke as if touched and gratified at her deep
womanly
and almost childish devotion. You should not thus
lavishly
cast all your love at a throw!
I cast it into
thy
bosom, Carleton! she said bending her
graceful head, as if to hide from him a shadow of sadness.
He was touched by the tone of her voice and said playfully,
Yet thou hast lost, Eve, and I am the happy winner!
Have I not gained thee, Carleton? Having thee I possess all
things! It hast filled my heart with joy that I hear thee say
thou art the
happy
winner! Oh, Carleton, if you knew how a
careless word from youone word that gives me a hope that I still
am dear to youmakes my heart a heaven! you would love to
bless me thus! But alas! I sometimes of late, fear that you have
forgotten your love for me and . She could not go on!
He felt a tear fall upon his hand.
Nay, Eve, thou hast done nought to offend me, he said
tenderly
,
moved by the touching and eloquent distress which checked
her words; and leading her to the ottoman he seated himself at
her feet.
My dearest, noble
husband
! Nay frown not!thou
must
suffer me to call thee by that loved title, Carleton!for to feel
that I am thy wife is a source of sweet, indescribable joy! I
cannot
keep the deep tide from bursting forth, when thou alone only
art present! Forgive me, Carleton! To thee I must speak of
my happiness, and tell thee how full it is! I
must
repeat in thy
ears, the happy word
wife
! I must hear my voice utter the
blissful sounds My husband! Forbid me not, dear Carleton!
Nay, do not look so darkly! I will not offend again! But smile on
me, and I will, though it break my heart, keep locked within it,
the secrets of our
Utter not the word, Eve, said Carleton, with stern
interruption
!
Thou well knowest thou art risking my fiercest
displeasure
!
Be content. I suffer thee to remain on board!
Oh, joy, joy! I dared not ask thee what thou hadst determined,
but I knew in my heart, when you entered, that my love had
triumphed
.
Bless thee, Carleton! For this clemencymay I not
call it returning
love!
you have my deepest gratitude.
Near thee!
Oh, this is sweet peace, I will forget, since thou hast commanded
it, that thou art  I will breathe the blessed word only in my
heart!and I am thinethy
let
me speak it, Carleton
thy
wife!
Eve!
Naybe not angry with me. To thine ear alone has it been
breathed! Art
thou
unwilling in secret to hear it? Oh, no,
no!
Notwithstanding your late icy coldnesswhich if hot tears could
have dissolved, had long since been melted into your first
affection
!
notwithstanding you would last night have left me, yet I
know
, I feel, Carleton, that you do not wish thou wert not my
what
, so dear,
thou art
to me! Thou wouldst kill me didst thou
say so! Do I hate thee? Did I love thee less, when I knew my
husband was an outlaw! did I fly thee, and scorn thee, and like
the world turn against thee? No! thou knowest I did not! True
to thee and my woman's love, I loved thee, had room been in my
heart, more. Thou wert dearer to me, when I knew I was the
only one that loved thee!
Of thy crimes confessed to me, the
night I discovered
who
my husband was, did I reproach thee!
Did I not forgive thee and tell thee that guiltless wert thou to me
so that thou lovedst me!
Noble, devoted Eve! I feel that I am unworthy of you!
he said sadly. I never appreciated you! You were not destined
in Heaven to be my wife! Thy love and devotion deserve a
better
return than I can render thee!
Than
thou
canst render me! she cried with an earnestness
and passion, that increased the brilliancy of her dark eyes,
tearful
though they were; what canst thou give me, Carleton that
is not dear to me? A worda lookthe slightest glance of thine,
is to me a treasure which like a miser I hoard up in my heart's
close casket, fondly to gloat over when thou art absent!
But, dear Eve, he said with hesitation, as if uncertain how
to reply to her impassioned words; you would not love wisely to
love unrequited! Such love as thine should be returned with all
a man's soul and being! Besides thee, he should have eye or
thought for no other! Thou must be the altar of his passionthe
shrine of his adoration!
Thou
adorest?
he
must
adore!
Eve,
I
never have even
loved!
The lovely being at whose feet he sat, listened as if she did
not hear, or hearing did not understand! With her eyes fixed
earnestly upon his troubled face, and her lips apart as if she
would speak, she spoke not! She looked at him a few moments
in silent, painful amazement Then she released her hand slowly,
gently from hisfor he had held it all along, and now seemed
with his down-cast gaze to be admiring the glittering jewels that
adorned it. Gently, slowly she disengaged it and clasped, instead,
her own hand, and bending towards him in an attitude of
touching
eloquence, she knelt suppliantly! Still she spoke not! He
felt
her large eyes fixed upon him, and he dared not look up! He
feared to meet their sad, reproving, soul-stricken gaze.
George! Carleton! she said, and her voice seemed to issue
from her heart. Did I hear aright? Oh, speakspeak kindly to
me! and tell me if you said you never loved me? I will listenI
will not let my heart burstI will hold it in thus with my hands!
and she pressed her clasped fingers beneath her bosom close to her
heart. See, I am calm!
Evefor God's sake, do not look and talk to me so! he cried
with acute misery. It was an idle wordI meant it not! Turn
away those eyes, I cannot bear their gaze!
If they grieve thee, Carleton, I will turn them away, I would
not grieve thee! But thou hast grieved me; oh Carleton, thou
hast grieved me! Who could withstand the touching suffering
of these few gentle words of complaint? The pirate-chief caught
her hands, pressed them to his lips, and breathed a word of
tenderness
into her ear. Eve, forgive me! I meant not what I said.
'Twas an idle word!
'Tis spoken, Carleton, she said recovering her hand and
rising to her feet with sweet dignity; and I feel that it is a true one'
Thou hast then
never
loved me! Alas, when to thee I gave my
virgin heart, and thou didst kneel and swear thou lovedst me
better
than thou didst love life! lovedst thou me
not
then? When in
that hour, I surrendered to thee my maiden name and took thine,
alas! ne'er yet mine! and thou didst fold me to thy heart thy bride and
wife! lovedst thou me
not
, then, Carleton! When, because thou
wished it so, I, ere yet I had been one day a wife, did take a dreadful
oath administered by thee, that I should never divulge, save with
thy free consent, our union! lovedst thou me
not then
, Carleton?
It was like a spirit of judgment from the other world
interrogating
him! He was overpowered with the conflict of his feelings,
and turning from her walked across the cabin, where he stood a
moment with his face buried in his hands! She approached him
with a countenance emanating love and sympathy.
George, forgive me! I meant not to wound where I would
kneel to heal! I know thou lovedst me! I know thou hast ever
loved me! Thou knowest not thy own heart. If thou wilt look
within, thou wilt see the image of thy Eve, imprinted there in the
lines of life!
No, no, Eve! he said with bitterness, I will not deceive
you! I never have truly loved thee! If I could have loved thee,
thy deep, pure, idolatrous affection would have created love in my
bosom! I was proud of theeof thy matchless lovelinessof thy
deep love for
me!
but I never returned, never requited it! Instead
of being a fountain reflecting the summer sunshine of thy warm
and sunny love, I was like a wintry pool presenting an icy shield
to its beams!
Never
! never loved me! spoke she slowly and whisperingly,
as if her thoughts introverted, were holding converse with her
heart.
No, truly, Eve! It is time thou wert undeceived! I have long
wished for this occasion, but
Long!
repeated the lovely sufferer, hast thou
not
loved
me for long, Carleton?
He hesitated, embarrassed how to reply to such painful questions.
If she had shown anger, or scorn, or hate, he felt he could have borne
it. But to be so like an angel in meekness and gentleness! to
receive
with such touching sorrow his confession! this was more
than even his cold and stern spirit could endure. Again he turned
from her, and seemed as if leaving the cabin. But a single word
from her lips arrested him.
George!
Eve!
Come to me! Nay nearer! sit by me!
He obeyed her.
I will say what I have to say, calmly. Thou hast deceived
me, Carleton! But I complain not! I am not about to reproach
you! If I have grieved you, forgive me! It was a sudden shock
to me, to be told from your beloved lipsfor thou art still my
beloved
,
Georgethat I was not loved by thee! But it is over now!
I feel I can bear it! Now nothing remains but
for me to love thee!
Naydo not look displeased! It is the sweet lesson I have taught
my heart for years! and it will not forget it! nor would I it should
forget. Thou art my heart's world, its serene Heaven, in which
like a dove it flies and is blest; its uprising star guiding it to
happiness
and peace; its sun from which it derives its warmth and
life! Its pulse can only throb with thine, and when thy heart
ceases to beat, mine will find rest?
Strange and unaccountable creature! said Carleton with
emotion, and yet speaking as if annoyed. I have told thee, dear
Eve, that I have never loved thee! I must now tell thee, I do not
now love thee! I pity, I feel for you, with all my heart! I know
how deep, how strong your attachment is to me! I knew it would
survive even this painful and most trying confession. But, my
dear Eve, is it not folly to love, where thou art not beloved! Is it
not
Nay, Carlton, I have heard thy words! The arrow hath
pierced and cloven my spirit's life! but it hath not shivered the
mirror in my breast, wherein thy image is reflected! Thou art
dear to me as before! I may not cease to love thee; but I may
weep that thou lovest not me! But wherefore, dear Carleton,
she said with warm and glowing feeling; wherefore hast thou not
loved? Have I been
all
unworthy thy manly affection? of that
noble
lovewhich this hour I would die to know was mine own.
No, Eve! you are worthy any man's love! Of yours few are
worthy, much less myself.
Yesyou wrong yourself, Carleton! you have erred, you are
now in the path of error! but you are generous and noble and
good! Thy spirit is dark and thy nature is stern; but
I
know that
thou hast among men few thy peer. Unworthy! No! and, she
added, her voice suddenly changing to a subdued tone, thou lovest
me not. Alas, me! yet thou must love some one. Thy nature
is confiding, and thy spirit will yearn for its mate. Thou wilt love
some one. Happy she! whom thou lovest? Blest the maiden,
into whose rich bosom thou pourest all the wealth of thy great
heart's affections. Happy the lovely and loved who can read in
thy deep, passionate gaze, that thou lovest and she is the beloved.
I have, alas! thought, (for my love blinded my penetration and I
was willingly deceived,) that I read love and devotion in your
admiring
eyes; and my ear has trembled, and my heart-string's,
catching the vibration, have thrilled with joy, as you poured into
them words of love. But alas! the glance was that of pride and
admiring passion, the words the voice of flattery. George thou
hast then mocked me with the semblance of love!
Thou didst deceive thyself, Eve; not I thee. I admire thee;
I was proud of thee, and thou sawest these passions in my eyes
and construed it love. I praised thy beauty, and thou didst think
I worshipped thee. No, Eve, thou wert the idol only of my
vanity
,
the shrine of my self-love.
Carleton, she said with strange seriousness in the tones of
her voice, why then did you wed me?
Because I then believed that I loved thee.
Then! she repeated with an emphasis that made him start.
What has shown thee
since
then, that thou wert in error, George?
and her dark observing glance was fixed upon his changing
countenance
with singular earnestness.
He was silent a few moments. He was perplexed, and
evidently
was withholding the truth to invent an indifferent reply. It
was plain by a change in the expression of her intense gaze that
this suspicion rose to her mind.
It was the devotion and disinterestedness of
your own
love for
me, Eve! he replied with a sudden readiness that would have
showed to a close observer, that he had lit upon a happy reply
with which he meant to cover from her the true one. I witnessed
your attachment, and from you learning how to love, knew then I
had never loved. His eyes avoided hers as he replied, and she
listened without moving. For a few seconds after he had ceased
speaking both were silent; he inwardly congratulating himself
upon his successful answer to her abrupt inquiry, she with
her young and faithful heart torn by the first pang of jealousy. She
broke the silence.
George Carleton, thou hast not spoken the truth, she said
severely yet not unkindly; there was more sorrow than anger in
her even and solemn tones.
The young pirate-chief started and his haughty spirit
instinctively
rose at the imputation. But as his gaze fell on the lovely
woman
he had wronged, he suppressed his emotion and replied,
Eve from thee I forgive that word! I have wronged thee, most
truly have I, and from thee can forgive much!
And from thee, George, I can forgive much! I did think a
while since, that there was nothing I could not forgive in thee!
But my heart hath within the minute past taught me not to trust
my deep love too far! There is one thing I may not forgive in
thee, George! Carleton plainly desired to avoid the allusion that
he evidently anticipated, and said quickly,
Would to God, Eve, thou wouldst heed the teaching of thy
heart and not trust thy deep love too far! It will ne'er be
requited
and if it be trampled and crushed under foot, thou must
thank thyself! If thou wilt love where thou art
Oh, say not hated with thy lips as I read it in thine eyes,
Carleton
,
and I will strive to love thee less, she cried, almost shriek
ing, as she pressed her hand upon his mouth. I have wronged
thee by my suspicion of thy truth! I knew thou would'st never
be false to methough thou lovest me not so much and warmly as
thou thinkest thou ought to do! I will not require that thou
shouldst measure thy love by mine! nor, because thou findest it
fall short, thou shouldest not think and so teach thy heart that
thou lovest me not; I but think that 'tis woman's nature to love
most! I know thou art deceiving thyself and dost truly love me!
For the suspicion that, but now, flashed on my brain like bale-fire,
that it was because thou hadst learned by
loving another
, that thou
knewest thou lovedest
not
me, I will not, I dare not, I may not
cherish in my thought! Say 'tis false, dear Carleton! O, God, say
'tis
false
and I will kneel to thee!
Carleton saw now before him, in Eve, woman in her true
character
!
Gentle, loving, adoring, self-sacrificing, let but a spark of
suspicion, not that her love hath been slighted, for this she will
forgive and still love on, but that her love hath been slighted for
another's shrine, light on her heart and a conflagration of all the
wild passions of her being ensue! Carlton had never seen Eve
but as the gentle, beautiful and loving; her dark eyes beaming
affection
;
her soft, heart-deep tones breathing tenderness and
devotion
!
But now how changed! how sudden the transition in
the time from giving utterance to one sentence to speaking
another
!
and yet she only suspected, and the moment before she had
rejected the suspicion; but now, as she gazed upon his tell-tale
cheek and averted eye and saw he spoke not, it rushed back upon
her soul with new strength and distinctness of outline, and she at
once yielded up her whole nature to its influence; loosed the
wings of her spirit to its storm and let it drive her whither it
would. Such is woman when the depths of her heart are moved by
jealousy! Light and darkness are not more opposite than her two
natures! To her jealousy would create a hell! love a heaven!
Carleton stood in silent awe and gazed upon her. Her slight and
singularly elegant person was dilated and seemed taller by many
inches. Her bosom violently heaved till her kerchief seemed as if
agitated by the wind. Her attitude was commanding and spirited
Her dark, glorious eyes flashed with fire and her pale cheek and
bloodless lips spoke eloquently and painfully of the deep feeling
within. He stood as if petrified before her, and observed her with
an astonishment he did not strive to suppress. Could that
lovely
yet angry creature who stood flashing upon him, be the
yielding
and quiet girl whom he had so long held dishonored by
withholding
from her the title of wife? He felt both fear and respect
as he contemplated her; and the awkward conviction forced itself
upon his mind that to trifle with such a woman's love would not
be lightly dangerous! She seemed to be reading his thoughts.
Speak! she said commandingly as he still continued silent.
Eve, I know not what wild spirit has taken possession of thee.
Thou art not thyself. But a moment since thou wert defending
me with extraordinary eloquence, and now I behold thee without
a feather of a cause standing in hostile attitude and demanding of
me I know not what! Art thou beside thyself?
No, Carleton, no! she said hurriedly and nervously. Yet I
do not know but that I am. There is a strange sensation at my
heart! and she pressed her hands against it: It can't be so. I
have judged you wrongfully. No, dear CarletonI knew you
would not lolove a-nothI could not live if I knew it;yet I
I think I shouldthoulove you
still
butbut, dear Carleton,
she
youyou should both
Here she tottered and would have fallen to the floor but for his
arm. He caught her and gently laid her upon the ottoman. Her
lips still moved and he bent his ear over her to catch the words from
her tremulous lips. She spoke in a very low but singularly
distinct
and firm tone. It was the completion of the sentence:
both die!
and she was insensible.
God of Heaven, what a woman, he exclaimed starting back
with horror.
Pale, and lifeless, and lovely; how still and strange was her
death-like
repose! How calm and beautiful she lay there, like innocence
slumbering; yet her nether lip wore not the pure expression of
innocence
.
It was compressed against its fellow and bore the
footprint
of the stern spirit that fled from it as she breathed forth her
last determined words.
Carleton made no effort to reanimate her! he seemed not to
think of it. Lost in his own thoughts he gazed upon his wife a few
moments as she lay beautiful and still before him, as if death and
not life now claimed her; and as he dwelt on this new
developement
of her being, he was amazed and feared to contemplate the
consequences
to his future purposes! He
loved
Blanche Hillary!
Eve had been to him a pretty toy, whom he had tired of and with
whose devoted love he wearied, though his pride was gratified
by it. Although circumstances had now fortuitously brought
about his confession that he had never loved Eve, he witheld, for
reasons, all will discern when it is remembered that Eve, though
unacknowledged, was his lawful wife, the confession of his
attachment
to Blanche. Eve's womanly penetration aided by her deep
love, which is ever the parent of jealousy, had detected his
cmbarrasment
,
and instantly suspicion of the truth flashed upon her
mind. The consequences we have just seen. The reaction of
feeling upon her full heart crushed it. A beautiful sacrifice! she
seemed an offering upon the altar of love, a victim of Carleton's
pride. And
was
she a victim to his pride. Loved he never that
sweet devoted creature? Had he never thought he loved her?
yes,
until
he met Blanche Hillary. He then knew that he had
been deceived, believing he had loved; and
that
alone, he felt,
was
love
which the charms and presence of Blanche inspired in his
bosom! It was a new, strange, blissful emotion, such as he had never
experienced in Eve's presence. It was deep happiness; with
such happiness Eve had never filled his soul. 'Till he knew Blanche
he had only known the image of love, and with this painted image
he had deceived Evedeceived himself.
As he gazed upon her with introverted thoughts the past came
before his mind in vivid colours! We will lift the veil and with
him gaze upon the picture memory so faithfully retouched!
CHAPTER IV.
A SCENE IN THE PAST.
It is moonlight in a southern land! A sparkling river flows
with silvery beauty amid green shores! In its winding course it
frets among rocky islets; kisses the lithe willow branch drooping
to drink its wave; smiles as it laves the velvet verge of melining
lawns, and darts with arrowy swiftness and flashing light between
rock bound gorges! or, emerging, foaming and agitated, like a
frightened deer, out of the wild vortex of some bristling cascade,
over which, when most rejoicing in its placid beauty, it was
resistlessly
plunged into a yawning whirlpoolit smooths its ruffled
crest, and spreads broadly away to bathe woodland shores and
sweet-scented meadows; its bosom decked with pleasant islands
and enlivened by the graceful sail of some pleasure boat, or the
light canoe of the sportsman or trout-fisher.
It was night upon this river of the southern clime. A
tasteful
villa upon its banks was bathed in the soft beams of the
mellow
moon. Tall oaks, majestic patriarchs of the olden forest,
rose high and broadly limbed upon the lawn that lay around it,
and in front swept undulating to the bright gliding waters. The
fairest part of the lovely river stretched in beauty before the
mansion
.
From the spot above, where a wooded headland towered
dark and sublime, came to the ear of the listener upon the piazza,
the subdued murmuring of the waterfull, though at times heard
loud and rudely as the wind rose fitfully and
wasted
the roar along
the still night. Below was visible a far stretch of lowland,
diversified
with clump of wood, and vast treeless meadow-land. Amid
this wide champaigne reappeared the river, after disappearing a
mile below the house, winding, fur receeding, like a league-long
serpent, his silvery scales gleaming in the moon-became. In front
of the house was a lake-like scene! The river had here expanded
its generous bosom, insinuating itself between many a pretty
grove and the mainland, and adding it, a lovely isle, to deck its own
domain. And beautifully had she arranged the stolen emeralds
upon her glittering bosom. Here a sweet spot not larger than a
lady's boudoir, rose out of the water not far from the shore, all
carpeted with green and shaded by tall umbrageous trees, that
with their wide-reaching branches, half canopied it from the
noonday
sun, and at night letting in the broken moonbeams upon the
sward, created a spot where Queen Mab and her mischievous
train would have loved to hold their mad-cap revels. Not
bow-shot
distant sprung from the steely breast of the shadowy wave a
dark ragged rock, its sides overgrown with tangled vines and
beautiful evergreens peeping from every crevice, its black,
frowning
head beetling far over the deep water and menacing the
adventurous
boatman who cast his lines in the dark quiet pools at its
base. In mid-river lay a floating paradise! It was a lawn-like
island, darkly wooded, and of the purest green in the sunny light.
Romantic, needle-like rocks towering on one side, relieved its
softer character, while its faintly illumined druidical groves gave
to it a calm and solemn beauty. A few deer roved its glades and
browsed upon its lawn, and its tree-coverts were vocal with the
songs of birds. The squirrel leaped from branch to branch
joyous
and free, and the timid hare found there a secure retreat from
the roaming hound or the heartless gunner; for it was a part of
the domain of the villa, directly before which it lay. And this
was the scene from its drawing-room windows! Lawn and
woodland
,
river and islands, rocks and waterfalls! What besides these
was wanting to complete a perfect scene? Life. Hearts to feel
and minds to appreciate! Beings with cultivated tastes and
having
souls filled with moral beauty, and deep unextinguishable love
for the pure and the good. And such a being was Eve Innes! In
the bosom of this sweet spot she had budded and blown a sweet
rose, fit ornament and fairest of the lovely paradise. An only
child, and early an orphan, she was reared in all the luxury and
indulgence that wealth, guided by paternal pride and tenderness,
could bestow. Lovely as a child, she grew far lovelier still as
she approached that sweet age when the child merges into the
maiden. At sixteen Eve was lovely beyond the beauty of
maidens
.
She was gentle and good as she was fair. Her carefully
cultured mind knew no unseemly weed, and her heart was morally
pure. Her father loved; nay, worshipped her! In her presence,
and gazing upon her innocent and celestial beauty, listening to
the music of her voice and treasuring up every look and smile,
was he only happy. We need not say that one whom we have
described
so gentle and good returned with all her affection, and
strong and deep was love in her nature, his tenderness and
indulgence
.
About a mile from the villa of Mr. Innes, in an old mansion
gloomily but romantically situated on a rock overhanging the
waterfull, resided a gentleman of recluse habits. Little was
known of him, save that many years ago he arrived at
Charlestown
from the West Indies, where rumor said he had been a
merchant
and accumulated great wealth. He purchased the estate just
alluded to from the heir of the ancient family that had long held
it, and building a small gothic chateau within the sound and sight
of the caseade, there took up his abode with his youthful son and
a few slaves. He coldly met the courtesies of the gentlemen in
the neighborhood, and invariably declining all invitations, he was
soon neglected and suffered to follow the bent of his own humor,
though many dark stories were whispered of the manner in which
he had obtained his vast wealth.
Eve Innes was nine years of age; and being of a wild,
adventurous
spirit, one morning, accompanied only by a little
negro lad of ten years of age, the almost constant companion and
attendant of her rambles, she got into a skiff, in which an old
lave fished daily for the table, and pushed gaily out into the calm
river. She could paddle and so could Sambo; and after sailing
about a little while near the shore, invited by the beauty of the
lawn-like island in the middle of the river, she pointed Sambo with
a shout in that direction, and they made the light wherry fly
towards
its green shore. Alighting on the ribbon of white sand that
bordered it, she bounded towards the grove in pursuit of a squirrel
which she had started from a rock on which he had been very
busily
seated upright on his hind legs, nibbling a nut, held very
daintily
between his fore paws. Sambo lingered a moment to secure the
skiff and then went lumbering after her like a bear, with his naked
splaw feet, while she run like a deer.
The squirrel knew how to escape pursuit, and she was soon
panting and looking at the topmost limb of a maple, on which he
sat gazing down upon her with provoking coolness.
Sambo, you must go up after him with a stick and drive him
down, she said as her man Friday came up.
Od, lors! missy Ebe, Sambo be sure tumble head fus' and
break he neck. Squrl too nimble on de toe for nigger, missy Ebe.
'Sides, if I cotch 'um he bite you!
Eve looked at the limb again and then shaking her pretty head,
with a sweet childish pout on her beautiful mouth, went rambling
farther through the wood. Its solemn and sombre majesty struck
her young mind with awe! She did not run but walked slowly on
and gazed up and around her with wonder and a sweet fear upon
her countenance. How true is nature to her duty! She ever
speaks to the heart and teaches, as never man taught, the existence
and power of a Creator.
The child paused. All around her was grand. Nature reigned
impressive
and alone. The
thought of God
sunk deep into the
lovely
child's soul. It took hold of her inner-life and left there
impressed
the eternal truth that she was created to live forever.
The
effect was a strange sense of fear at her heart
. But from the dark,
aweawakening
woods she lifted her tear gushing eyes beyond them to the
blue skies overhead, looking down upon her through the leafy
branches like soft azure eyes of angels! Then descended as from
Heaven, a sweet peace upon her heart: the strange fear fled and
love filled her soul. The tears that fear caused to gush from her
eyes, love dried up with a smile of serenity and peace; she looked
round again upon the solemn and awe-awakening wood and said in
her heart, God is love!
Thus was Eve Innes taught truth. Nature was her teacher, and
the spirit of truth led her to look through Nature up to Nature's
God!
Dar' a yabbit, Missy Ebe, suddenly cried Sambo, who all
the while had been looking about with his great round white
eyes to see if he could discover another squrl, for his young
mistress to pursue.
Eve was instantly recalled to her sport-loving mood by the
sound of his voice, but the seed of another life had been sown in her
soul for eternity.
She saw the little brown rabbit, leaping away through the grove
and the sight gave her wings! Sambo, although he had started
first, was soon distanced and on, onward with affrighted leaps
bounded the beautiful animal, leading the pursuing girl deep into
the wood towards the centre of the island. With her bonnet held
by a string in her hand, her golden tresses floating like sunny
waves about her head, and her attitude all grace and spirit, on,
onward
she pursued! Sambo was soon left behind and quite out of sight
and the rabbit went further and further towards the other side of
the beautiful island. Glimpses of the river through the trees
beyond
first warned her how far she had run: but she still saw
the rabbit, who after getting a good ways ahead would stop, prick
up his long ears and tempt her on to catch him; and then laying
his ears back would again bound away from her eager pursuit.
She stopped when she saw the river gliding past on the opposite
side of the; island and then looking back for Sambo and not
seeing him she began to think she was lost. The rabbit stopped,
also, just where the edge of the wood met the lawn that sloped
to the shore. She then thought she would try the chase once more
when, being out of the wood she should be able to see where she
was. The graceful little animal waited until she was within a few
feet of him and then went skipping over the soft sward, looking
back at every agile leap. A high rock lay before him half in the
water, and she feared he would run to the top and so she should
lose him; for she still had hopes of getting possession of him.
But the poor little hare's fate seemed likely to be a less happy
one than to be folded to her bosom. As, after one of his bounds,
he was sitting upright looking back at her, and prettily tossing
ts ears, suddenly a large greyhound darted from behind the rock
and seized it in his mouth! Eve shrieked, perhaps as much in
alarm at the unexpected presence of the dog, as at the fate of poor
puss. Her shriek brought also from behind the rock a handsome,
dark complexioned boy, about fourteen years old, with a gun in his
hand. A glance at Eve and at his greyhound showed him the
cause of the out-cry, and calling to his dog in a stern tone he
bade him release the rabbit, at the same time running towards
him and striking him with his gun. The dog dropped the terrified
animal, which lay upon the ground seemingly without life.
Regardless
of the lad, Eve darted forward and caught it up, and seeing
no blood placed her hand upon its little heart. It throbbed and she
knew that it had been more frightened than hurt.
Is it wounded, Miss? asked the lad with gentle interest in
the fate of what he supposed was a `pet.' If Stag has hurt him
he shall be whipped for it.
It is only frightened! Poor puss! You were very good
to call the grey-hound off. Oh, I have chased it so far. And
I should have been very sorry if Stagis that his name? Yes.
should have hurt itfor I was the cause of making it come
this side of the Island. While she spoke the boy remained
gazing
upon her lovely, flushed countenance, with deep admiration,
which his sparkling eye, and the heightened glow on his cheek
betrayed to be deep and feeling for one of his years. He was
tall, and finely formed with black hair, large expressive eyes,
and a mouth of singular beauty and haughtiness. His carriage
was proud and free, and his bearing was that of one impetuous
and little controlled. His gaze was earnest, yet respectfulardent,
yet timid. Eve, by her caresses, in a short time restored the
little trembler to his senses. It looked terrified and shrunk with
in her arm as if fearing the boy rather than his lovely captor. Eve
was gratifled at this confidence and smiling, said prettily,
Your large dark eyes terrify little puss. See how she nestles.
The boy smiled in return and replied, with gallantry, So
they alarm not its pretty mistress, I care nothing for puss's love.
But they will alarm me, sir, if you keep looking at me so
earnestly
with them, she said half in seriousness.
He again laughed and turned to call his hound who was
straying
.
He then looked at her a moment steadily and said in a low
tone
Are you not Eve Innes?
Yes.
I knew no one else could be so beautiful.
Eve was scarcely ten; yet she dropped her eyes, blushed, and
felt confused she knew not why. She lifted her eyes and meeting
his full dark gaze let them fall again; and then thinking suddenly
of Sambo, she said hurriedly
I have lost my waiting man, and she then called him in a
clear musical tone that all the singing birds took up. Never was
Sambo so sweetly repeated.
After listening a moment, he asked how she reached the
island
.
She told him and also how she had been led away by the
flight of the rabbit.
Let Sambo find his way back as he can to the skiff, he
said; and pointing behind the rock, added with earnestness
Here is my boat. I will row you home. Stag shall not go in
it but wait till I come back for him.
Eve made some objections to leaving Sambo; but the
enthusiastic
boy silenced them by assuring her that the negro was
already
back in the skiff fast asleep waiting for her, and with the
promise that on landing her he would see that Sambo soon
followed
her.
He then assisted her into the boat, from which he and Stag had
just landed at the rock when Eve and the rabbit made their
appearance
.
Stag shall go too. How wistful he looks to get in, said Eve
The boat is large enough, and I know he will lie quietly in the
bottom. I will be his friend because he did not harm my little
rabbit. But oh, you sadly frightened her, naughty Stag! Come
in sir!
The dog with a grateful look, bounded in and crouched on the
bottom, in the centre of the boat and creeping gradually nigher
rested his nose on Eve's foot.
I envy Stag, said the boy as he pushed from the rock.
Envy a dog!
You
have said you will be his
friend
.
And I will be yours too, for calling him off! she said
laughing
in her frank, joyous-hearted way. I shall keep puss as
a present from you, if you will let me.
Will you? he said with a kindling eye and pleased look.
If you like such things I will bring you squirrels and birds,
and I have a pet fawn at home you shall have.
Oh, how I
should
love a fawn! But, and she suddenly
changed countenance and look at him very seriously, but you
have not told me yet who you are?
I am afraid you will not take my fawn if I should tell you!
he said confused, and bending down to his light oars.
I hope you are not any body very bad, she said archly,
yet not without a little fear.
I am Mr. Carleton's son.
That dark, stern man that lives at Rock-Head! she
repeated
with a grave look. Are you his son? I have heard you
were as wild and savage as an Indian, and as dark! But you
don't look savage, and I like a dark face! I wish we had been
friends before, how many a nice sail we should have had together.
What is your name?
George Edward, he said, his face clearing up.
I like Edward better than George, and will call you Edward.
But does your father live in a great black castle, and never go
out doors, and when his slaves offend him does he put them in
a dungeon that runs far under the river and starve them to
death?
Edward smiled and then looked dark and displeased. At length
he answered, Do you believe such stories, Eve?
No, not now that I have known you, she said with a frank
look of confidence.
My father, Eve, is like other men, human and kind. He
suffers from grief, and solitude he covets because he can be
most happy alone.
What grieves him?
That I know not. He treats me with kindness, but lets me
have my own way. Sometimes he is stern and terrible. I should
fear to anger him or incur his displeasure. He treats the
servants
with gentleness and never has starved any to death, I
assure
you, Eve.
And is there no black dungeon running far under the water at
his house?
No. They are idle tales with which the negroes have amused
you in the nursery.
Then I won't believe them, Edward. Oh, there is Sambo in
the boat trying to push her off. He sees me and you wont have
to go back to find him; so you can go up to the house with me
and show Sambo how to make a cage to put my little rabbit in.
I want Pa to see you! He is gone into Charleston to-day, but
he will be at home soon. He wouldn't guess you were Mr.
Carleton's
son.
Why, Eve?
Because you are handsome, good and kind, and are not
near so black as an Indian.
In a few minutes they landed upon the lawn, and with strange
sensitiveness the lad refused her warm invitation to accompany her
to the mansion, saying he would the next day meet her by the
water, and row her to the island.
And many were the meetings by the water, and the happy row,
to the island, and glad ramble through its shades, of the youthful
pair. The intimacy so began, grew with their growth. Every
where, and almost daily, Edward Carleton was Eve's companion.
Mr. Innes took a fancy to him, and suffered the companionship.
Eve reached her sixteenth year, and, instead of childish rambles,
Edward was ever at her side, when she rode on horseback, when
she walked by moonlight through the ground, or sat by her harp
or piano. They drew and painted together, and he taught her
Italian, the language of love. His voice mingled with hers in the
soul-warming song, and the glances of their eyes melted into one,
as each looked at the other, at some tender sentiment, for sympathy
of feeling. In Mr. Innes eyes Eve was still a child, and he
thought not of love; he guarded her no more at sixteen than at
ten. Edward, under a governer some hours daily at home, was
regarded by both parties as a boy, and no thought was taken of
the dangerous intimacy, of two young and passionate creatures.
But all too late would now have been the guard, that should have
been earlier set over Eve by her father, if he had feared her union
with Mr. Carleton's son. But marriage and Eve, he had never for
a moment associated together. His life was wrapped up in her.
But she had now another object for her regard; an object that called
into being a new and stronger love. As the sun-flower of her
young passion unfolded with her maiden years, it turned towards
him by her side, as to the sun-God of her love. Her heart had grown
to his, and love for him, as she grew in years, became her second
life. Oh, how deep and pure and comprehensive was her
affection
.
She knew no other happiness than to love him It was
beautiful to witness her holy affection; for holy and hallowed it
was by the pure, guideless heart from which it grew. And so she
loved him with all her being, yet loved her her?
No
.
Dark and gloomy and stern was his nature, and men said it came
from his sire; but what man knew his sire? There was much in
the mode in which young Edward had been brought up, in the
influences which he was subjected to, in the example of his
father's
gloomy life; wild and uncontrolled wanderings from
boyhood
,
and the proud independence of his way of life, to from such
a character as his. He was dark and stern, and for a young man,
strangely so; but he was never thus in the presence of Eve. To
her he exhibited, as if reflected from her pure bosom, a kind and
generous and manly nature, with a mind susceptible of the finest
and most elevated sentiments, and a heart alive to every frank and
noble impulse. So Mr. Innes knew him; and so she knew him, and
loved him. And when love got deep rooted in her life, and
the darker features of his being, would suddenly unveil themselves
to her, she would not see them, but hide them with the veil of
her sweet love; and with a smile turn the night into the sunny
noon.
But we may not linger over the scenes of these days of seeming
happiness and promise. One day when Eve was past sixteen, and
Edward nineteen, Mr. Innes returned from Charleston, and Eve
flew to meet him. His face was pale, and wore a look of anxiety
mlnged with displeasure. He scarcely noticed her embrace, but
said hurriedly yet tenderly,
Has Edward Carleton been with you to day, Eve?
He is in the drawing room, finishing a landscape for me, she
answered timidly, alarmed by his look and manner.
Eve, return by the piazza to your room awhile. I would speak
with him alone.
Trembling she knew not why, and foreboding some evil, the
maiden obeyed. Mr. Innes walked into the drawing-room through
one of the open lawn-windows and approaching the young
man, who was engaged in finishing a painting by Eve from a
sketch of his own, said haughtily and sternly, for he was a
noble
,
gentlemanly looking man, and a proud stern air became him.
Mr. Carleton, I desire that from this day your visits to my
house cease.
Edward had turned round on hearing his step, and laid aside
his pencil. He now rose to his full height, a tall, dark handsome
youth, or rather a young man, and flashing back a haughty glance
demanded what he meant by such an address to him.
I have heard that your father, sir, was a Slave-stealer; and
that his fortune was accumulated by this atrocious trade.
'Tis false! cried Edward fiercely, his temples burning with
the blood of shame and anger.
Nay 'tis true, young man. I hold the proof. But this I should
less heed, though the parent's stain must affix to the son in every
society. But there is a charge against yourself, personally, which
must forever shut my doors against you.
Name it, sir, said Edward in a quiet voicebut with an eye
like a burning lake, and a lip and cheek as white as marble.
That you are a gambler so noted, that not a black-leg in
Charleston but has your name familiarly on his tongue's end.
You have also in a fit of wrath shot one of your own slaves so
that he died. I know not how you have won for yourself such a
damning character so secretly. I could not have believed the
least of these, yet the least is greatest, but that I have the most
convincing proof. Some of my friends seeing my blindness, in
reference to your intimacy with my dear child, concerned
themselves
to get the proofs, and to day opened my eyes to my weak
folly, and then placed them in my hands.
May the infernal devils take your friends for their pains, he
said, with an eye and brow like lightning playing fiercely from a
dark cloud.
This unbridled emotion, and fierce language convinces me,
said Mr Innes with dignified resentment. There sir! and Mr
Innes pointed significantly to the door.
Carleton smiled proudly and revengfully; and slowly crossing
the room howed haughtily to Mr Innes and left the house.
Flinging
himself upon his horse, he galloped off like a whirlwind,
bearing
one within his bosom, and the plunging hoofs of his steed
were heard far down the avenue ere they were lost to the ear.
Then Mr Innes, with an expression on his countenance of deep
heart-suffering, pressed his hand to his head and sunk upon a sofa.
Eve overheard the high voice of her father, and the stern tones
of Carleton; but could distinguish nothing. Oh, what ages of
suspense were those moments. How agonizing the feelings of
evil forhoding that oppressed her heart. The quick, fiery step of
Edward as he left the house roused her; she flew to her window
to see him dashing past the window at mad speed.
Oh, God, what has occurred! she cried with anguish
inexpressible
;
and unable to endure the suspense that made her heart
seem as if a world's weight lay upon it, she hastened to the
drawing-room
The interview between father and daughter, it is not necessary
to describe. Eve was told all that her father knew, and was borne
lifeless to her chamber; and he in that painful interview learned
with grief and self-inflicted reproach, the pure, deep faithful
attachment
of his beloved child for the depraved young man.
Instead of an episode of one chapter, we could here make a
novel of the scenes that followed the expulsion of Edward
Carleton
from the mansion of Eve's father. That he loved her not
truly
,
is proven by the fact that he left home that very day, and sailed
from Charleston in a Spanish vessel to Havana. His wanderings,
we do not follow, nor express the crimes in which he was a
participator
.
During the first few weeks of his absence, Mr Innes
hung night and day over the couch of delirium. Eve's ravings
betrayed to him how deep and in-woven with her life-chords, was his
child's love for the outcast. At length she recovered and seemed
to forget him. She spoke not of him, indeed she spoke but little,
and seemed to live within a world of her own thoughts.
By and by grief and self-condemnation and anxiety together
preyed upon her father's health. He was first confined to the
house; than to the easy chair; then tookto his bed. His evident
danger restored all Eve's energies. She watched by him night
and day like an angel; and when after weeks of lingering disease,
he sunk to the last rest left for man, she closed his eyes and gave
in silent prayer his spirit to God.
Eve was now an orphan; and an heiress; but, by the stern
testament
of her father, penniless if she wedded with Edward
Carleton
?
thus do men make their prejudices live after them, and though
dead yet retain power aud authority binding on the living. A
female relative now came to reside with Eve who still remained in
her father's house.
In the meanwhile Mr. Carleton kept secluded as before at
Rockhead
.
If he knew of his son's attachment, and the cause of his abrupt
departure from his roof, no one was aware of it. His son had been
absent about a year, and Mr. Innes deceased nearly half that
period
,
when one of his negroes was seen riding to town at full
speed for a physician. The next day it was rumored that the
Master of Rock-head was attacked with paralysis of one side, and
that his life was in danger. The succeeding day an attorney was
seen riding very fast towards Rock-head, and the day following it
was noised abroad that the mysterious occupant of Rock-head was
no more. But we must trespass on a portion of another chapter
for the remainder of our episode.
CHAPTER V.
Three
months after the death of the proprietor of Rock-head,
and on that moonlight night with which we opened our last
chapter, Eve Innes was seated at her window looking out upon the
beautiful silvery scene of island, grove and river, which we have
described. Her cheek lay quietly in her hand, which was
supported
by the window. Her eyes looked forth upon the darkly
shining river, and the distant murmur of the cascade of Rock-head
came faintly to her ear. But her thoughts were not with the
scene. In imagination she was following Edward Carleton in his
unknown wanderings. She had not heard from him save by idle
rumor, which whispered that he had horded himself with pirates at
Cape St. Antonio; and a paragraph in the city Gazette even met
her eye, in which it was stated that a captain of a Charleston brig
had recognised him on the deck of a buccaneer's droger which
chased him, but from which he escaped. Eve sighed at all this;
but her love only grew with the rumors, and her true heart clung
to him with faith and trusting devotion. She knew that he would
return. She cherished this hope when hope seemed hopeless.
She heeded none of the rumors. She could not believe that one
whom she loved so purely and deeply could be evil! She felt her
heart's affections would never go out to an object unworthy their
high and holy character. Grief was at her heart at his absence;
and sadness lay like the soft shadow of twilight upon her spirits
that she never heard from him. How hard it is for woman to give
up hope where once her heart's truth has been bestowed! She
may weep and grieve in silence; but hope, like a star, though it
may go down at morn and leave no guide to the lifted eye, yet
rises again in the evening as bright as before:
`You may break, you may ruin the vase if you will,
But the scent of the roses will hang round it still
.
Tender were her thoughts of Carleton as Eve sat by her window
with her eye upon the water. Suddenly she became conscious of
an object moving upon the river, within the shadows of the shore.
She recalled her thoughts and watched it narrowly, and oh, with
what a beating heart! for in all that transpired around her the image
of Carleton was ever mingled. Swiftly, darkly, silently, the object
glided along the shore, and she saw that it was a long light barque,
pulled by several men. An opening of the trees let in the moon
light broadly upon them as they passed, and she discerned in the
stern a tall figure, who stood upright as she was looking. Her heart
became still with emotion. She gazed with parted lips and all her
soul was in her eyes. Again the boat was obscured, and falling
upon her knees she buried her face in her hands and prayed that
it might be he!
The barge continued its rapid way. A young man stood in
he stern urging on the six rowers in a low but earnest tone. The
moonlight again shone upon his face, and that face was Edward
Carleton's! Eve's heart had spoken truly. In a few moments,
guided by him, the boat struck the bank beneath a large oak, and
springing upon the gnarled roots and then upon the lawn, he
hurriedly
bade them neither to leave their oars nor to speak, and then
disappeared in a copse that covered a well-known by-path leading
to the villa.
Eve had lifted her head and again looked out, but the boat was
no longer visible. She listened, but the quick dip of oars no more
struck on the ear. She knew then that it had landed at the
oak. She left the window with a bounding heart, and the next
moment, guided by her impulsive love and hope, was upon the
lawn. But she had not gone three steps from the house when the
thoughtlessness and, perhaps, danger of her course occurred to
her, and she retreated to the covert of the trellised piazza, from
which, unobserved, she could discover the approach of any one
from the water. In a few moments she saw a figure obscruely in
the avenue, and as it came nearer she knew the step and form of
Edward Carleton. He came forth from the shade of the
copsewalk
and stood in the clear moonshine gazing at the house. He
was within a few yards of her and she saw his face distinctly. How
had time and passion changed it! He was taller and manlier; and
if possible, carried himself more proudly; his fine, oriental profile
was stronger and handsomer, she thought; but she shrunk at the
dark brow which seemed a throne where ruled passion and fire.
Yet as she gazed she loved. But love is woman's destiny; be the
object of her heart's affection good or evil, if she loves
she loves!
What criminal, what bandit, what man however guilty and
steeped
in crime and blood, but that some woman, even the beautiful
and true, has been found to love him, and to cling closer around
him as his fellow men cast him farther forth from their midst.
Dark and clouded with passion was the handsome face of
Edward
Carleton. But the earth has volcanoes, and its fair bosom is
disfigured and made terrible by fierce whirlwinds; yet all men love
the world remembering only its sunshine and beauty. So Eve loved
Edward Carleton. He was her heart's world, and she loved him
for her spirit's life was in him.
He stood and gazed upon the villa, and directed his glance to the
window of her boudoir, and then advanced with a quick pace
towards
it. Still unseen she followed him, oh! with what joy and
winged happiness in her step and at her heart.
He stopped near the casement and sang in a low, tender strain
the first lines of a well remembered serenade they had often sang
together, and which he had composed:
CALAVIER.
Oh come to the lattice, maiden,
Thy lover bids thee wake;
Open thy lattice, maiden,
And look upon the lake!
Look forth upon the waters bright,
Tell what thou dost behold!
With wings of snow and streamers light,
And breast of shining gold!
He paused and listened. A voice in reply came from the
shrubbery
by his side. It was like a singing bird, gifted with
articulation
.
It was tremblingly full of joy, and running over like a
bubbling
fountain. And the words in truth gushed forth from her
overrunning heart:
MAIDEN.
From my lattice, cavalier,
I look upon the lake;
I see a gondolier
Its shining waters break!
I see a bark with wings like snow,
With streamers on the air,
Like gold all bright its shining prow;
Ne'er saw I sight so fair!
He started and looked round at the sound of the voice; and as
it sunk trembling with love and the excitement of the moment,
he continued in the words of the song, but in a more passionate
strain:
CAVALIER.
That bark so fair with wings of snow
And streamers on the air,
And prow all bright with burnished gold,
Awaits thee maiden fair!
He then went on in a tender earnest voice, applying the
remainder
of the song to her:
Oh list, fair Eve, my light, my love,
Say wilt thou go with me,
And by my side the green land rove,
And sail the summer sea?
He approached the spot whence her voice had proceeded, and
where, by the agitation of the foliage, he knew she was concealed.
As he advanced she repeated with such a deep intonation of love
and joy that his bosom was filled with the sweet assurance of her
unchanging affection,
Thy
true heart is my only bark
,
Thy love my summer's sea!
She could proceed no farther. Her heart dissolved in her song;
her voice was drowned in bliss! She was in Carleton's arms
closely
clasped to his heart. Loved he then that true and trusting girl?
He thought then that he did; and proud in her lasting faith and
devotion, he felt grateful and happy, for she had always made
him happy. In his wanderings, to think of her was happiness, and
now, hearing of the death of Mr. Innes and of his father, he
returned
to see if she still loved him above all the prejudices of mankind.
He had learned privately in Charleston, where he arrived the day
before as passenger, that she was still at her father's abode, and
unwedded, though many a wooer had sought her hand. Yes, Eve
had been wooed by many a youth, but she refused them all.
Among her most pressing suitors was the attorney who had been
sent for to make Mr. Carleton's will. But every body knew that
she was in secret pining with her love for Carleton; and no one
mentioned his name in her presence. So Carleton took a boat and
by night ascended the river. We have seen the meeting with
Eve.
We must now hasten to the conclusion of our episode. An
hour of sweet happiness to Eve passed, and she had pledged
herself to be his, and he had sworn to wed her when she should
name the day, which he wished should be an early one. He
then left her, and returning to his boat pulled his way
stealthily
along the banks to Rock-Head. He soon reached the
landing
at the foot of the rock, and bidding his men secure the boat
and follow him, he climbed the well-known path to the
chateau
.
He found the postern leading to the river closed and
locked. He passed round the garden wall and reached the front
of the mansion. Stern, dark and silent it stood amid the pines and
cypresses that grew around. The solemn repose broken only by
the roar of the cascade, affected his mind. His father's shade
seemed to look angrily upon him from the window of his chamber.
He approached suddenly the main entrance, and found the door
ajar. He entered and ascended with a rapid, familiar tread to the
terrace-like hall in the centre of the building. The moonlight
streamed in through the windows and was his only lamp. He
stopped in the midst and looked around. Half-seen, dim portraits
glanced on him from the walls; the furniture remained where it
had ever stood; all seemed unchanged! He passed on to a door
at the upper end and opened it. To his surprise a light dimly
burned within, and an old African slave lay by it asleep upon a cot.
He recognised him as the old porter, and awoke him. From him he
learned the particulars of his father's illness and death, and that he
had been left there by the lawyer to take care of the place until he
came, letters having been despatched to him to every port in the
West Indies. The negro further added that the lawyer wanted to
be informed whenever he made his appearance.
Made he any will, Peter? asked the young man after
listening
to the slave's narrative.
Yes, massa Shorge, de 'torney hab him safe.
I thought so, murmured the young man sternly. I knew
he would make a will and disinherit me? But we will see!
The next day the attorney was sent for, and at night made his
appearance. The interval Carleton had passed with Eve, secretly
going and returning. But with all his caution, being desirous to
have his return unknown until he knew how men regarded him, it
was in a few hours known in the whole neighborhood that the heir
of Rock-head had made his appearance after his long absence on
the seas.
And such was the tenor of his will? sternly demanded
Carleton
of the attonrey after a few brief words of conversation.
Yes, answered the man of law cooly; if you marry, Eve,
the daughter of the late Mr. Innes, you are disinherited.
Carelton curled his lip haughtily and turned and walked the
room a few paces, and then came back to the attorney who was
busy opening and unsealing an envelope. You are a long time,
Mr. Attorney, in getting at this will, he said impatiently.
I sealed and endorsed better to keep it, Mr. Carleton, not
knowing
when you might return! There it is, sir. You can read it
for yourself, or I will.
I choose to read it, answered Edward shortly, tearing it open.
I forgot to give you this sealed letter that accompanies it!
'Twas given me by your father to be placed in your hand.
The
will
first, answered Carleton impatient at the interruption;
for he had already began to peruse it.
The lawyer looked at him with wonder and retaining the letter
watched his countenance in silence.
So! this is then the condition on which I am to inherit my
father's wealth? he said musingly. Well, be it so, he added
in a half-tone; Eve is fair and I love her; yet singing birds are
in every grove; but such estates come not, at a man's beckoning.
But what is this? A codicil? Let me read:
If my son, Geo. Edward, aforesaid, shall bind himself to
comply
with the condition of the above will, then the property real
and personal named therein, shall, at the expiration of seven years,
after such bond given, be placed in his possession, the interest
thereon in the meanwhile to be paid to him annually. (Thus I
punish him for his filial disobedience.) If at the expiration of the
seven years he shall wed the said Eve Innes, then shall the property
real and personal above named and scheduled, be given to the
Society
for Colonizing Liberated Africans. My son, the said Geo.
Edward being now absent and forgetful of his duty, the interest
that may accumulate for the time (not exceeding two years) that
he shall remain away, shall be forfeited by him and shall go to the
husband of Eve Innes, if she be wedded within the two years.
The heir's brows met and darkened as he perused the codicil.
Well this is a precious document, Mr. Attorney! What if I
choose to comply with the conditions of the will?
I am in that case instructed to convey to you the titles to the
real and personal estate, which titles are now filed in the Orphan's
Court. The property besides Rook-wood, which is worth twenty
thousand, consists in bank stock of New York banks, Mr.
Carleton
:
your father being wise, invested all his wealth in that way
some years ago.
What is the probable value of the property? asked Edward.
Not less than one hundred and eighty thousand dollars. Few
young ladies, Mr. Carleton, smiled and said the lawyer, are
worth that these times. Miss Innes is very pretty and
You may spare any further allusion to the lady in question, Mr.
Attorney; said Carleton haughtily.
The Attorney stared and was silent.
The next day Edward Carleton made his appearance before the
Probate Judge and entered into a bond, pledging himself to the
negative condition named in the will. The Court then gave him
the necessary power to command the interest for seven years.
And what has become of the interest, some two thousand
dollars
,
accumulated the last three months, he demanded haughtily.
In the possession of the Attorney, who drew up the will of
your father and who is also its executor, answered the Judge
The object for which it is to be appropriated is named in the
codicil
.
If at the expiration of two years
Yes, you need not explain, interrupted Carleton impatiently.
Curses light on my father; he muttered as he left the Court.
What could have been the motive of his hostility to Eve?
This interrogation was overheard by the Attorney, who
accompanied
him from the Court. If you will read the letter which
your father desired me to hand to you, it will probably throw some
light upon it! said the executor; and again he handed it to him.
He took it, thrust it into his pocket, vaulted into his saddle and
galloped at full speed back to Rock-head followed by the Attorney
at a less adventurous pace. In his own room Edward broke the
seal of his father's letter. As he read it he paced the room like a
mad-man.
My son
,
I am now near my endbut, as I believe death to be an
everlasting sleep, I feel no alarm. The grave is rest. I envy the
clod and the rock which are dead and feel not; and rejoice that
I shall soon be their fellow! But I would say a word to you before
I am annihilated. I wish you to know what you are ignorant of
respecting me. I am an Englishman descended of a noble family.
My grand-father was an Earl, my mother a Countess. A
step-mother
made my parental roof a hell, and at the age of sixteen I fled
from it. I shipped as a common seaman; and having a naturedly
vicious turn, (I conceal nothing now) I soon contracted the worst
vices. In my twentieth year, enraged by a blow inflicted by the
Captain, Iconspired, and heading a mutiny took possession of the
brig, killing the Captain with my own hands and so wiping out the
foul stain he had blackened me with. We steered for the coast
of Africa; and, tempted by the great wealth realized by
slave-stealing
,
we engaged in the traffic and took a cargo to the West Indies.
The immense returns by the way of profit, with the absence of all
principle, led me to engage in it for a long period, till at length,
after several years, my name was known throughout the West
Indies
and inspired terror all along the African coast. The wealth
I accumulated was enormous; and the guilt with which it was
obtained
was equally vast. But what is guilt but a name? The
grave hides alike evil and good: at least this is my belief, and at
this hour it is a consoling one. If there were a God I know
there would be a hell for me. But my conscience is calm and
gives me no warning of a hereafter; and so I die without fear. A
peaceful state, my son!
But I must be brief. Satiated with wealth I quit the traffic;
and, building a costly and swift sailing yacht, I cruised for
pleasure
many months in the Mediterrancam, visiting every port, and
every where received as a private gentleman. At Syracuse as I
was on the eve of sailing, I gave a colation to a select party on
board my vessel. Among the guests was an American gentleman
and his daughter. I need not describe her. She was perfectly
lovely. Eve Innes (for I have seen her
once
) is her counterpart.
I fell in love with her at a glance and delayed my departure for
weeks to woo and win her. I offered her my hand and was
rejected
!
Fierce and uncontrolable by nature, I was maddened and
demanded the reason of her refusal. She was, at first, silent but
at length pleaded her ignorace of me! Fool that I was! I
believed
she was attached to me and would have become mine; but the
truth she concealed. She was already betrothed. This I learned
by accident. I met her again at a ball and accused her of
duplicity
.
She treated me with insulting coolness; and haughtily
taking
the arm of a gentleman near her, left me. That gentleman
was her betrothed. Need I say it was Mr. Innes, then a young
gentleman on his travels? I sought him out, and picked a quarrel
with him. We met with small swords and I was disarmed The
next day I sailed. The week following they were married. I
heard of it at Naples. Settled gloom then took possession of me.
I traversed Asia and half India to banish the image of Eve Evelyn
(such was her name) from my mind. A year passed away, and in
Beyroot I met with a beautiful Jewish maiden. I was sick and she
nursed me till gratitude grew into love when I married her. She
possessed every grace and charm and gentle virtue of her sex. I
learned to adore her. You were the fruit of that blissful union
In giving you birth she died. I cursed my evil destiny; and,
leaving you with her relatives, I again became a wanderer. I
visited
Charleston in disguise, witnessed the happiness of Eve
Evelyn
in her own home; but she knew me not. I determined to
crush her happiness. She had two lovely sons and (shall I conceal
the truth?) they pined and died one after the other! I poisoned
them secretly and slowly! I felt a fiendish joy in seeing her
tears and in witnessing her anguish. At length I returned to
Beyroot
and found you a handsome boy of four years. I was
suddenly haunted with the fear that you would be poisoned and I
took you with me. Five years we wandered together, and at length
led by, I knew not what secret motive, I resolved to live near
Eve! I purchased this property and came hither. In the place
of her two boys she had a daughter. It was an infant of three
years. I beheld her in her home, when she knew it not. I stole
thither by nightand saw she wept over it and was not happy. So
I would not take it away from her lest she should smile again; and
I let it live. The child grew; and when it was six years of age,
I met it with its mother. They had wandered along the green
shores gathering flowers and were near the cascade! I came
suddenly
upon them! I took up the child! I was tempted to toss it
into the caldron of boiling foam amid the rocks, but it smiled on me
and looked so like its mother when first I saw and loved her, (for
now I hated her) that, instead, I kissed it and set it down. The
mother gazed on me; I knew she was searching memory! I was
willing she should know
who
stood before her and I turned a full
and expressive gaze upon her face; she met my glance and turned
deadly pale.
What would you here? she said hoarsely.
The bliss of being near you, Eve, I answered, ironically yet
haughtily.
You can mean no good.
No. I mean evil; I loved you when I thought you might have
been mine
I hate you, another's!
'Twas rumored in Syracuse, he was a pirate, she said
thinking
aloud.
Yes, lady, I was a pirateif you will; I am now the foe of
thyself
and thine.
She caught her child trembllng to her heart.
Nay fear not; it bears to much thine image when first I saw
thee. Thou hast lost two boys?
Yes, she gasped rather than spoke.
I poisoned them! said I approaching her and whispering close
her appalled ear.
!
she shrieked. I thought she would have sunk to the
earth with horror, while her beautiful eyes blazed upon me, like
those of a leopardess robbed of its young. I was awed for a mo
ment.
Yes.
I
lady! But fear not for this flower. I hate it, being
thine husband's. But I will harm it not, at least, while I see not
on her face thy scornful parting look.
Thou fiend! Thou shalt be  she could say no more;
but, overpowered, fell insensible upon the sward. I bore her to
the water and revived her; and then suddenly left her, satisfied
with the result. She knew not whence I come or whither I went;
for
no one had seen me, so secluded was my life. She reached
home, but spoke not after that hour. In three weeks she was
placed in the grave; and so I had my revenge!
No
not wholly;
I watched the young flower she had left to grow on earth. I
watched, unseen, her expanding loveliness, and only waited, when
there seemed most happiness garnered up in her father's bosom, to
crush it. But she grew up from spring to spring, even with that
gentle look of her mother's I love to recal; and I could never
make up my mind to destroy her. I saw your growing intimacy,
and in my heart resolved to make you in some way the instrument
of my hatred. But time passed on. She reached her sixteenth
year, and I saw that you
loved her!
Then all my hatred to her
blood returned, and I determined ere mine (dark and stained as it
was) should mingle in one stream with it
she should perish!
I had
formed my plan and the mode, and the hour was fixed by me,
when you left a note on your table saying that you had been insulted
by Mr. Innes and should leave the country. Your departure
saved her life. Now, I am near death! she yet lives, and I feel
no disposition to destroy her. But the curse of a father be upon
you, if you should return and
wed her!
My Will will express in
stronger terms my feeling on this subject. Curses rest upon your
head and upon the heads of your offspring, should you ever take
he daughter of Eve Evelyn to wife. Thy mistress she
may
be!
thy wife
never
, save with a father's curse!
When Edward Carleton had finished the perusal of this
extraordinary
confession, he crushed the manuscript in his hand and
stood a few moments with a stern brow and rigid look. At length
he spake:
Yes, I am fit son for such a father! Curse his memory and his
name! What care I for such a father's curse! Let his memory
perish with him. This then is the secret of the condition annexed
to my inheritance; of thy long-rankling hate! disappointed passion
and the scornful treatment and marriage of his lady-love. And
he would have murdered Eve. God's malediction light on him!
My mistress! Never! I am not yet his peer in guilt, if his guilty
blood does flow in my veins. Eve is pure and for me she shall
remain
pure. I am half determined to wed her, in revenge upon
foul wishes. But, no; this may not be; and I cannot give he
up. She is dear and precious to me, but my inheritance is more
so. But I will be guided by events with reference to Eve. She
is a lovely and glorious gem, for any man to wear on his bosom
Would to Heaven I could make her my wife. But this may not
be. I am beggared by my losses in the capture of our brigantine
by that British Cruiser, and must needs have money. And this I
have. Eight thousand dollars is a pretty income, but will
scarcely purchase me a new vessel. But I will wait my time;
remain
here and watch events and be guided by the result.
The heir of Rock-Head remained at home a few weeks, most of
which time was passed in the society of Eve. He spoke not of
their union, nor did she. She was happy in loving him, and
having
him near her, and in believing that he loved her. At length
Carleton's proud spirit was chafed by slights received from
neighboring gentlemen with whom, with the reckless purpose of
ascertaining their opinion of him, he mingled on the turf and in
town. But though a few unprincipled young men bore his society
for his money, he found himself a general object of suspicion and
dislike. At length, fired by an insult, he challenged his man, who
refused to fight, adding the epithets pirate and slaver.' Carlton
drew a dagger and struck him to the heart. He fled without a
parting interview with Eve. Weeks passed away, and at length she
learned that he was in New York. The intelligence conveyed to
her drooping heart new life. For though he had dyed his hand in
blood, she forgave him, for she loved him.
Suddenly she departed from home, no one knew whither.
Rumor
had it, that Carleton had come secretly by night and stolen
her away. He
had
come secretly by night, but not stolen her
away. She voluntarily fled with him. She had written him at
New York, and received a reply full of tenderness and expressions
of passion. But in it he lamented that fate and fortune forbade
their union. She supposing that he alluded to her own loss of
fortune in case she wedded him, according to her father's will
wrote him she cared not for the sacrifice of all her inheritance, so
she possessed her heart's world. Having thee, Edward, she
wrote, I have wealth and honor, and covet nothing. Assured Assured
your continued affection, I should be happy in a hovel. Seperated
from you I should be wretched in a palace. But I fear you pause
at the idea of wedding one, who wedded to you will truly become
penniless.
I must marry Eve! said Carleton as he perused her letter; I
see my happiness depends on having her with me. She is a
charming
sweet being, any one would be proud of. She loves me and
may be of infinite service to me. I need a faithful friend; I will
wed her secretly. She is too pure to be won otherwise, and I
cannot think of her, my friend from boyhood, in the light of a
mistress. I will make her my wife. The marriage shall be kept
secret till I can afford to do without my father's wealth. Eve, I
will make thee happy.
Carleton was then in New York, secretly organizing a crew for
new adventures. He had met with Morris Grme, the expelled
Cambridge Student, at a gaming table, and struck with his bold
and reckless character as well as with his intelligence, he one
night took advantage of his losses and drew him into the
organization
.
When he had completed his crew, he appointed a
rendezvous
at Baltimore, where he heard a beautiful clipper schooner
had just been built for a Revenue Cutter, and was to proceed,
lightly
manned, to the coast of Maine, there to be stationed. He met
his men under Morris Grme's charge at the place appointed,
and that night, the day before she was to sail, the schooner was
secretly boarded and put to sea. Carleton steered for Charleston,
and running into the harbor at night was landed in a boat, and
the schooner stood off and on awaiting his return. Three hours
after, Eve was seated by his side on the way down the river. They
reached Charleston at midnight, and Carleton conducted her to
a justice who was in waiting for them. Without asking any
questions
,
but merely taking their christened names, he united them.
Though thickly veiled (at Carleton's request,) and unknown to
him, Eve recognized through her veil the justice whom she had
often seen at her father's, and knew, if she had such a doubt, that
she was a lawfully wedded wife. In two hours afterwards
Carleton
was once more on the deck of his schooner with Eve by his
side.
That very day of happiness and love, Carleton persuaded her
to take a vow, not to reveal to mortal man their marriage. What
could she refuse Carleton? She believed he required the oath for
the preservation of her own fortune, for of his father's will she
knew nothing. She took the oath as he wished; but, young and
thoughtless, and blinded by love, she did not think of, or foresee
the painful and degrading consequences to herself. She first
learned them some time afterwards from Morris Grme's
addresses
,
and saw too late her folly and her crime. Once she begged
Carleton to remove from her name the dishonor which he now had
attached to it. But he laughed and turned her aside, and so let it
pass. Again she would have spoken to him, after Morris's insult,
but the stern displeasure of his countenance checked her, and she
became silent.
The reader of the Dancing Feather is already familiar with
the subsequent career of Carleton's schooner, to which Eve had
given this fanciful name from her grace and lightness upon the
waves. After the loss of his schooner, which was seized by a
Revenue
Cutter and sold, as already stated. Carleton lodged privately
on shore under an assumed name, and in lavish style of living.
Eve, though his wife, passed as his mistress, and more than once
was she reminded of it by his unprincipled friends. But she loved
Carleton too much to complain; and, so that he occasionally
smiled upon her and spoke affectionately, she was passive in her
degradation Morris Grme, his Lieutenant, in the meanwhile
was retained in a sort of half-pay by Carleton, who also furnished
him with money to keep at command several of his best men.
Morris, also, supported himself and a mistress by gambling. Both
he had Carleton kept very secret, and careful not to be suspected
of ever having been connected with the Dancing Feather.
But Carleton's secret was at length betrayed; and learning that
he was to be arrested, he resolved to make some attempt the same
night to put to sea. He went along the shore of the East River to
take note of the craft, and see what one anchored alone might be
cut out. Approaching the vicinity of Colonel Powel's residence,
he saw the masts of the Dancing Feather above the wooded
headland
,
and at once recognized her. He then, as we have saw, met
Blanche Hillary. His passionate and self-condemning address to
her, was for the purpose of an appeal to her feelings, aware that
her prejudice must be against him; for he felt that he could never
be happy but with her love. He had but twice met Blanche; but
love once deeply planted in his fiery breast, needed only to be
watered with the dew of fond and ever living memories. In the
light of
her
sun, the star of Eve's happiness was destined slowly
to set. Eve had long felt his coldness, but knew not its cause.
This was at length revealed to her mind by jealousy, in their
interview in the cabin, from which we have so long absented
ourselves to glance behind the curtain at Scenes of the Past,
that we fear the reader has quite forgotten that he was present at
it. We now resume our narration proper, where we suspended it,
to recur to the former life of our chief characters.
CHAPTER VI.
The scenes described in the two foregoing chapters, formed the
subject of Carleton's painful and self-convicting meditation, as
he stood by the couch, and silently gazed upon the marble-like
form of the stricken and faithful Eve. At length, alarmed, for he
did not wish her deadand to die thus; he proceded to restore
her to consciousness. But she had lain there so long in the image
of death, that it was sometime before she showed signs of
returning
animation. Slowly, and at intervals so long, that it seemed
she would never again breathe, her bosom heaved with life. He
knelt by her and pressed his lip to hers, and breathed upon her
mouth as if he would give her life. He felt anxious and deeply
solicitous; for though be loved her not, his better nature was
interested
in her; and as she lay there, he internally made the
resolution
,
that henceforward, so she came not between him and his
hopes of Blanche Hillary, he would treat her with gentleness, and
gratify her with the form of affection. These kindlier feelings at
once took possession of his breast, doubtless awakened by the ret
rospect of the youthful and boyish past, when together they
sailed, and fished, and rambled, sang, sketched, and rode together;
like brother and sister never severed, but in all pastime ever
united. And these purer memories, with the reflection of what a
vast sacrifice she was daily making for her love's sake, gave a
tenderness to his manner and voice, as he bent over her and softly
whispered her name.
The change was instant and surprising. Her heart felt the thrill
to its centre, and bounding with new life, sent the blood like
lightning
into the pale cheek. Her eyes opened, and met his beaming
upon her with seeming love and tender interest, and smiling with
unutterable love and gratitude, she caught his hand from her
throbing
heart and pressed it passionately to her lips. One word,
spoken
in tenderness, had restored her to life. She lay still unable to
rise, with her eyes elevated to his face: and eyes more beautiful
and full of affection, nay, and bright tears too; were never the
messengers of a heart. Carleton read in them the deathless love
of her being. He was touched, and bending over her, he lifted
her from the couch and pressed her to his heart. What a happy
moment was this for the wife. Jealousy, suspicion, pride, all were
forgotten. Edward loved her; and in the sweet consciousness of
this knowledge, she knew nothing beyond it.
Forgive me, Edward, she said when able to speak; I have
deeply wronged you.
Care not for it, dear Eve. It was thy strong love, and can I
be hurt at any proof of thy devotion.
Yet'tis like a dream: would to God it were!yet you have
told me you loved me not. But this is false, and thou didst
deceive
thy own heart. I know thou didst, Edward.
Yes, Eve! he said with a degree of hesitation.
I know thou lovest me, and besides me no one Edward. In
this sweet assurance I am happy. Go now; Morris Grme has
twice called you from the deck. One look, and smile to re-assure my
heart. Thanks, dear Edward; Nay I ask not a kiss! Now am I
happy.
Carleton left her, strangely and painfully oppressed with the
sense of the wrong he was doing her, and returned to the deck
from which he had been so long absent. The moon still reigned
with silvery sceptre over shore and sea, and the sparkling waves
danced in her light on every side. The schooner was slipping
along through the water, at the rate of seven and a half knots,
with every drawing sail set alow and aloft. Carleton on putting
his foot on deck, glanced aloft at the clouds of snowy-canvass, and
then his eye fell on the brigantine, which was sailing not two
hundred fathoms from the schooner square abeam.
Is that the brig that was ahead, when I went below, Morris?
he asked, after a moment's survey.
Yes; and for this I called you. I have been examining her
closely with the glass, and find enough on deck as well as in her
hull and spars, to make me suspicious of her. When she found,
about an hour ago, that we were creeping up to her, and were
likely to overhaul and pass her, she set her studden-sail and would
have run away from us, but for our increase of canvass. You
see I have got the schooner under all she can handle with this
stern breeze, and yet the brig is abeam, and has held her position
the last twenty minutes.
The glass, if you please. There is but one vessel that can sail
with the Dancing Feather, said Carleton, putting the spy-glass
to his eye. After looking at her a moment, he added in a low,
impressive
tone of voice, peculiar to him when much moved, and
that is the craft. She run away from me when I was in my
Spanish
schooner in the West Indies, though that little Sea-Slipper, as
I called her, sailed nearly as well as the Dancing Feather. By
the by, Morris, I have decided to re-christen the schooner. The
Dancing Feather for good reasons known to both of us, must give
place to another. And as I am bound to the West Indies (when I
can get guns aboard) I shall give her the name of my pretty
Spanish
craft, which that John Bull cruiser captured; leaving me and
my men, barely time to escape in our boats through the Lagoons.
Success to the Sea-Slipper then, said Morris Grme; it will
be a fine daring of your old cruising enemy John Bull, to
re-appear
again on his cruising ground, with the Sea-Slipper revived.
And if we meet a second time, it will be his last cruise, said
Carleton fiercely. This brigantine is a pleasure yacht, hailing
from Baltimore I cant be mistaken in her. She was once a
square-rigged, and perhaps has been dismasted and altered aft to a
schooner rig.
I would be sworn to her Captain, said Red Fred, who having
just struck four bells and been relieved at the wheel, was passing
forward; was'nt she in the Havanna two years ago last month,
and made a sort of city show for the Spanish?
She is the same, Fred, said Carleton, with the glass still at
his eye, evidently taking a very close scrutiny of the stranger. I
was on board of her, Morris, then and made up my mind to have
her. I had the Sea-Slipper lying there in a creek, on the south
side of the island, and ascertaining the day in which the vessel
Did'nt they call her The Lancet, said Fred, who still
lingered
in the waist.
The Lance, you mean, Fred. It is the same craft, without
question. Learning when she was to put to sea, I was off
Havanna
,
waiting for and giving her a good offing, I gave chase,
expecting to come up with her in my own way, and my own time;
but I reckoned without my host. Soon as her skipper found what
I was after, he just walked away from me, as if I had been a
fruitdroger
.
I then put the Sea-Slipper to her best paces, and gained
what I had lost. We had been running hitherto with the wind
aft. It was a stern chase. But he, finding my studden-sails did
me so much better service than his own, and doubtless well aware
of his best sailing points, suddenly took in his starboard
studden-sails
and hauled on the wind, set his stay-sails fore and aft, and
his three jibs (which you see he has now,) and with the wind four
points free, she went off on the wind with as light a pair of heels
as the devil would put upon a thief. By sun-down she was hull
down and I gave up the chase.
The Sea-Slipper was not a fast sailor, Carleton, or the chase
would not have run away from you in that style, said Grme
See we hold with her now, and, by Heaven, are slipping a half
point ahead. She could'nt compare with this schooner.
She was in bad trim at the time, and not well manned.
Besides
her best point of sailing was with the wind nearly dead aft.
If the brig had not discovered this, and kept on before the wind,
I should have overhauled her. But
this
Sea-Slipper, Grme, shall
atone for the fault of her name-sake. She, like the brig, sails best
on a wind. That fellow must know me. But, infernal devils! we
are without a gun.
He carries two, said Morris significantly. But if he would
only wait a week for us, we could show him a little sport.
What do you mean? asked Carleton earnestly.
There is an old fort near the mouth of the Kennebec river in
Maine, (not thirty hours run from here,) which is nearly
dismantled
.
It is not far from my place of nativity, and in boyhood I
often visited it. It was then occupied by a few soldiers, the war
having just ended. I was at the place again three months since,
having secretly re-visited my native village, hearing my father
was ill. It was then quite deserted, but there were in the
embrasures
four excellent guns, the carriages in tolerable repair; for I
examined them with the probability of being some day in want of
them. The fort stands elevated, but a vessel can anchor in deep
water under it, and the guns can be removed without difficulty.
They will answer our purpose until we can capture more suitable
ones.
This is well conceived, Morris, for I confess I had come to no
definite purpose. But the amunition?
There are two pyramids of balls in the fort; and two leagues
further up the river, is the town of Bath near which in a retired
spot stands a powder-house. From this we can remove what we
require.
Well planned, Morris, exclaimed Carleton with animation.
It shall at once be put into execution, and as you have been so
clever as to conceive it, you shall carry it into execution. The
active
command of the schooner, I resign into your hands till this
enterprise is carried through. We are slipping past the brig as
you said, Morris. At the wheel, there. Let her fall of a point;
steady! With the wind a point more on our quarter, we will
improve
our advantage.
The brig has fallen of as we have, said Morris. She
evidently
is governing her motion by our own.
The two vessels now sailed along very near each other with all
sails set, and presenting a beautiful sight. Symmetry and motion
combined, are ever beautiful to the eye; and two more graceful
vessels never danced over a moonlit sea. Carleton and Grme
stood a few moments silently admiring the freedom and grace of
the brigantine as she cleaved the snowytrack with her
spray-glittering
bows; her tall masts clothed with shining canvass from
the water to the truck, towering into the deep blue sky: and her
flashing wake streaming like a meteor far astern. And to the
eyes of those on the deck of the brigantine, the schooner
presented
an equally beautiful appearance.
I will know something more of this craft, and see what her
business is up the Sound. It
is
the Lance, for this insignia is
now glittering in the beams of the moon, at her foremast head,
he said, directing his glance aloft, where the moon-light suddenly
revealed a long glittering lance of silvery appearance affixed to
the royal-mast-head.
Her Captain, then, if Red Fred be right, is the owner; and is
a naval officer on leave, said Morris.
I will make his acquaintance. I saw him once in a cafe in
Havannaa handsome, gallant looking, sailor-like person; and I
have reason to know him to be a good seaman. I will breakfast
with him.
He may compel you to dine, then, said Morris laughing, but
with a meaning in his words that his commander understood
We have no guns.
He cannot suspect us. Our having no guns will be in my
favor
,
as I intend to pass ourselves upon him for a yacht. We are
no more nor less now Morris, God knows to our sorrow; he said
smiling.
We shall be something more ere three days, if we run at one
for the Kennebec.
That we shall dobut I would like to learn something of the
probable whereabouts of this sporting craft, three days hence. I
have no wish to capture her save for her guns and small arms. I
would not give the schooner for two of her. She is too large for
our sport, Grme. But I should like to capture her in a fair
chase, to wipe off the old failure. I would then be willing to
present
her back to her Captain, if he proves a fine fellow, with my
best wishes for a pleasant cruise. Morris, call the men aft to the
sheets and braces. I am going to put her away two points more,
and see if I can't shoot ahead and go across his fore-foot.
The young Lieutenant of the Sea-Slipper at once gave the
necessary
orders and the schooner was steered in a course which
gradually drew her nigher the brig, which she would soon have
fallen astern of and crossed her wake, if her own speed
proved
not to be increased by this alteration. But the advantage of
this slight change in her course was soon apparent. While she
approached the brigantine she worked perceptibly ahead of her,
and sailed clearly a knot faster on a free bow-line than with both
the sheets aft. Carleton stood leaning over the bulwarks
looking
at the brig with a proud expression of triumph in his dark
eyes, while Morris watched closely the sails and helmsman, that
no advantage might be lost. The brig still kept on her course, the
two lines of direction forming an angle, the brig sailing along the
line parallell with the horizon and the schooner approaching
obliquily
.
As they heard each other, Caleton closed his glass and
handed it to the boy who had volunteered to act as steward, and
jumping into the main rigging, he stood upon the bulwarks with
one foot upon a rattling watching her decks.
How steadily we work ahead on her course said Morris,
glancing
over the side of the brig which they were fast approaching.
She is resolved not to alter her steerage half-a-point.
Then we shall make acquaintance with her pencil-like,
flying-jib-boom
end, said Carleton. My trumpet here, boy!
The trumpet was promptly placed in his hand by the lad and
Carleton took an attitude for hailing the stranger who was now on
his starboard bow not fifty fathoms distance. The two vessels
were rapidly nearing each other at the bows and it was a nice
question
which should shoot ahead of the other; as they sailed they
promised to come in collision, the bow-sprit of the Sea-Slipper
pointing directly at the figure-head of the brig. But the schooner
was moving fastest through the water and might shoot ahead and
clear of the brig. But it was doubtful; Carleton and Grme both
saw their true position but were confidant of passing safely ahead
of her.
It was evident that their manuvre was watched with no little
interest from the brig. Two persons were on her quarter-deck,
one with a glass in his hand the other with a silver trumpet that
gleamed at every motion of his hand in the bright moonshine. It
was the sight of his trumpet that led Carleton to call for his own.
Swiftly and gracefully like two fair knights prancing towards
each other with snowy plumes nodding in the breeze, the two
vessels
came dancing on, neither deviating from its original course.
The dark tall pyramid of sails on the brig's fore-mast already rose
between Carleton and the moon, casting their shadow upon his
quarter-deck; and the ripple and gurgling of the water agitated by
the brig's motion through it mingled with the sound of the
spray-dash
about the schooner's bows.
We are in no condition to lose a spar, Carleton, or suffer damage
in the hull, said Morris. Shall I bring her to the wind a couple
of points? We are sure to be foul of her or have her bowsprit run
between our masts!
Carleton made no reply, save a dark proud smile, and seemed to
watch intently the deck of the other, Morris turned on his hee
muttering,
This is fool-hardy! If we get damaged I can never carry out
my plan of getting the guns from the old Kennebec Fort. His
further thoughts were interrupted by a loud, stern hail from the
brig. While his weather-bow port flew open and a gun was run
out.
Schooner ahoy!
Aye, aye! answered Carleton in a clear manly tone not
making
use of his trumpet.
What the devil do you mean by coming athwart my vessel in
this buccaneer style Luff, or by Gd I'll fire into you!
Steady as you are; cried Carleton coolly turning to the
helmsman
:
then answering the other he said, with a provoking
indifference
,
When I give my helmsman my orders I never interfere with
him. He is steering his proper course. I should be sorry to run
nto you, and equally regret to have you fire into me. But
I never change the course of my vessel at the dictation of any man.
The sea is free for all who rove it.
There was just a probability that the schooner would forge
ahead clear; but the chances were more probable for a collision.
If she fell off from her course the breath of a bowline, contact was
inevitable. Still they were approaching each other with a merry
rippling and dashing of the water and hastening the crisis.
He will put up his helm you may rest assured, said Carleton.
There is too much firmness in his tones for that, said Morris.
But we shall soon see.
The vessels now were not two lengths apart, and both had way
nearly seven knots.
Luff, I say; again thundered the Captain of The Lance.
Steady; cried Carleton to the man at the helm. I have
told you that I never change my vessel's course; he answered to
the fiery hail of the other. He saw that collision was inevitable
unless
one them deviated. But reekless as he was brave, he loved
the excitement and the danger; and there was besides, a pride
his preseverance for that very vessel had once humbled
his pride. In his heart he resolved to risk the safety of his vessel
rather than yield an inch to that craft. The captain of the other
could have had no such motives, but kept his vessel undeviatingly
on her course due east. Silently they approached the point of
collision
,
when all at once, a bright flame issued from the bow port of
the brig; bang thundered the gun, and the ball buried itself with
a shock that made the schooner lurch and reel, deep into the
main-mast
,
just above the rack of capstain bars. The next instant amid
the rolling smoke there was heard a loud crashing and shivering
of splinters, mingled with the curses of men, and the schooner shot
ahead out of the confusion, dragging with her the flying jib and
jib-boom of the brig, carrying away her top-mast studden-sail
dangling at the end of her top-sail yard, and losing her own
stern-boat
and half the mainsail, through which the brig in heaving
ahead as the schooner crossed her bow, run the splintered head
of her bow-sprit. All this mischief was done in a moment, and
the two vessels separated and passed on without, at first, scarcely
any check to their way.
I have a mind to give you my other gun, shouted the Captain
of the brig as the schooner passed clear of the confusion; but I
see you have not escaped any better than we have Who re
you?
The Sea-Slipper, answered Carleton in a tone that sounded
like proud defiance; while he smiled at anticipating the other's
astonishment
.
The mention of this name had the effect he looked for.
They heard an exclamation of surprise and then came the voice of
the commander.
I know your colours now, my lad! I thought you had been
sunk or is there a pair of Slippers. We have met before. I will
not let you go then since such is your quality without another
card.
The starbord port in the waist was thrown open and the next
moment
the gun was discharged. The brig, however, steered awk
wardly in her crippled state, and the shot fell wide, dashing a huge
feather of spray into the moonlight far to leward.
I owe you two, said Carleton quietly, and leaping on deck
turned his attention to the state of the schooner. She already
began
to steer wildly, for she was much clogged forward by the
brig's studden-sail and spars that hung from her bow-sprit, and
felt the want of her mainsail. Morris, though vexed at what he
termed the fool-hardiness of Carleton and the equal obstinacy of
the young naval officer commanding the brig, as if they had been
two rivals meeting, gave himself with alacrity to repairing
damages
.
The wreck was cut adrift, the sail being saved, and the
injury
done was ere day-light nearly repaired. The stern-beat which
had been torn from one of the davits and left hanging by the other
was much stove; but being hoisted to its place it was left for
another
time; the schooner having two light wha le boats slung a
either quarter-bulwark.
Day had began to dawn when the schooner was got again under
her former accurate steerage way. By the time the pearly hues
of the east deepened into the blushing glory of the morningere
yet the sun emerges from beneath the horizonthe two vessels
lately in such mischeivous proximity were three leagues asunder;
the brigantine, her damages unrepaired being seen far to windward,
near the Connecticut shore, standing back towards New-York,
while the schooner was sailing easily along on a bowline, a mile from
the land, off Oyster bay. The latter vessel from her rakish
appearance
in connection with the firing that had been heard on the sound
a few hours before, was evidently an object of suspicion to the small
trading vessels, which one and all bore up as they came near, and
gave her a wide birth. But the Sea-Slipper kept on her course
indifferent to their demonstrations of fear, and at sundown
passed
,
with an eight knot breeze from the north-west, between
Fisher's
Island and the eastern extremity of Long Island, and before
midnight
she left Montauk Point on the starboard quarter, and then
stretched away like a sea-bird into the open ocean.
CHAPTER VII.
I have heard from my yacht, and she has been at her old
buccaneering
tricks again, exclaimed Colonel Powel entering his
drawing room, the second morning after the flight of his schooner
from the cove, and addressing Hayward, who was seated reading
a paragraph in a newspaper to his wife and Blanche.
And so have we, father, said Kate Heyward, who, with her
husband and friend were looking as much excited as Colonel Powel
himself.
There was a rumor in town just before I left that Captain
harry Ellis, who left port the day the yacht was spirited away,
had been run aboard by a schooner answering the description of
mine, and that he beat her off with his guns.
This is just what we were reading when you came, sir,
answered
Kate.
It must be true then, said Hayward.
I see no reason to doubt it, said Colonel Powel; but let me
hear the printed account, Blanche.
I will read it, father: Blanche looks frightened about Harry
Ellis, and her voice would tremble like a rose-leaf.
How
can
you Kate! said Blanche with a reproving glance
and blush.
Here it is, dear father: `We mentioned yesterday the sudden
disappearance of Colonel Powel's yacht, `The Sparkling Wave,'
once better known as `The Dancing Feather,' from her anchorage
opposite his villa, and that a revenue cutter had sailed in pursuit of
her. We have just received intelligence that leads us to believe
that she has fallen into the hands of her former daring commander.
It is now known that this person has been privately living in this
city, and would have been secured by the police the very night
the yacht was taken off. And the fact that he was not found by
the police at the place to which their informant guided them gives
color to the suspicion. The intelligence brought by a Capt.
Martin
of the Hartford sloop `Betty Ann' is, that about three o'clock
yesterday morning firing was heard by him and his crew on the
Sound, and at sunrise they fell in with a brigantine which hailed
her, and asked for a spar to make a flying jib-boom of. He
stated the brig reported that she had been run into by a
buccaneering
schooner with a score of men on board, and that he had fired
into her and evidently defeated an attempt to board, as the
schooner
stood on after carrying away, by the collision, some of the brig's
hamper, including her jib-booms. Not being able to supply him
Captain Martin left him, and soon after he saw the brig a
tempting
,
with her jib only, to beat back to port. If this be correct, the
schooner is, without question, the Dancing Feather revived. We
sincerely trust she may be fallen in with by the cutter, and treated
as her merits deserve. We understand Colonel Powel had full
insurance. We shall probably soon have all the particulars
from Captain Ellis, who has doubtless put back to repair damages,
in which case we shall not fail to lay them at once before our
readers.
There can be no kind of doubt now into whose hands she has
got again, said Colonel Powel. Well, ladies, we have lost our
excursion to Newport. You know something of these adventures,
Henry and you, Blanche!
The young lady started and blushed, and quickly answered,
with the consciousness of her late intercourse with Carleton, I,
Colonel Powel.
Why Blanche, said Kate, you look very guilty.
Yes, we were fellow-passengers on the Ariel, answered
Heyward
relieving her embarrassment by speaking; and one
pleasant
afternoon were boarded by the Dancing Feather. Her Captain
was a tall, dark, but exceedingly handsome man, not more than
twenty-six. They were reekless men, Captain and crew, and I
have reason to know one of his Lieutenants.
That fearful Morris Grme, said his wife.
Well it is dangerous to have them abroad upon the sea, in so
fast a vessel; but they have no guns, thank heaven, said Colonel
Powel.
These, men like them, will not be longin obtaining. I have
no doubt the motive of their attempt to board Captain Ellis was,
to possess themselves of his guns.
And he gave them to the fellows it seems in a true seaman's
style. I must see Ellis when he returns, and hear from his lips
the facts. Somebody else would like to see and welcome him too,
or I am mistaken. And he glanced significantly at Blanche,
who also catching a mischeivous look in Kate's face, got up and
went to the window to conceal her pretty confusion.
And was Captain Harry Ellis her lover? There is a pleasant
romance worth hearing here, but we can indulge in no more long
episodes at the expense of our Cruise. In a few words, Blanche
and Harry Ellis first met, when he was a Middy. He was at home in
Boston on leave; he nineteen, she fourteen, and they fell in love,
flirted, sighed and parted. He soon rose to a Lieutenancy, and then
inheriting a great estate in the South, followed his roving humor,
and getting leave cruised for two or three years, in a beautiful
and costly craft, which he had built in Baltimore. In the
meanwhile
Blanche had been met by Carleton, who became at once
deeply, passionately enamored with her; but towards him she
felt no other emotion, than a romantic interest very natural for an
imaginative girl to feel in a handsome buccaneer. After Blanche's
return to Boston, Harry Ellis again met her, and renewing his
vows of attachment, thought he found a reciprocal feeling in her
bosom, addressed her and was rejected! A few months elapsed and
she was again in New York, on a visit to Kate Powel, now
become
Kate Hayward. Harry Ellis arrived nearly at the same
time in The Lance, and being a friend of Colonel Powel's was
invited
to dine with him. Judge his surprise, on meeting in the
dining room the beautiful Blanche Hillary. She met him with a
frank kindness that led him again to cherish a hope, and after a
few weeks devotion, he renewed his suit and was accepted. This
happy issue of his manly and devoted love, occured only the week
preceding Carleton's sudden and alarming visit to her when, with
her book in her hand, and Neptune lying at her feet, he found her
seated in a rustic arm chair at the lawn's extremity, looking upon
the pleasant water. Are we surprised that she listened not to his
strong language of passion, even had his name been unstained by
guilthis heart by crime? Carleton knew not that he loved one
who was betrothed. If he had suspected itbut he did not! and
so in safety she was left by him till the time should come when he
could more favorably press his suit; for Carleton had in his mind
the half formed idea of reforming his life for the sake of winning
and wearing Blanche. His first step of reform was deserting poor
Eve!his next cutting out the Dancing Feather; in truth a
promising
beginning. But the true, yet false, notion which he
harbored
was, that Blanche loved him and might be induced even to
share his fortunes in the life he led. He formed this opinion from
Eve's great love, and the sacrifice she had made. But Eve
loved!
Blanche Hillary did not! She loved Henry Ellis, however,
perhaps
with little less devotion than Eve cherished towards Carleton.
Their marriage was settled to take place in six weeks at Boston;
and Captain Ellis had left New York the afternoon of the cutting
out of the schooner to proceed to Boston to have her refitted for
a voyage to England, whither he intended to take his bride as
soon as they were wedded. Blanche was to go with Col. Powel,
Kate, and Hayward, in the yacht as far as Newport, and pass a
few days, and thence proceed to Boston by land. We have seen
how these plans were interrupted by the daring deed of Carleton
and Morris Grme!
Blanche stood by the window, from which was a view of the
lawn and the bright river beyond, her heart trembling still with
the idea of the danger from which Harry had escaped, when those
in the room were startled by an exclamation of joyful surprise;
and ere they could ask her the cause of her excitement, she had
thrown up the sash of the long, ground window, and the next
moment was flying across the lawn towards the water.
`Ellis's brig, by the Csars!' exclaimed Colonel Powel, who
with the rest had sprung to the window.'
At once the drawing-room was deserted, and at a graver, yet
full fast, pace they pursued the course taken by Blanche, whose
light form had already disappeared in the trees of the grove which
crowned a headland over which were visible the taper masts, one
of them distinguished by the silver lance at the fore-royal-mast
head.
When Blanche reached the rocky headland she saw the brig
slowly advancing almost beneath her, the cross-trees being on a
level with the shelf of a rock. On the deck stood her betrothed
who, hearing her pronounce his name looked up and smiled, waved
and kissed his hand, and then giving an order to his helmsman the
brig came nigher the headland, while he sprung into the fore
rigging
and went aloft. The rest of the party had now reached the
rock and Colonel Powel hailed Ellis as he gained the cross-trees.
Welcome back again, Captain Ellis. So you have fallen in
with my yacht!
By the gods! was that your yacht, Powel? answered the
young commander from the cross-trees, the brig in the meanwhile
slowly nearing the rock.
Yes; she was cut out and run off by her former captain, I am
positive.
I am a fool not to have been sure of her! When I first saw her
astern I thought it was the yacht, but having seen the yacht but
once, as it only came from the ship-yard last week, I was not sure,
and then I could not think you would have sailed at midnight. I
then took her to be a revenue cutter, and sailed with her an hour
or two, but she overhauled me, manuvred in a masterly manner,
and finally came up with me, and I verily believe would have
boarded me but that they discovered that I was armed. As it was
they did me mischief as you see, and I did them some, as well as
left a nine pounder in his main-mast. Port a little there at the
wheel.
Port it is, answered the helmsman.
How is the depth of water here Colonel?
Twenty feet.
I thought it looked black enough for full five fathom. Hard
a port.
The helmsman obeyed the order, and the brig came slowly
past, the headland approaching it nigher and nigher. The young
commander, walking out on the top-gallant yard, waited a moment
for her to come the nighest; then calling out loudly to the man at
the wheel, Starboard, hard a starboard! he fearlessly swung
himselfjust as the vessel was falling off again, and in spite of the
cries of the terrified Blanche and of Colonel Powelfar from the
yard-end towards the rock, catching at a branch of a tree with a
firm grasp. Then securing a footing upon it, he with a light
bound, stood amid the group with his hand clasped in that of the
happy Blanche.
How could you be so rash, Captain Harry? said Mrs.
Hayward
.
Blanche ought not to forgive you. The color has not
yet come back to her check.
You young sailors will ever be a reckless set, said Colonel
Powel, shaking him warmly by the hand. But I am glad to see
you, light upon us any way you will.
You will stay with us, inquired, or rather insisted Hayward,
the two young men having, since they first met, become warmly
attached to each other.
Not five minutes. I must be on board again when she returns
on the other tack, and I will take your boat, Colonel, for the
purpose
.
I only jumped ashore to say how d'ye do, and explain the
cause of my return.
We knew it before. Blanche saw your brig and ran to the
river-side as if chasing her runaway wits, said Colonel Powel.
The affair is all over town, and in the papers. It was brought
by a sloop which you spoke.
Oh, aye! I wanted a spare spar or two, resolved to repair
damages
and go in chase of the scoundrel who run me aboard. But
after hailing half a dozen coasters and putting into Norwalk,
without
getting what I wanted, I was forced to put back. But by the
lord Harry! I will yet catch him.
No, lord Harry, that you don't, said Blanche laughing, yet
with a look of seriousness in her sweet beaming eyes; you shall
run no more risks. I have a claim upon you, and I mean to
enforce
it.
That is right, Blanche, said Colonel Powel; make him feel
his responsibility. You see, Ellis, the traces begin to jingle in your
ears already. But cheer heart. We men must all come to it, if
we are fit to make a woman happy, and so long as the traces are
wreathed with flowers, as I am sure Blanche's will be, we can
wear them for the fragrance they yield.
Quite sentimental, pa, said Kate, looking archly at Colonel
Powel; will you make another such pretty speech?
Mischief, no! Hayward, don't let your wife be too saucy.
Kate, don't quiz your father, said Blanche with a roguish
look.
Oh, you are quizzing too. Well, I don't see but one is bad as
the other. Harry, when you come again I will take you into my
library, shut the door, and give you some lessons as to wife-ruling.
I must not forget Hayward either.
Oh, you naughty pa! said Kate, tapping his cheek with her
fore finger. But you don't look so
very
Bluebeardish, and I will
kiss you. Colonel Powel received the kiss with becoming
gravity
,
and then the party walked along a descending path to the
dove, and so round the white beach to the opposite jut of land
where the brig would come in on her tack. Here, as the vessel
came nigh, he left them, promising to be with them in the evening
after he should have anchored his vessel at the ship-yard. They
stood watching the beautiful yet crippled vessel as she passed on
until she was lost to their sight by a point of thick woods.
We will now change the scene. It was a moonlight night; but
the moon, decreased half its size, had just risen late far in the
northeastern
horizon. Its reddish glare glimmered over a wild scene of
wave and rock. A steely river, swift and dark, flowed to the ocean
between barren and craggy headlands. All around was drear and
savage grandeur; an iron-hound coast presenting an eternal
barrier
to the lashing surges of the deep. But at this hour the wind
was very light from the South, and the waves of the sea rolled
landward with a low, suppressed murmur. There was no life to
animate the wild scene of rock and ocean. The far moonlit wave
was unrelieved by a single vessel as far as the eye could sweep
from the headlands. Inland half a league up the river, was a
dark height overhanging the water, and in the gloom of night
frowned with the warlike outlines of a circular fortress. The
slowly rising moon flung its faint, lurid beams into its grass-grown
area, and they fell upon the figure of a man who was standing in
one of the embrasures upon a gun. His head was bare, his body
was half naked, and his beard was unshorn, and was grey mingled
with black. His hair was white as snow, and the wind as it came
from the sea, which was visible, lifted it from his temples. His
eye was wild, and his gesturesfor at times he waved his hands
and threw out his bodywere those of a maniac. He seemed to
be watching the sea. As the moon rose higher he suddenly
turned
to that and eloquently addressed it in wonderful glory of
language
and imagery; now speaking with tenderness, now with
fierce displeasure; now deprecating its vengeance, now pouring
forth towards it torrents of terrible denunciation.
Suddenly, in the midst of one of these scenes, he stopped, and
shaking his head despondingly, seemed to realize the madness of
his conduct; and sighing, he said in a tone of touching woe:
NoI am not in my right mind. The moon is not God! Yet
why does the moon madden my brain? I feel not thus till it shines!
'Tis the cause of these paroxysms of madnessfor I
am
mad.
Men call me mad. I hate the moon. No, I do not hate the moon!
Ho, the moon! he suddenly exclaimed, rising and stretching
forth his hands towards it; the glorious moon! Give me wings
and I will bathe in your oceans of light! Curses! he added
fiercely after a pause. Thou hearest in silence, and I see thee
smile at thy slave; for I am thy slave! Thou hast bound me in
fetters; thou hast flung a burning chain around my brain. God!
I feel it scorching, and the fire is driving me to hell!
He sprang from the gun, and rushing along the battlement
stopped
full where it overhung a precipice a hundred feet in depth.
There he balanced himself upon the dizzy height, and long and
loudly laughed, as if in mockery of the danger into which the devil
in his brain tempted him to cast himself. All at once his
countenance
changed, and so did his whole manner. Sitting down upon
the edge of the battlement he sobbed like a child and anxiously
looked towards the sea.
They say she is on the occean with him somewhere, and so I
know if I look and keep watch when the good moon rises and keeps
watch with me, I shall see her. There's the ocean, and there I
will keep my eye. I bless the moonlight that helps me see the
ocean! Oh, I should be so lonely without the moon! Good
moon! I will not curse thee! There comes a vessel! No, 'tis a
wave breaking on the rocks at Seguin. I have seen so many
vessels
come, and yet not his. They say she will never come home
again. I know they lie! She would never stay from her father!
She is my only child. She was a good daughter till she left home.
Oh, curse the hour! Curse him who tempted her! They lie,
when they say she was not deceived and wronged. Oh how
beautiful
she was. Some men say
he
is hung. They lie! If it was
true she would have come home to her father. She loved me in
childhood, and she is not evil now. She was deceived. Her
mother is dead, weeping for her; and she is away, and I am here
alone, with only the moon to love me and keep me company. It's a
good moon.
His
mother died of grief last year, because they told her
her boy was a pirate!
Her
mother died of a broken heart. I did not
cry. My heart did not break. No! I was strong. I shed no weak
tears. I! No! I laughed when they told me. I laughed when I
read her name, coupled with his, in the papers the neighbors sent
me. No! I wept no tear. Women weep. Men, when they cannot
weepmen
go mad!
and I am mad! I have no house, no clothes,
no food. I hate manI hate housesI love this old fort. When
I am hungry I can gather clams, and when I am sleepy I can lie
down in this grassy nook with the moon to watch by me all night.
There is a sailshe comesno, 'tis a mocker! The devil sails
mock-ships on the ocean to make me mad. No. 'Tis a vessel near
the land. I saw her broad mainsail turn white and large to the
moon. I shall see my child, my Ellen now. I have seen many a
vessel pass, and hailed to ask for my Ellen; but I know now she
is come; and when she comes I sha'nt mourn as I do now. I
shan't be mad; oh no! I will be happy, and I will tell them all
she is not bad, but has come home to bless me. Oh, how fast it
comes. I will set on my gun and watch it!
The maniac then left his dizzy seat and took a position on a
dismounted
gun in an embrazure looking seaward. Gradually as he
watched the advancing sail, his eyes closed with fatigue and
mental
exhaustion, and he sunk upon the grass by the side of the gun in
deep sleep. Poor human nature! how weak, how weak, how
perishable! at one moment dignified and ennobled even in the
eyes of angels, with a commanding and creative intellect; at
another
grovelling in idiocy lower than the brute, or wandering on
earth a wild, fearful wreek of itself, the object of all men's pity
and of angels' wonder. This poor being whose madness we have
witnessed, had been a clergyman of eminence in a village not far
from Bath. He had an only daughter whom he spoiled by
indulgence
.
But mother and father were both devoted to her, and in
no other way did they feel that they could show forth their love.
They restrained her in no impulsechecked her by no exercise of
authoritynever crossed her wayward will. Near them lived a
gentleman who had an only son whom he equally indulged. Him
he at length sent to college, where he early betrayed a vicious
propensity
;
and after two years sojourn at two different Universities,
he was expelled in disgrace, and went to New York, where he
entered
upon a course of profligacy and guilt. The daughter of the
clergyman was attached to him, and, deceived by his letters,
eloped
from her father's roof. The result is already in the reader's
possession. This imprudent girl is the mistress of Morris Grme!
The vessel which the broken-hearted father had seen was soon
made out as a rakish schooner, standing on under free sail towards
the mouth of the Kennebec.
This is a savage coast, Morris, said her captain, as he stood on
the schooner's deck eyeing the rocky shores with his glass. I
would not like a storm to catch the Sea-Slipper upon it.
There are numerous safe harbors all along the coast, and
vessels
are rarely lost here.
It is a remantic and wild region, and seems without
inhabitants
,
said Carleton as he swept the land with his spy-glass.
Yet there is scarcely a cove that has not its fisherman's cabin,
nor an upland that is not cultivated, though rudely. It is a hardy
region and a herdy race. But as you ascend the river a league or
two the savage aspect of the shores yield to farms and woods, and
the higher you proceed the more beautiful the scenes on either
hand become, till you find yourself below Gardiner, in the midst
of the finest river scenery in New England.
This is a spacious mouth for so narrow a river, said Carleton,
as the schooner glided from the open sea between the island
headlands
that guard like gigantic posterns of rock the entrance to the
river. How far up is this fort?
A half a league by the water, but not a mile in direct line.
Now you can see it lifting its dark head into the sky.
Yes, but 'tis impossible to get the guns from that height
without
more means than we can command, Morris.
No. I have well examined the spot. The path to the water
is even, and twelve men can with ease and safety get down a gun
at a time.
Be it so. The devil lend us a lever but we get them aboard;
and then hey for the rule of the ocean wave. What stirring lines
hose of Byron. It was his Corsair, Morris, that first gave me a
thirst to be a sailor and a corsair. How finely they open!
O'er the glad waters of the dark blue sea,
Our thoughts as boundless and our souls as free,
Far as the breezes bear the billows' foam,
Survey our empire and behold our home!
Blow good breezes! The tide is ebbing, and we go up
slowly
,
he added to Morris, who had himself taken the helm, as the
schooner entered the river. We have been now five days in
calms and storms running here, a distance easily run in
twenty-four
hours.
If that revenue cutter, said Morris laughing, that chased
us off Nantucket shoals should catch us in this infernal trap we
should have a hard chance to get off as well. But I would fight
her to the last.
Yes, said Carleton in a low deep tone of voice; yes,
we
must never be taken!
No! came with equally stern decision from Morris's lips.
No!
echo repeated from the cliff side with a stern
distinctness
that made them start.
A good augury, gaily said Carleton, walking to the
companion-way
to meet Eve, whom he had despatched the young
steward-o
invite on deck to view the romantic scene around them.
CHAPTER VIII.
Silently, and moving like a spectre of the waters, the schooner
glided along the dark and savage shores, sometimes obscured by the
shadows of the rocks, at others reappearing with the faint grey beams
of the shorn moonlight gleaming upon her upper sails; not far from
the mouth and almost lying at the base of the fort-rock, stretched
before them a low broken beach on the extremity of which was
visible
,
as they rounded the point, a white circular battery. It stood out
in fine relief in the moonbeams, and in the indistinct light seemed
to the eyes of Carleton to be bristling with guns.
How is this, Morris, he said quickly; what fortress are we
coming upon? We are fairly caught.
No, answered Grme coolly. This is a fort built some
time before the late war, but has never been used, the fortress on
the height so fully commanding it. It is a pretty affair, and looks
formidable by moonlight.
Had I been sailing into this river alone, I should certainly
have put about on coming thus upon it, said Carleton, as they
glided past within a hundred yards of its yawning embrasures.
This is a lovely, wild scene, Edward, said a sweet voice at his
side; and there is something in the danger that your purpose
hither associates with it, that inspires awe as I gaze. How
smiling
in the moon this low round fort appears, with the grass
waving above it, contrasted with the dark and savage grandeur of
the frowning battlements above and almost overhanging it. That
height seems the throne of the battle-god.
You are a romantic person, dear Eve, said Carleton, suffering
her arm to rest on his, and her soft hand to steal for the pressure
of his own.
I learned to be so from you, dear Carleton. It was you that
first opened my eyes and my heart to the beauties of nature. You
taught me to love the roar of the cascade, to gaze with awe upon
the rocky cliffs, and to love the beautiful and the sublime in all
that our native river presented. And from loving nature I learned
to love you as my spiritual nature. My spirit went inward, and
there found a new earth to love, of which, that you had taught me
to love, was but the shadow. Thou wert my world for my heart's
abiding home.
And you found it, Eve, a world of storms and earthquakes;
all unfair and unlovely; its hosom uptorn with whirlwinds of
passion
,
and itself often forced from its true orbit by its own inward
convulsions.
Yet as I delighted to listen to the roar of the water-fall, to gaze
on the wild whirlpool of wrathful waters, to rejoice in the careering
storm and feel a pleasure in witnessing the fierce uproar of the
elements, even as I enjoyed the lovely and the peaceful in nature's
serenest mood, so have I loved, yet with awe, ever, dear Edward,
the wild warfare in your own impetuous nature. I loved not earth
less for its storms and clouds, nor have I loved thee less. Man's
soul is the mirror that reflects the material earth. God has so
decreed
and adapted the two, for what vast end in the future we may
not fathom. But we do find the type of all our passions in the
elements and their results.
I think I understand your idea, Eve. It is a singular one, and
something within me assures me of its truth. But see how
sternly
and warningly towers this fortress upon us. What type within
my soul
your
world, Evedoes this represent? asked Carleton
smiling.
The spirit of menacing resistance. If thou couldst embody
that attribute of thy moral nature in matter, it would assuredly
take that shape, or a similar.
Rather that of the rock of Gibraltar; for I feel the spirit of
menacing resistance is as vast and mighty, and strong and eternal
as that throne of war's power and strength. But let us discuss this
matter another time, Eve, he said, narrowly watching the
frowning
fortress, which rose nearly above their heads. To your cabin,
lest danger should fall upon youfor our object here may not be
accomplished
in perfect security, as Morris thinks.
NayI will remain on deck and watch you, said Eve firmly.
I fear no danger.
Morris, come hither, said Carleton in a low tone. Do you
not see the figure of a man reclined against the outline of the south
battlement of that fort? We are likely to find here some persons
to object to our carrying away your guns.
Morris looked a moment, then sprang for his glass and levelled
it at the object.
It is a man seated on a gun in an embrasure of the fort. I
see but one, and he does not look like a soldier. He has
disappeared
.
What can this mean? I could have sworn a human
being
would not have been within a league of it.
Could our purpose have been betrayed? But nothis is
impossible
.
The fort may have been manned since I was here a few weeks
ago. At all events, this looks suspicious, and we must act warily.
There is no one else to be seen. We are now so near that I could
see a crow if one were sitting on the top of the fort. Yet there is
some one there, and what his purpose can be unless to guard the
place, I cannot conceive.
If there is one then, there are more than one! said Carleton.
Forts are not usually given in charge of a single man!
We will soon know, said Morris. I will stand on; for our
character cannot be suspected, and if we find resistance we must
meet it as we best can. I can depend upon the twenty men we
have!
The guns we must have, at whatever risk, said Carleton, with
decision. I am well wearied of this being at sea unarmed, as
helpless and unfit for service as a Marblehead mackerel catecher. Let
her stand on and let the issue be put in fortune's hands. As we
approach nearer I can discover nothing upon the fort. No further
signs of its being held are visible. This must have been, I think
a delusion after all, Morris.
No. I distinctly recognized a human figure. It was
bareheaded
and seemed half naked, as it appeared to me!
Then some wild man of the woods, perhaps, who haunts the
spot, said Carleton, laughing. I have heard of such persons.
How beautiful the deep repose of the frowning terrace, Eve'
I am enjoying in my heart all the grandeur and beauty of the
scene! How dark and solemn is the black, impenetrable shade
beneath yonder fir-crowned cliff side. It seems like the palace of
nightthe womb of darkness! and see we are gliding into it!
We anchor beneath the cliff in the deep shadow there! said
Morris from the helm. As we come nearer we shall find a path
winding from the water up to the fort. We can lay close along
side of the rock as the water is ten fathom deep.
If the fort is manned, we are now at least too far under their
guns to be injured, said Carleton as the Sea Slipper glided
towards
the calm, sheltered spot indicated by Morris Grme,
bringing
the fortress each moment farther above their heads, until at
length it was no more visible. In a few moments afterwards the
schooner lay close to the cliff with her sails, not one of which had
been lessened, unmoved by a breath of air.
We shall have to two out of this black-hole, said Carleton
as the schooner came gently to and ceased further motion with
its how against the side of the precipice. Have the boats down
and attached with oars in all ready, if we should have to do it in a
hurry. If this was in the West Indies, Morris, I should say we
were in for a pretty adventure.
Be assured we shall find no one in the fort. I will take half
the men and lead, as I am familiar with the path. The rest better
remain in charge of the schooner, in case of surprise.
The Sea-Slipper was now secured by her hawsers to the rock,
both at the bows and stern, as snugly as if she had been lying at
a pier. Planks were passed from the waist to the rock, where the
hscent commenced. It was decided that Morris should take the
lead with ten men, and on ascertaing that the way was clear, he
was to give the signal, when Carleton with eight of the remainder
was to follow him, the men bearing the ropes and necessary tackle
for removing the guns.
Morris Grme sprung ashore with a light adventurous spirit
characterestic of him in action and danger, followed by his men,
He had his own pistols which he had retained, and brought on
board with him at New York, as also had Carleton. Some
of his men had a single pistol each, and others were armed with
knives, harpoons, or capstan-bars, as they could collect them on
board. Certainly a party less poorly armed, never disembarked
on such an expedition. With slow toil Morris ascended the stony
and steep path, through over-shading pines, which intercepted
every ray of light. But as they ascended farther, the path turned
off to the right, and became less steep as it wound round the rock.
At length he suddenly emerged above the trees, into an opening
within a few feet of the base of the fortress. It towered above
him in stern silence. He listened, and stillness only reigned. All
was buried in the repose of night, with the soft radiance of the
moon shining upon its walls, giving a deeper character to its
peaceful
calm. His glance narrowly ranged the whole breadth of the
walls, but neither ear nor eye could detect any signs of the
presence
of man. Half inclined to adopt Carleton's suggestion that
he had been deceived, he waved his hand to his men to advance
again, and then with a confident and familar step, passed rapidly
beneath the walls to a gate on the north side. It had fallen in;
and the appearance of every thing around, indicated the fort to
have remained undisturbed since he had visited it on his late
excursion
to his native town, not far distant. He now hastened his
steps, and leaping across the dilapidated gate-way, was at once in
the midst of the deserted fortification. He paused a moment,
inspired
with a feeling of awe by the deep repose of the place and
the hour. The moon streamed in through the embrasures casting
half the interior in gloomy indistinctness. In a moment or two
the influence passed off, and looking round and seeing with a
glance that the guns were all there, he hastened to the battlements
and with a shout gave the signal to Carleton. It was returned
from the deck of the schooner below in her Captain's clear tones,
now elevated with exultation, and the hope of once more dancing
the billows of the wide sea, with an armed vessel beneath his proud
tread.
Nay, Eve, you must not follow me, he said kindly.
But there is no danger. Besides, I have made a vow in my
heart, and sworn by my love, that I will not leave you. I have
wronged you, Edward, in being jealousfor I was
jealous
, but for
a wicked moment only. After your kindness to me the last few
days, I can never believe you false, or that you do not love me.
Let me go with you. I want to enjoy the wide prospect from the
summitof island, sea and shore.
Have thy pretty will, Eve, said Carleton playfully. You
are true and faithful, and I should be a brute to cross you in your
wishes.
There was something in this remark, which was both pleasing
and painful to her; but she feared to analyse it, and so looking on
its pleasanter side alone, she smiled and bounded with him to the
shore.
You will ask the Captain for me, said a voice near her, and
only heard by her. She looked round and saw by her side the
handsome lad whom Carleton had made his steward.
Yes, you shall go, Little Belt, she said with cheerfulness.
Edward let Belt leave the schooner to have a climb upon the
rocks. He merits it, he has made himself so useful.
If you wish it, Eve, answered Carleton; and the boy
grasping
her hand bounded before her up the path, and was soon far
out of sight.
What an affectionate yet strange boy he is, she said after a
moments' silence, as they climbed the height, her arm clinging to
Carleton's. Little Belt can't be his true name, either. How came
you by him on board?
I never saw him till he was on board. He came in with the
other men. Morris probably knows him.
I will ask him about him, she said as they at length emerged
in full view of the walls of the fort, and beheld Grme standing
by a gun upon the battlements watching their ascent.
It is all as I expected, Carleton. The fort is unoccupied, and
the man I saw must have been an apparition, or a delusion. But I
could swear he was bare headed! Heaven defend us! here he is
again! cried the young lieutenant starting aside from the
embrasure
in which he stood, with alarm and surprise, as a half naked,
wild figure sprung to his feet from beneath the gun where he had
been unobserved in the deep shadow, and seized him by the arm.
Carleton and Eve both started at the sight and gazed upon him
with wonder as he stood, tall, wild and demoniac upon the defined
outline of the fortress, his gray hair streaming, his chest naked
the moonlight gleaming ghastly upon his haggard countenance
in which his eyes glowed like volcanoes! Eve recoiled with fear,
and Carleton gazed with horror.
Who and what art thou? demanded Grme endeavoring to
throw the mad-man off.
My daughter! hast thou brought back my daughter? fiercely
cried the maniac Thou shalt not go till thou hast brought back
my daughter! and he suddenly threw his arms closely round him
and involved him in his embrace, while he yelled in a voice
between
grief and rage, I have thee nowI have thee close! Thou
art mine, and thou shalt be hell's till thou give me back my child
my child!
Helpfor God's sake Carleton, help! I am without power to
move in his iron grasp. Hasten round to the gate and come and
release me from this demon! He will hurl me from the precipice!
Carleton obeyed and flew along the path followed by Eve. He
sprang past the men who were standing immovable, completely
paralyzed by this strange and sudden spectacle, and leaping upon
the grass-grown battlement he hastened around the rampart to the
precipitous quarter where Morris stood struggling with the
madman
.
In the meanwhile the maniac continued to make his wild
thrilling
appeals to him for his child.
I know nothing of thy child! Release me, demon, or I will
hurl thee from the rock! cried Morris with mingled fury and fear.
Ha, ha, ha! thou liestthou hast my daughter! Give me
back my daughter! I am mad for my child!I am crazed for my
lost one! Here his manner suddenly changed. He released him
and knelt before him. Give her to me, Morris Grme, and I
will recall the father's curse that now is on thy head! Oh, return
her to me and I will bless thee!
Carleton and Eve had come near and seeing that Morris was
released
,
they stopped and listened.
How knowest thou me by name, old man? demanded Grme
hoarsely.
Thou dost not know me, then? Hast thou torn so many
daughter's from their homes' that thou shouldst be at a loss for the
father's name when he appeals to thee? said the other rising to
his feet and regarding him with a flashing eye. My daughter!
I demand her at thy hand! I will not kneel to thee! Give me
back my child I say! Return to me my lost Ellen!
Ellen! repeated Grme, from the very depths of his being,
as if the sound of that name had moved the foundation of his
guilty soul. He gazed on the face of the mad-man and through all
the degradation of form and wreck of mind he recognized the
father
of her he had wronged. He trembled and became visibly
pale, and fell back a step from the menacing air and fixed gaze of
the demoniac.
There followed a silence unbroken save by the low dashing of
the waves against the island shore, which lasted several minutes.
Grme seemed rooted to the spot. Who can paint the horrors of
his conscience in those still moments of reflection, with the
fearful
supernatural gaze of the lunatic upon him? He seemed
arraigned
to judgment before his time. Carleton would have rushed
forward and relieved Morris from the presence of the man, but
Eve said
No, let us see the issue! If Morris Grme hath done this
wrong, this is God's judgment and we may not interfere.
Carleton
suffered himself to be guided by her, but her words deeply
troubled his own thoughts. At length Morris Grame spoke
for he could not longer endure the fascinating look of the burning
eyes upon him. He spoke soothingly; but his voice trembled.
Of thy daughter, good man, I know nothing. Thou shouldst
seek her elsewhere than of me.
Thou liest, shouted the mad-man! Thou canst not
deceive
a lunatic, for the God who hath taken away his reason hath
left in its place a sagacity that laughs at reason! I can read thy
thoughts, and to my burning brain they are written upon thy
black heart in letters of blood! Thou knowest where my child is!
Give her to me or I will tear thy heart from thy foul throat!
Quicker than thought, and ere his purpose was anticipated, the
mad-man caught Morris again in the same terrific embrace as
before
.
The young man felt his hot breath upon his face, and the
glare of his eyes which burned like furnaces seemed to scorch his
brain. He was nearly mad! He struggled, but vainly, to
disengage
himself. But the strength of the maniac was like that of
three men.
Nay, then, fiend of hell! if thou wilt but let me go, I will tell
thee of thy daughter, he gasped.
Instantly he was unclasped, and just as Carleton had again
advanced
to release him, who a second time was with held by Eve. The
mad-man's manner changed to a quiet bearing; and clasping his
hands together he bent eagerly forward in an attitude to hear.
She is in New York. Six days since I left her there. She
will probably be at home, as I left a note with her, saying I should
not return to her, and that she had best go back to you. Morris
ceased. The father remained a moment, silently regarding him.
He then spoke musingly as if to himself:
Home!
you said home! This place is now her home. The
sound of the sea will be her lullabyfor her singing mother is
dead. If she would come to me, she must come hither to me; for
here is my only home. Ha! and what hast
thou
to do here? he
fiercely demanded;
here
in
my
house! Wouldst thou bring woe
and madness and burning hell here? Thou hast cursed with thy
presence one fair home, and what dost thou here? But thou shalt
not defile this sanctuary of the God-afflicted. This spot is sacred
to madness and woe! 'Tis the home hallowed by woe, woe, woe!
The whisting winds howl woe! the lashing waves shriek woe!
the wild sea-bird screams woe! a thousand demons dance on every
rock and sit in every tree, and cry nothing but woe! Oh, 'its a
sweet woeful place! and '
tis my home!
What dost thou in it,
defiler
?
I will hurl thee into the sea!
With an air and gesture significant of the purpose he expressed
in his fierce language, he leaped towards the young man, who,
anticipating
his intention, retreated and sprang across an embrazure
behind him. The mad-man, excited by the appearance of flight,
shrieked fiercely and bounded after him. Morris stopped with
a curse upon his lips, drew his pistol from his belt and levelled it
at him. Heedless of it the lunatic rushed onward, and Morris fired.
Take thy death, then, if thou will have it, mad-man!
The maniac staggered, pressed his hand to his temples, from
which the blood poured as if from a fountain, and then recovering
himself, made a feartul leap forward, and a third time Morris
Grme found himself clasped in his embrace.
Now, by my soul, Eve, I must to his rescue, exclaimed
Carleton
.
See! behold! they will go over the cliff! Oh God! this is
terrible! she suddenly shrieked, covering her eyes and ears with
both her hands.
The grasp of the lunatic was the grasp of death. Grme
realized
all his danger. He struggled for life, while the mad-man
strove fearfully to hurl him over the battlements, mumbling all the
while indistinct maledictions. He foamed at the mouth, and
Morris
was bathed in the hot life-blood that streamed from the wound
in his temples. For a few moments the contest for the mastery
was terrific to witness. The battlements seemed to tremor
beneath
the feet of the two men. The mad-man strove, inspired
with vengeanceMorris for love of life. Carleton involuntarily
paused to witness the issue, when suddenly, after a terrible
struggle
down on the ground, both stood suspended above the precipice.
Each had a foot braced upon the verge! Both eyed each other in
menacing silence! The least movement would hurl them both into
the rocky bed beneath! With breathless a we all looked on without
power to stir to aid them. It was at this moment that Eve
shrieked
.
It was instantly echoed by a shriek wilder still!
Startled by the shriek, and its wilder echo, the mad-man
released
his hold of Grme, exclaimingTis Ellen, my child! my
child!
Morris feeling himself free from him, with a difficult effort
recovered
his footing; but in the act he so suddenly threw the
lunatic
from him that he reeled on the verge, where, balancing himself,
he stood an instant between earth and air, stretching forth his
hands towards a female form that suddenly appeared before all eyes
upon the battlement.
Bless thee, my child, thou hast come at last to thy father!
I forgiveBlessings onth
His last words were lost in air. With a dead, heavy, headlong
plunge he disappeared over the battlement into the void beneath!
How still all stand and listen! The sound of his fall as his body
bounds from rock to rock is all that breaks the awful silence of that
moment. Hark! that heavy dash into the dark waters tells the
tale! This sound has ceased; and the silence of the night is only
broken by the deep, long drawn breathing of those left standing on
the battlement.
CHAPTER IX.
When the last murmur of the disturbed waters had died away,
every one turned to gaze upon the form, that had so suddenly
appeared
before their eyes, and those of the falling lunatic. It was
that of a tall and graceful female robed in white! But it now
was not the emblem of peace and purity. Her garments were
disarrayed
and rent from the exposed bosom! Her unbound hair fell in
long dishevelled masses about her shoulders! and her feet were bare
and bleeding. The moonlight shone upon her countenance, and
revealed features of surpassing beauty, and proudly cast. But
deadly pale was her brow, and colourless the cheek where once
had bloomed the rose. The eyebrows were bent in stern regard
upon Morris Grme. The eyes large and wild, were fixed upon
him with a strange unearthly intensity. The beauteous mouth,
where once love sat enthroned, was compressed and stern
wonderfully
stern, for that beauteous feature of a woman. Her
attitude
was threatening, and as she stretched forth her white arms
towards Grme, she appeared like a spirit of evil,a fallen, yet
still beautiful angel,come to adjudge, condemn, and punish!
Silent and awed stood the score of crime-hardy buccaneers on the
green sward within the fortress; and silent and observing
remained
Carleton and Eve, gazing alternately upon her and Morris
Grme. And how appeared this guilty young man. From the
moment she appeared like a vision upon the battlement, and his
eyes met her form, he stood like one struck into a statue of horror
by some judgment of Heaven. He heard not the mangled fall of
the lunatic's bounding body, as it plunged from rock to rock till
the dashing waves opened to receive it into their secret bosom!
his ears were eyes? his senses were become eyes! he could only
see the form before him. Her steady gaze paralysed his soul! he
could not look away; but, as if compelled by some fatal
fascination
,
still gazed upon her as she gazed upon him. But how
different
the expression of their look! his horror-struck, fearful and
full of remorse and evil forboding: hers, proud, stern, full of
vengeance and undying hate.
There they stood confronted on that lofty battlement's verge,
in the full moonlight, the awe-struck and curious groups standing
silent and breathless, awaiting the issue. Carleton and Eve had
both heard enough from the lunatic, and knew enough of Morris's
history to comprehend, in part, the nature of the wild scene before
them! To the men, the figure was an apparition from the other
world. And Morris Grme would rather such it had been, than
the reality it was! Two minutesoh what hours of mental
suffering
they involved to the guilty young manpassed in this
manner
gaze
to gazethe basilisk enchaining the fear struck eye of
its victim. Grme's lips moved and his hands opened and
clenched, and he seemed as if striving to call on Carleton for
deliverance
from her; but no words came from him, and he could
make no intelligible gesture.
How fearful! whispered Eve under her breath! how
dreadful
must be the punishment of the guilty in the world to come, if
God permits such visitations of judgment here.
Hush! she speaks! said Carleton, whose own guilty
character
would not let him listen with temper to Eve's words.
Morris Grme!
the deep, deep unearthly tones of that voice!
They made every man start! Every eye was bent on Morris
Grme! He trembled visibly, and covered his face with his
hands.
She approached him, and laid her white hand upon his wrist,
and said again in the same deep voice, Morris Grme, look up!
He removed his hands from before his eyes and looked in her
face, which was bent close to his. The look he encountered,
caused
him instantly to drop his eyes.
Ah Morris Grme, she said in a softer tone, but with her
stern beautiful features still fixed in immovable rigidity, and her
large wild eye scanning his face, time was when you loved to
look upon me, and to gaze into my eyes! But those were the
days of thy love!
This
she added, in a tone that made him shrink,
this
is my hour of
hate!
Ha, ha! Grme! dost thou not love me
now! I can remember when by this same moon, my only lover!
how we walked together arm locked in arm, heart echoing to heart,
and I was to be the bride! It was a sweet dream! but '
tis gone!
You went far away, and when I followed thee to be thy bride,
thou didst falsely wed me, taking my true heart and virgin love,
giving me foul lies and fouler dishonor in return. Yet I cursed
thee not, Morris! Still I forgave and loved thee; and when once
I believed thee dead by Hayward's hand, I wept over thee as if
thou hadst never done me the great wrong that broke my heart!
But thou didst not love as I loved Morris Grme! or else, thou
wouldst not have dishonored me! True love ever elevates, never
degrades its object. Time passed, and you became weary of me!
Six nights ago you deserted me, destroyer! I wept notI cursed
not! I resolved to die! Your suggestion that I should return to
my father's roof, I obeyed! for I would see him once again, and
receive his blessing before I died. I this day reached my native
village! My home was in the hands of strangers! My father, I
asked for him. They scorned me, and turned me from their doors
and bade me seek him among the rocks by the sea-shore, for there
he wandered day and night, a mad-man! And all said I had
broken his heartthat I had crazed my father, and driven him to
the holes in the rocks! that
I
had killed my mother, and when he
should die I should be his murderer! and so, they drove me forth
with epithets of scorn and dishonor, and then in my heart, aye in
mv inmost being, I did curse
thee
, thee Morris Grme! I went forth
and at every place I came I knelt outside the gate, for I dared not
enter a house again, and with clasped hands asked who had seen
my father? and, so I wandered on till night came; my feet were
bleeding and my body wearied! but I could neither rest nor linger
till I had found my father. The moon rose and I saw a fisherman
launching his boat. He fled at my approach, but when he saw me
kneel upon the sharp shells that strewed the wet beach, he come
near me and said, poor thing! thou art crazed too! and he
would have taken me into his house! but no! I had no roof
henceforth but that free sky which covered my crazed father's
head. He then said it was God's judgment come upon me, and
bade me seek my father in this place. And hither I climbed the
weary hill
and I beheld my father!
But how Morris Grme?
How?
here her voice, which in the foregoing narrative had been
low and earnest and singularly touching in its tone, rose on the
still air like the night shriek of the battle hawk. I saw him
hand to hand, eye to eye, struggling with thee for his fast oozing
life! Thy brow wet with his fresh blood! thy hand crimsoned
with the warm life that gave me life! I beheld thy efforts to hurl
him from the battlement. I beheld his grey hairs streaming in the
contest, his visage marred with grief and vengeance and woe.
God gave me energy and strength, and I flew to save him! But
'twas too late! thy hand had done its deed of blood. He heard
my voicehe knew his long-lost child's tones, and turned his
eyes and hand upon me and blessed me. In bestowing that
blessing
he perished by thy red hand, thou thrice dyed murderer?
For God's sake Ellen, be calm! exclaimed Morris, who had
by this time in some measure recovered his usual self-possession;
I meant not to slay him! he was the assailant and I did it to
preserve
my own life!
Thy
life! what is thy vile life, man, compared with his? Thy
life was forfeited to him for the wrongs thou hadst done, and thou
wert a coward to seek to save it. Hast thou not robbed him of his
child? hast thou not slain his wife? hast thou not robbed him of
his reason? hast thou not dishonored his daughter! What hadst
thou to do with sacrificing him to save thyself! thou art guilty and
accursed, evil man! The day of thy retribution has come,
and God
hath given thee into my hand!
For thy arms, Morris Grme I
have sacrificed honor and the lives of all I love! In
my
arms then
shalt now atone with thy life for thine and
mine!
Instantly he was locked in her wild embrace! So sudden and
unlooked for was this act, that he could not resist! There was
but a momentary struggle, and with a wild maniac laugh, mingled
with which, was heard his raving shriek for aid; she sprung over
the preiepice with him in her arms. Carleton had sprung forward
but too late! He could only see a confused dark and white mass,
bounding down the broken sides of the cliff with a loud sound
plunge into the sea!
There was only a woman in white that struck the water, sir,
said Red Fred, who with all the rest had rushed to look over the
edge of the battlement. I watched the fall. Mr. Grme must
have been caught by one of the rocks or trees.
A deep groan at this instant reached their ears from the rocks
below, which corroborated his words.
I believe you are right, exclaimed Carleton. Down with
you after me to see if he is lying among the rocks, and is alive.
Mid-way the cliff, and near the path, led by his moans, Carleton
came upon Morris, faintly clinging by one arm to a root growing
in the crevice of the rock. He was ten feet distant, and it was
impossible to approach him on account of the steep face of the cliff
at this part.
Hold on, Morris, a moment or two, he cried encouragingly.
Bear a hand here, Fred, with half a dozen fathom of that running
rigging, he shouted. Now secure it to that shelf above and
make a running noose.
For God's sake, be quick, Carleton! I am bruised and half
dead, and can hold on no longer, groaned Morris.
Courage, Grme! There flies the noose! Lower yet, Fred
Pass it under his feet. Now raise it gently up his body. Hold!
Now draw it together close. There! now we have you safely
moored, Morris; let go the limb. Hold on firm there on the shelf.
Now heave away, all of you! Gently; there is time enough!
Steady! There comes his head! Lift him over the rock three or
four of you. Kindly! kindly! don't you hear his groans? and he
is not a man to cry out for a trifle. There he is, now, safe and
insensible!
A litter was formed of the men's intertwining arms, and the
wounded man was borne to the foot of the rock on board the
schooner.
This has been a strange night's work! and Carleton
musingly
as the men moved down the path with their burden What an
escape from death, though he may die yet! He has fallen full
forty
feet, and by a lucky effort succeeded in disengaging himself
from her fatal embrace just at this spot and catching at the root;
while she went plunging far downward alone into the sea! Eve,
what do you think of all this? It is a strange affair!
I think it is God's judgment in this life for the evil done in it.
Retribution as surely follows guilt as reward does goodness. This
material world is a true type of the future and spiritual world.
Morris Grme has been a very bad man, and the singular
punishment
he has now received should convince you, dear Carleton,
that there is a God!
I am half inclined to think so. This has been a bitter night
to him. Hellif such there bewould have been more
endurable
to him, methinks, than the first interview with the crazed father;
and then this last one with his vindictive mistress; there can be
no torments greater for man than those I know that he then
suffered! Well, Eve, this sad tragedy has ended! Father and
daughter rest in the sea, and Grme is, I fear, likely soon to be
laid there. But I would not that he should die. He must be
looked to; I can never supply his place. But we have work to
do, and I must see to it. You are a good leech; go on board and
see that something is done to bring him to, and by that time I will
be on board. I must not, for this occurrence, lose the opportunity
for arming the schooner. I see the guns are all eighteen pound
carronades, besides two dismounted brass field pieces, making
eight in all. If you find Grme is very bad, send for me. I fear
some of his bones will be found broken.
Carleton, said Eve as she was leaving him, I beg you will not
let what you have seen to-night of justice and judgment quite pass
from your mind. A little reflection will convince you that this
meeting between this guilty young man and the father and
daughter
was not
an accident!
You are a pretty preacher, Eve; and if you faith be true, I
think poor Morris needs a ghostly homily just now, more than I;
he answered smiling. I fear he will too soon know whether thy
Bible be a truth or a fable.
Too
late
, I rather fear for both he and thou, she said
mournfully
in her heart as he re-ascended the path, with his men,
towards
the fort.
Though Carleton found but three of the gun-carriages entire,
after he had succeeded in getting them on board with a good deal
of labor, he unshipped one of the guns and took up the carriage
for the purpose of mounting the remaining guns upon it and
dragging
them down, one at a time, with pullies upon the wheels, and
twenty men to guide and hold it. By this means, in four hours
time he had transferred from the fort to his schooner's deck six
excellent cannon of a weight of metal just suited to her tonnage.
They were arranged, as brought on board, each at its proper part;
and parts of the remaining gun-carriages were collected sufficient
in a few hours to put together a fourth carriage; then having two
serviceable guns on each side. When the last gun was on board,
and the decks cleared, Carleton gave orders to tow the schooner
out of the calm nook where she lay, to meet the breeze. As he did
so he felt a light hand upon his arm.
Carleton, let us not go thus and leave the dead father and
daughter unburied!
You say truly, Eve. But time presses, and there are not two
hours to dawn. I have to take in powder ere sun-rise, without
which our guns are so much ballast.
It will take but a few moments. Oh, Carleton, if you love
me, leave not the dead we saw so lately in life, to bleach in the
sun, or he a prey to the fish and carrion fowl! There, she
pointed
shudderingly, lies
her
body glistening white where the tide
has left it. His cannot he far from it. Let a barrow be made of
oars, and let the men bear them back to the fort, which he so
pitifully
called his `home'; and there, within the shadow of the
gateway
let a grave be dug to hold them both. You will feel better,
and so will Grme!
It shall be as you say! Does he still lie as insensible as when
I set his arm and ancle.
Yesheavily breathing as if in a deep brain-sleep. Nature is
repairing the strength of life within ere she restore sensibility to
the body.
I fear, Eve, he said, shaking his head, we shall have to
make a third grave!
No, he will wake at sun-rise.
I hope so. Who is with him?
Belt. The strange boy weeps constantly, and fans him
without
rest.
Orders were then given to construct a barrow, and Carleton
preceded
his men to the foot of the rock, where the white garments of
Ellen indicated the spot where she lay. They took her up, her
long hair dripping with sea-brine, and laid her upon the bier.
Her marbled face was unbruised, and wore the same stern
expression
which the recital of her wrongs had impressed upon it, living.
Cold and beautiful, even in death, was her countenance; but her
limbs were mangled frightfully, and blood was oozing from a deep
wound in her bosom. Carleton gazed upon her a moment and felt
that he that was the author of the ruin of innocence was a criminal
for whom man had not commensurate judgment in reserve! and in
his heart he feared that there must be a God to judge and
condemn
.
How happy would Eve have been had she known his thoughts!
Love for Carleton had not made herlike hima deist!
Familiarity
with his guilty career had not made her less a believer in
that faith which she had first been taught by nature and afterwards
confirmed and strengthened by searching the scriptures, which are
the sun to nature's religion. This was a favorable thought of hers,
that the earth is as beautiful at midnight as at noon-day: that
then as truly as in the sunshine, on its bosom lie all the riches of
art and nature that compose its sublime scenery! Yet we see them
not! But the dawn breaks from the eastthe sun arises in his
splendor and unfolds every beauty, displays every glorious sight,
opens every sublime prospect! River and isle; rock and
mountain
;
ocean and lake; forest and valley; with cities, temples and
palaces, villas and hamlets, are all made plain and visible and
true! So is nature's religion. God
is
in his works in all his
perfection
and glory. But though he is there we see him not save
with the eyes of the inner being; for God can only thus be seen!
But the dawn of revelation breaks in the skies! the bible rises
glorious and resplendent upon the gaze of the soul, and at once is
unfolded to the eye of faith, the Deity in every sublime and
benevolent
attribute of his Divinity.
Thus Eve loved to dwell upon this grand and infinite subject,
which exercises ever the intelligence of angels! She strove on
every occasion to inspire her erring husband with sentiments of
the true faith. She felt that he had a mind well adapted to
receive
the sublime truth she would humbly teach him; but that he
could only be taught through, the sublime! She spoke to him of
the power and grandeur of God, and he listened with strange awe
and enthusiasm. But it was the Roman Jupiter Tonans he
pictured
to his mind as he listened, and not the God of the Scriptures.
By degrees he felt willing to admit such a being, and only such an
one, to rule the visible universe! But he would allow him no
moral quality. He invested him with power only as
he
would
himself use it! with dominion only as he would exercise it. Such
was Carleton's God; and such is too frequently the God of most
men who love not the God of the Bible; they deify their own
vices and worship
them!
Carleton might have remained a deist
did he stop here! but this was the natural result of Eve's
mistaken
mode of inculcating the truth of a God. And when she could
get him to assent even to the God he had created in his mind from
the ill-chosen materials she had weakly, yet in good faith,
furnished
him with, she was happy. Her error was in bringing God down
to him and not lifting him up to God after first humbling him in
the sight of his perfections.
The mangled corse of the miserable father was found lying across
a rock, with his head and breast beneath the water. The lifeless
form of the daughter was first borne to the gate of the fortress and
laid upon the ground by the wide grave which the men had dug.
Then came, borne upon the bier upon four men's shoulders, the
half naked, bruised body of the mad-man. Side by side, in the
shallow grave they were laid, in the cold moonlight, and then a
sail was thrown decently over them by Carleton.
Now, my men, cover them up, said Carleton turning away,
not without emotion at the painful sight.
Nay, Carleton! Hold, men! Edward do not bury them thus
like dogs!
What would you more, Eve? he said moodily; for he
half-guessed
her request.
The holy service for the dead!
'Tis mockery! What care they whether men curse or bless
them now!
NayCarleton, you do not speak as you feel.
I
will repeat
the service!
But thou hast no book.
I know it by heart, Carleton. I have always loved to read
and think of it in my sad hours. I will not detain you five
minutes
longer! Though your life is such as it is, your pursuits so
unlawful and erring, you are not yet insensible to the better forms
of better years.
When were my years better, Eve! he said bitterly. Have I
not been ever from boyhood what I now am? Who taught me good
in early years? Was not an evil example before my eyes.
Nurtured
among infidel Israelites, and my mother, as I have told thee,
one of their race, and my father a man of crime, what knew I
from my birth of, a better life? If there is a better life for me
tis to come.
And oh, wilt thou cherish this belief?
Nay, I said not I
believed
in better life to come. I do
not
. If
there is a God, then this world and we are his creatures. And is
not all evil here, Eve? As his creation is here, so will it be there.
As it is now so will it be forever! evil and misery under all his
dominion.
This is fearful blasphemy! cried Eve with a shudder I
know you do not believe as you speak. God is
No more! Say thy prayer for the dead, if thou wilt, and
these may listen, I care not to see thee make a fool of thyself,
Eve. And the unbelieving man turned slowly from the grave
Had he been still a deiststill an unbeliever, he would have
remained
with careless indifference. But neiw feelings had been
awakened by the strange judgments of that night, and they were
at work in the centre of his being, producing distasteful and
alarming thoughts. Conscience, which is God in every man, and
which is the soul of his soul, was on its throne, and had began to
move and melt the elements of his being.
Eve, the gentle, loving i magintive Eve, looked after him with
a sigh and a prayer, and then turning to the two-fold grave,
devoutly knelt by its side. Two or three of the seaman gathered
round knelt also and all but Red Fed reverently bowed their
heads. How beautiful was the sight! the green rampart with its
yawning embrasures, with the sea and islands spread beneath and
around! the group of buccaneers on one side of the grave, half
lost in the shadow of the gate-way. The tall dark figure of
Carleton
standing alone on the battlement a short distance off, silently
surveying the scene? the open grave with its canvass pall, and
the kneeling form of the lovely priestess for the dead, with her
elasped hands upon her bosom, and her eyes uplifted in lofty and
pure devotion to the blue heaven above her head. Deep and
singularly
impressive was the silence of that moment. Hush! listen
to that low, sweet voice of prayer go up from the grave's side, and
ascend from that lofty height like incense from an altar.
I know that my Redeemer liveth and that heshall stand at the
latter day upon the earth. And though after my skin worms
destroy
this body yet in my flesh shall I see God; whom I shall see
or myself, and mine eyes shall behold him and not another.
We brought nothing into this world and it is certain we can
carry nothing out. The Lord gave, and the Lord hath taken away,
blessed be the name of the Lord.
In the midst of life we are in death: of whom may we seek for
succor but of thee O Lord, who, for our sins art justly displeased.
Yet oh, Lord God, most holy; O Lord, most mighty; O holy and
most merciful Savior, deliver us not into the bitter pains of
Eternal
death.
She rose from her knees, and in a voice of solemn sweetness,
proceeded as follows:
I am the resurrection and the life, saith the Lord; he that
believeth
in me though he were dead shall he live; and whosoever
liveth and believeth in me shall never die.
Forasmuch as it hath pleased Almighty God in his wise
Providence
to take out of this world the souls of the deceased, we
therefore
commit their bodies to the ground: (Here she stooped to take
up a handful of fresh earth to cast into the grave, when she saw
a handful fall upon the bodies. She looked up and saw that it was
the reverent act of the steward-lad. She then continued in a
touching manner that sunk to every heart,)
Earth to earthashes to ashesdust to dust: looking for the
general resurrection in the last day and the life of the world to
come, through our Lord Jesus Christ; at whose second coming in
glorious majesty to judge the world, the earth and the sea shall
give up their dead; and the corruptible bodies of those who sleep
in him shall be changed and made like unto his own glorious
body, according to the mighty working whereby he is able to
subdue
all things unto himself.
She then turned round upon all present and repeated in a clear
rejoicing tone,
I heard a voice from Heaven, saying unto me, Write, from
henceforth blessed are the dead who die in the Lord; even so, saith
the Spirit; for they rest from their lahors.
She then offered up the Lord's prayer with an eloquence, a
sublimity
of devotion as remarkable, as the hour and the place and
the occasion were extraordinary and unusual.
The men stood a few moments in silence after the sound of her
voice had ceased, and she had turned away. There was then a
general movement to fill up the grave; but no words were
interchanged
,
save one or two necessary orders given by Red Fred in
an under tone. The work was completed and the men took up their
barrow and descended the path to the schooner. Still Carleton,
their chief stirred not from the spot where, with folded arms, he had
stood watching the burial. Eve at length approached him.
Edward, the men wait for you!
Eve, he said in a gentle tone, I know not what to make of
all this! My thoughts are in strange commotion! There is a
chord in my being which vibrated at the words you gave
utterance
to! Nature is ever true to herself! Why then, I ask
myself
,
should I feel this harmony between your words of prayer and
a secret sensation in my bosom, if they were false? I do confess
that I have been deeply moved. But this is no time nor place for
such idle talk. Eve! Let us on board and learn how it goes with
poor Morris!
Thus speaking, and suffering the true and faithful Eve to lean
upon his manly form, he descended the path with her to the
vessel
.
In a few minutes afterwards she was towed out from her
shelter, the breeze caught her sails, the boats were called aboard,
and once more the Sea-Slipper was gliding along with increasing
motion upon her native element.
CHAPTER X.
With a light, but fair wind, the Sea Slipper stood on her way up
the river, with the helm under the management of Red Fred; who
was the only one on board now, that Morris Grme was no longer
able to be on deck, familiar with the winding and narrow channel
of the Kennebec. Carleton paced the deck with an uneasy step
and troubled air. The injuries of Morris Greame had deprived
him of his services, when most in requisition. He felt he could
trust no other person as second in command of the schooner.
Head-land after head-land was passed by the schooner, and a half
an hour had elapsed since they left the rock, when he became
impatient
.
How is this, Fred, he demanded; Grme said the town was
not two leagues up, and we have come full that.
Soon as we clear the wooded point ahead, sir, we shall come
in sight of it. I have been up this river many a time in a
Kennebec
sloop, when I was a boy before the mast. There, sir, now it
opens; see the white houses and churches, how they are filed up
with the moon a glistening on 'em.
And this powder-house' where does it stand!
Here-away, sir. If you will take a look just under the after
leading block but one, between it and the rattling, you will fetch it
in range! answered Fred revolving his wheel half a turn.
YesI see it crowning a ledge, apart from the town. How
can we reach it undiscovered?
I know the path to it, sir; and we shall not be disturbed at
this hour. I will run the schooner in along side an old deserted
pier, you see just off the larboard bow, and we can ship the
powder
from that on board.
The Sea-Slipper was then run along close to the shore, until
she neared the broken pier, which was a wharf situated half a
mile below the town, and quite remote from observation. The sail
was gradually lessened on her, and in a few minutes she came to
the pier, and was secured by a hawser run ashore. The town,
with its harbor and vessels, was visible above; but all was still,
save the distant striking of a clock, which warned them that day
was not far off. Taking half his men, and proper barrows and
slings to convey the powder, Carleton left the schooner and guided
by Red Fred, pursued a rocky, wooded path leading to the ledge.
A few minutes brisk travel brought them to the bleak upland rock,
on which the solitary structure stood, far from any dwelling. It
was small, but securely constructed of brick and stone, with a
slated roof. The door, though massive, was soon forced open, and
Carleton entering found hilled up on one side thirty large sized
kegs filled with powder. In three trips to the schooner a score of
these small barrels were removed on board, and safely stowed in
the magazine. Morning by this time began to dawn, and casting
off the hawser from the pier, these bold buccaneers were once
more on the water.
Now am I a man again; said Carleton emphatically, as he
looked back upon the receding town, and then watched the swift
progress of the schooner sea-ward. Now, and his voice fell in
its tones, but deepened with feeling now shall Blanche Hillary
be
mine!
With these daring thoughts in his heart, he paced his schooner's
deck, until the wide sea once more opened its heaving bosom
before
him to receive the bounding vessel. Yes, there the sea
spreads her wide arms to welcome her son again! Blow fresh ye
good winds, blow fresh and fair, and hurry me to her embrace.
Well, Eve, how fares it with poor Morris? I will go down
and see him as soon as we clear this coast. There frowns, with
the dawn lightening its summit, the fortress to the right, where we
buried the mad father and his daughter. I shall ne'er forget that
scene, nor thy voice of prayer. Nayno preaching now pretty
one. Thou hast not told me how my Licutenant fares.
He has not yet come out of his state of insensibility. With
the rising sun he will revive.
I hope so. I would not lose Morris now. We have work for
both before us. Is the boy with him?
Yes, nor has he left him! What purpose or plan is in your
heart, Edward. I hope no evil, that you should wish Morris
Grme's aid.
Listen, Eve, he said walking slowly and thoughtfully with
her towards the stern, his brows meeting as they did when he was
deeply moved. I am about to tell thee what may not please thee
well, because there is in it other love than thine. Naydo not
start! I have already told thee, I knew not how to return thy love.
Eve gasped but spoke not, and painfully listened.
But to my story, as thou hast just wished to know my present
purpose. A year ago, and but a few weeks before our mai
before I returned to Charleston, I was commander of such a vessel
as this in the West Indies, with a wild and savage crew of
Spaniards
and mulatoes; but men abjectly under my authority. My
schooner was called the Sea-Slipper, as I have named this. I
fell in with a packet ship bound from Boston to New Orleans, and
boarded her without resistance. Among the passengers was a
lovely and youthful Spanish widow, whom I resolved to take with
me on board the schooner. Do not shrink, Eve! Had I
loved
thee
I should not have so resolved. Her father was also a passenger;
and learning that he was immensely opulent, and having been
disappointed in finding specie on board, my cupidity got the better of
my passion, and I ransomed her to him for a very large sum. He
wrote me an order for the amount on his banker in Havana, and
I left the packet-ship to pursue her course, to New Orleans, while
I stood in for the Havana, which was but a few hours sail.
Before
I reached the port, I fell in with a heavily armed British
cruiser, that had been long out in search of me; and being hotly
pursued I run my schooner ashore and took to the boats. But the
pretty Sea-Slipper was taken posession of and burned before my
eyes. But, thank the Gods, I have another, the fellow to her,
beneath
my feet. Without a vessel, I dispersed my men for two
months, and alone and in disguise, proceeded over land to
Havanna
.
The amount of the draft would have purchased me another
vessel. Fashionably attired as a stranger I sallied out from my
retreat, in a house near the
Posco
to present my draft. After a
long unsuccessful search to find the house upon which it was
drawn, I was satisfied that the names were fictitious, and that no
such Banking House was known in Havana. You may judge
my fierce disappointment and threats of vengeance upon the old
Spaniard; for I had built up all my hopes of getting another
vessel
upon this money. The same day a letter reached me,
informing
me of the death of my father. I instantly embarked for
Charleston. The remainder of my history you know, Eve. But
I have more to add respecting this accursed Spaniard. I have had
intelligence that he resided in a magnificent mansion, a league
outside the walls of Havana. My first purpose is, now that I am
once more in command of a vessel, to pay this wily cavalier and
his beautiful daughter a visit. I made oath to do it whenever I
should tread the deck of another vessel its master. After this
expedition
I have another one, Eve, will please thee less than this
but thy looks tell me thou hast heard enough.
I have!
she answered in a deep suffering tone.
You are offended with me, Eve, touching my fancy for the
fair Castilian! But,
then
, thou wert not my
Speak the word! Say
wife
, Carleton, and I forgive all!
Thou wert not then
my wife
, Eve! he said with a smile.
Yet thou hast just now said thou art again seeking her! I
know not, Edward, how it is, but I know I do hate this fair
Spaniard
.
I am a miser, and thy love my treasure, which I watch with
such jealous care that I would not other eyes should look upon
it!
Eve, thou wilt yet be convinced thy treasure is but dust.
Heaven put far away that hapless hour! she said with
emotion
.
I do begin to realize something of what thou wouldst
have me believe! she added with touching resignation: I know
I have been blinded by my love! I
will
confessthough my
heart is breaking as I speakthat thou lovest me not as thou hast
done! Something has changed thee, Edward!
I will tell thee what it is  nay I dare not now! See
how we are suddenly lifted upon the billows and feel again the
familiar rocking of the ocean! Once more we are upon the sea!
Go down, Eve, and as soon as the sun is up I will follow thee.
This was spoken so coldly and indifferently, that, after fixing
upon
him her gentle gaze to see if she could catch a glance of
affection
from his eyes, she hastened to hide her tears and her grief
in her state-room. Poor Eve! the truth is slowly foreing itself
upon thy conviction that thou art not loved!
In the main cabin lay the form of Morris Grme upon a pallet.
His face was deadly pale, and a scar was upon his temple, from
which the fresh blood oozed, but was constantly wiped away by
the hand of the lad, Little Belt, who had knelt for hours by his
side, watching every breath and sign of returning consciousness.
He seemed to be sleeping heavily, with strong, irregular
breathing
,
and occasional convulsive movements of the lips and fingers.
The lad bathed his forehead and kept his mouth moistened, and at
times rubbed the palms of his hands. At intervals a deep sigh
would escape his bosom; and when he saw that he was
unobserved
he would lean over the marble face, and imprint upon the lips
a kiss of passionate grief. The cabin lamp shown down upon his
features, fur his tarpaulin was laid aside. His head was covered
with rich masses of raven hair, as if the scissors had never come
nigh them, and his complexion was a clear brunette. Dark and
singularly expressive were his eyes, and seldom has a more
beautiful
mouth been seen in a woman, than his. Its expression was
firm and determined, and the eye full of passion and feeling.
At length the fading gleam of the lamp was out-shone by the
morning which gradually filled the cabin with light and, as if there
had been some mysterious union between sensibility and light, a
favorable change in the face of the wounded man was visible. The
deadly, marble aspect softened and assumed a faint one of life, and
the strong heaving of the chest became subdued and more
regular
.
These signs of returning animation were watched with the
most intense anxiety and solicitude by the lad; and, when at
length as a bright beam of the rising sun flushed upon the
skylight
and was reflected throughout the cabin, he stirred and opened
his eyes, the lad uttered an exclamation of joy so deep and
fervent
,
that it was plain there existed between them some
mysterious
bond of union, perhaps however, the interest was all on one
side. This idea was strengthened by the glance which Morris
Grme turned towards him; it was one of doubtful recognition
and wholly without the emotion that might have been anticipated
from the conduct of the other. The exclamation of the lad drew
Carleton to the cabin, where on entering, to his joyful surprise, he
met the intelligent look of his Lieutenant fixed on him.
The Gods be praised, Morris, he said taking his hand. I
thought you were
vised
for the land under-sea. I am rejoiced to
see you have come to! You were lucky not to have been killed,
and you have come off without breaking but two bones, which I
have set. It will keep you on your back, perhaps, till we get to
the West Indies, whither the Sea-Slipper is now steering.
In a little while Morris was able to recal the past and to listen
to the recital of his rescue; and also to hear of Carleton's plans
for the future. He made no remark when informed of the death
and burial of the father and daughter, and by the expression of his
features evidently wished no further allusion to the subject.
Days passed on, and with the alternation of fair winds, calms
and storms, the Sea-Slipper held on her course to the West Indies,
where were to be found material in plenty from which Carleton
intended to complete his crew. Morris's injuries rendered it
nescessary
for him to remain almost constantly on deck, although
Red Fred in a measure relieved him from duty in the larboard
watch They had been at sea three weeks, and yet Morris
remained
an invalid in the cabin, occasionally being taken on deck for
the air. The lad Little Belt, so called by the men, on account
of his small waist, was constant and assiduous in his attention upon
him. Eve also was left much with him; and he received all her
attention with a grateful look and tenderness of voice, that showed
how strongly passion for the beautiful creature was working in his
bosom. He sat up or reclined most of the day upon an ottoman,
and she read to him as they played chess or backgammon
together
.
This sitting for hours eye to eye, with hand in contact with
hand, is a dangerous position for an enamoured man. Morris
Grme drank in love with his eyes until his brain and heart were
both intoxicated. This convalescence was to him a passage in
the hours of paradise. She could not be insensible to the
impression
her presence made upon him. He betrayed it in every look,
and in all his manner. He took no pains to conceal his feelings
from her. Carleton was not only much on deck, but had grown
more and more cold from day to day. Blanche Hillary was taking
Eve's place in his thoughts, and he only thought of her to devise
some means of getting rid of her in quiet. He had of late
discovered
Grme's passion for her, and in his heart rejoiced, hoping that
she might be enticed and
fall!
He therefore purposely left them
together and encouraged their intimacy. Poor Eve! what a snare
was laid for thee, thou true and good; though weak and erring in
thy love for such an one as Carleton.
It was night. Carleton's firm even tread was heard pacing
the deck over their heads. The wild winds lashed the sea and
the vessel was driven along the darkly glittering billows like a
flying bird. The sky light was closed and covered and the cabin
lamp shed a soft dim light around. Morris, now nearly restored,
but yet unfit for duty, for which he did not care to change Eve's
companionship, was reading from a book in a deep tone of feeling
to Eve. And did she sit and listen as if her interest was not
awaked
in him, who concealed not his deep passion for her? Eve's
was a gentle, social and confiding nature. Carleton was strange
ly cold and stern and negligent. He spoke to her but with a frown.
Morris was kind, tender and solicitous to please; his voice
attuned to gentle words and his
acts
efiort was to please and win: Carleton's to offend and cast aside!
Not to have felt the difference between their conduct, and
insensibly
to love the society of Grme, would have been surprising
in one whose life consisted in loving and being loved! Was she
then growing false to Carleton ere she knew he was false to her?
Let the result tell. She liked his society for it was a relief from
the coldness and neglect of Carleton.
Morris was reading from the First Act of Richard III:
Anne
.
I would I knew thy heart.
Gloster
.
'Tis figur'd in my tongue.
Anne
.
I fear we both are false.
Gloster
.
Then man was never true.
Anne
.
Well, well put up your sword.
Gloster
.
Say then my peace is made.
Anne
.
That shall you know hereafter.
Gloster
.
But shall I live in hope?
Anne
.
All men, I hope, live so.
Gloster
.
Vouchsafe to wear this ring.
Anne
.
To take is not to give. [
She puts on the ring
.]
Gloster
.
Look, how this ring encompaseth thy finger,
Even so thy breast encloseth my poor heart.
Wear both of them for both of them are thine!
And if thy poor, devoted servant may
But beg one favor at thy gracious hand,
Thou dost confirm his happiness forever.
Anne
.
What is it?
Morris Grme
, [seizing Eve's hand and kneeling.]Sweet
Eve, let me put this question of Lady Anne's into thy mouth,
and myself answer it in place of Gloster. This is the favor I
would ask of thee. I beseech you, listen patiently and give me
one ray of hope. Since the first hour I saw thee I have loved and
in my heart worshipped thee! Nay, do not struggle to release
your hand. Have pity on me, for without thy love I am, indeed
most wretched. Carleton loves thee not. Each look and act or
his shows that thou art hateful to him. Nay, more!
He loves
another!
Dost thou speak truly, and from thine own knowledge,
Morris
Grme? she demanded in a tone that made him start.
I do, sweet Eve! The lady is very fair; but in grace and
beauty hath no compare with thee!
I heed not thy compliments, cried Eve with emotion. Tell
me her name?
Blanche Hillary.
Has he met her often?
Nobut his passion for her is as deep as the springs of his
own life!
I knew itIIMorris Grme, swear to me that thou
tellest me truly; for this thing must be confirmed by an oath, ere
my heart receive it all!
I swear it, he said, now feeling confident that, convinced of
Carleton's unfaithfulness, she would throw herself into his arms.
She stood for a moment lost and absent in thought. He took her
hand and would have passed his arm about her waist. The act
recalled her to herself. She shrunk from him with a look of
womanly
dignity, as became a true wife, and said,
Thou dost mistake me, Morris Grme! Carleton may not
love me, but to me he is still dear!
Nay, 'tis madness, Eve, to love when thou art scorned! To
reject the true heart I offer thee, for the cold neglect of one who
spurns thy love! If thou wilt be mine, I will in Havana surround
thee with every luxury
Talk not to me, Morris Grme, she said commandingly,
pacing to and fro the cabin. I am not thinking of thee or thy
hopeless passion!
Hopeless! Eve? he said, attempting to take her hand.
Ever! I am not whom you think me! Oh, God! that
he
should subject me to the degrading addresses of this man! Nay
of every man! Oh, Carleton! Carleton! Thou hast drugged
my cup with a bitter, bitter draught!
Eve!
Stand by, sir, and disturb me not! If I have, following
charity
and kindness, in nursing by thee overstepped my modesty, and
so given thee excuse for this license, then am I grieved, and
severely
judge myself therefor. Morris Grme, I cannot listen to
you!
Cruel Eve!
Sir, hast thou not heard me? He recoiled a pace at the stern
and virtuous dignity with which her voice, look, and manner were
clothed by her indignant emotion, and in silence gazed upon her.
He knew she had loved Carleton, but he was not prepared for
such an exhibition of faithfulness, when he no longer cared for
her. His passion was only increased by her lofty conduct, and in
his heart he resolved to win her, even with the life of Carleton.
Eve now retired to her state room in a painful conflict of feelings,
and Morris reclining, as if still very weak, upon the ottoman, mused
upon what had occurred. He was not alone, however; nor had
the scene just drawn been without a witness. In the shadow of
the stairs or companion-way stood a figure half revealed, watching
the progress of Grme's passion with eager interest. It was the
lad, Little Belt. His dark eyes gleamed like coals of fire, and his
brows were knitted together as he listened to his declaration of
love. He more than once thrust himself so far forward, in his
eagerness, that persons less engaged than Eve and Morris Grme
would have discovered his presence. Once, when Grme would
have clasped her waist, his hand was upon a knife in his belt, and
he half drew it forth, and looked, for a moment, as if about to
spring upon him and bury it in his heart.
While musing upon the past scene, and deliberating upon a half
conceived plan of taking the schooner from Carleton and forcing
Eve to his love, he felt a hand laid nervously upon his arm. He
turned and beheld the lad by his side.
What would you, boy?
Revenge! came from the pale lips of the lad in a low deep
startling tone.
Who?what art thou? cried Grme, starting up and
gazing
in his face.
One whom thou hast sworn to love and to love only: and who,
trusting to thee, has found thee false. I am she whom when thou
wert weary of me thou didst force to wed another. I have waited
my hour of revenge, and it has come! Thy hour of retribution
had not come when thy mangled corse shouldst have found a grave
in the sea; and I
knew
thou wouldst not die thenfor thou diest
only by my hand! I have loved thee, Morris GrmeI have
degraded
myself for love of thee. Knowing I could never be thy
bride, I gave thee my virgin heart, and was happy in being thy
mistress! But thou didst soon tire of a treasure too easily
won! I have loved and hated thee by turns since thou didst force
me to marry thy knave, Frederick. I have thrice since had thy
life in my hands, and yet love turned aside my hand! I have
wept over thee in thy illness here when thou knewest it not, and
loved thee without rebuke. Yet I was tempted each day to poison
thy food, but still love let thee live. But I only hate now! I have
witnessed thy passion for Carleton's wife
His
wife!
exclaimed Morris, who had been listening and
gazing
upon her like one in a dream.
Yeshis wife. I have overheard that which assures me of it,
though he does not acknowledge her. But with this thou hast no
further interest. I hate thee, Morris Grme. Look at me! and
she removed a wig of massy tresses and exposed the undisguised
features of Hetty Bell. Look at me and see the beauty that has
now brought thee to thy death! Now die!
Hettyfor God's sake! you are not
His words were lost in the ineffectual struggle in his grear
weakness, to rise from the ottoman and release the pressure of her
hand upon his throat.
I have sworn thy death, Morris Grme, and I have the
strength and power of hell in my heart and hand! In vain thy
efforts!
Die!
The knife, as she muttered the word, descended into his
bosom. The guilty young man fell back with a groan; and
having
faintly murmured the name of that God whose laws he had
for years broken and despised, his unannealed soul took its flight to
His bar of judgment.
A shriek from Eve, who had overheard the scene through the
blinds of the state room, brought Carleton below. On entering
the cabin he beheld the murderess bending over the body of her
victim
and passionately pressing her lips to his! He did not know
that Morris was dead, and stood with a look of inquiry, gazing
round.
She has killed him? cried Eve, pointing to the corpse.
She!
Morris dead!
Yes, and by my hand,' answered Hetty Bell, turning towards
him, and speaking in a tone strange and full of sadness. I have
slain him because I loved him! Now he is dead, I care not for
life, and I follow him to a world where love hath no rivalry, and
where 'tis not crime to love if the hearts are wedded!
Before the astonished Carleton could arrest her hand or
comprehend
her purpose, she drew the knife from Morris's breast and
plunged it into her own! She threw herself upon the body of him
whom she had too well and criminally loved, and with her head
resting upon his bosom, there breathed her last.
CHAPTER XI.
The
third morning after the tragic scene described at the close
of the preceding chapter, the Sea-Slipper was gliding along within
a league of the Cuba coast, between Matanzas and Havana, and
running up to the former port. Carleton was pacing the deck
moody and silent. He had lost a faithful coadjutor in Morris
Grme, and the presence of Eve daily more and more annoyed
him. He would not suffer her to walk on deck with him, and the
most of her time was passed in her cabin weeping. Yet still she
loved him with the same holy and undying constancy. As the
schooner approached Havana, with the Moro Castle two leagues
distant
to leeward, Carleton's attention was directed to the
manuvres
of a sloop of war under American colors, which, after
standing
in towards the harbor and signalizing, tacked and began to beat
seaward again, stretching away to windward of him, with her
signals
still flying.
He did not like her looks; and as he watched her with his glass,
he saw her, soon after getting an offing, change her course, and
squaring her yards, stand down before the wind towards him. He
felt no disposition to be in the neighborhood of such a formidable
stranger, and crowding sail he steered straight for the Moro
keeping
at the same time as near the shore as would be safe. In a short
time it was evident that the sloop of war was in chase. He felt,
even if he had a full complement of men, to resist in this case
would be madness. He, therefore, looked wholly for safety to the
speed of his fast-sailing Sea-Slipper; and beautifully did she fly
over the waves.
The sloop of war came walking down at an overhauling pace
before the wind, and now very clearly showing her object in first
beating up to windward. The schooner, however, outsailed her,
and this Carleton saw with no little gratification. He was now
confident of escaping his pursuer. The Moro castle was now but
half a league distant, and he expected in twenty minutes to be safe
in the neutral harbor, when he saw coming out a heavy schooner
of war with the stars and stripes flying; and with signals set. He
watched her a few moments, and saw that she commenced beating
up so as to intercept him. The manuvres of the sloop and the
signalizing were now explained. Carleton now felt the full
difficulty
of his situation. But his courage and coolness and
self-possession
were always equal to any crisis; and after a few moments
reflection, he resolved to pass the schooner, fire into her, receive
her broadside, and then, if unharmed, the port was open before him
for shelter.
He instantly had his men called to quarters; but he had only
enough to man one battery. This battery, however, was the only
one he was likely to want in running his gauntlet, and he resolved
it should tell. The sloop of war came down with a flowing sheet
and open ports; and the armed schooner was standing shoreward,
across his course on the starboard tack.
Silently and swiftly the Sea-Slipper approached the schooner,
till within pistol shot, when the latter wore round and fired a
broadside
.
Luff a little! Now let them have it! at the same instant
cried Carleton, first to his helmsman and then to his men.
The smoke blew away and Carleton found his fore-topmast shot
off just above the head of the foremast, and two of his guns
unshipped
and rendered useless. The schooner of war had only been
hulled by a shot and lost her flying jib-boom. The injury to the
Sea-Slipper at such a moment was irreparable and fatal. Before
she could be brought to her course again or obey her helm, the
sloop of war came down at a slapping pace, and heaving to under
her stern poured a broadside into her which raked her fore and aft.
The destruction was terrific. Half of Carleton's men were killed
or wounded, and the rest fled from their guns. The next moment
the schooner lay her aboard, and Carleton alone with Red Fred,
and Eve clinging upon him, defended his quarter-deck. A party
from the sloop of war now poured over her starboard gangway,
and Carleton was face to face with Harry Ellis, her commander.
After a personal conflict between the two captains, the buccaneer
was disarmed and made a prisoner upon his own deck. He was
taken with Eve on board the sloop of war. As he crossed the
gangway
his eye fell on Blanche Hillary, who, pale and beautiful,
rushed
up to Harry and tenderly embraced him, crying:
My dearest husband, thank God you have returned in safety.
Her husband! Blanche, is he thy husband? sternly
demanded
the bound pirate chief.
The lady is my wife, sir buccaneer, said Harry with a look of
surprise. Dost thou object? If so, be speedy with thy words;
for by mine honor you shall have short shrift and a strong rope.
Nay then, I have no further word to say, he said with a look
dark and gloomy as his own stern nature. Lead on to my death!
Eve, there stands the woman who taught me how to love, and that
I loved not thee!
Eve turned upon Blanche her large earnest eyes, then advancing
to her said:
Lady, I forgive thee, though thou art the cause of all my
woe!
What means this? What beautcous being is this? exclaimed
Blanche, moved with astonishment.
The pirate chief's bridehis wedded wife! for now there is no
need of concealment Carleton. He loved me till he saw thee, and
now my heart is broken for his love of thee!
Thou art a strange creature, said Blanche with deep interest.
I grieve that I should have been the innocent cause of thy
sorrow
.
Then dost thou not love him? she asked with an carnestness
as if life depended on the reply.
No, lady. Here is my husband and him alone I love.
Thanks, thanks! thou hast kept me from hatingnay, cursing
thee! Carleton I forgive thee for loving one so beautiful and
so good. But ah! these are the signs of death! sir, let me die
with him, she cried kneeling at Captain Ellis's feet and clasping
his knees.
Naythou art not guilty with thy husband if thy face speaks
truth. His life is forfeited by his crimes. Remove her, and
Blanche see that she does no mischief to herself! poor child! As
for thee, thou red-handed man of crime, prepare to die by
to-morrow's
sun-rise. There goes thy schooner to pieces, an emblem of
its mater's coming fate.
He pointed, as he spoke, to the Sea-Slipper which at that
moment
blew up with a terrific explosion.
Carleton was led below in irons, followed by the twelve
surviving
men of his crew, Red Fred alone having escaped by
swim-mind
to the land.
It was midnight. Carleton lay in the ward-room upon a gun
carriage, to which he was chained. The sloop of war was
becalmed
off the Moro, which through the port, he could discern in
the moonlight. He was reflecting upon the past without remorse,
and contemplating death without fear. All Eve's teachings had
been in vain! all the admonitions of conscience, and
self-convictions
of the truth of God had been suffered to fade from his
mind-and
as he lived so he was on the eve of death.
Pass! said the sentinel at his door in a stern tone.
He looked up at the voice, and by the faint lantern, hung from a
beam above, he recognized Eve. He turned away his head and
seemed not to have seen her enter.
Edward, and her soft hand was laid on his arm.
What would you here? he roughly inquired.
The lady you loveBlanchehas at my earnest entreaty
persuaded
the Captain to permit me to visit you.
Well.
To-morrow at sun-rise you die.
Wouldst thou mock me with telling me of it.'
`No, dear Edward! I have come to tell thee I love thee at this
dark hour as I have ever loved thee! that thou art, though
chained
and condemed to die, and hated of mankind, that thou art still
as dear to my heart as when in girl-hood I first surrendered it to
thee. Be comforted and hope for a better life!
Eve, your love strengthens me. I bless thee for it. But of a
better life I have
no
hope!
God is good and his mercy is over all men. There is hope
even for the worst of men. Let me read to you from this book!
He said nothing and she read the last part of the chapter in Mathew
upon the crucifixion, and dwelt upon the forgiveness of the thief.
The effect upon Carleton could not be seen as he was silent, and
his face was buried in his haads!
Hour after hour she sat by his side till the dawn broke. The
secret effects in Carleton's heart of those hours of prayers and
eloquent
teaching are known only to the searcher of hearts. The hour
came for his execution!
When Eve left him he tenderly embraced her and then walked
calmly to the spot to which he was led. He looked up to the
foreyard
and to his evident surprise saw none of the usual preparations
for death swinging there. His eye then fell on a file of marines
drawn up, and he was told that his men would be taken into
Havana
and executed but he was to be shot.
Thy wife has begged this lenity for thee, said Captain Ellis.
At this intelligence his dark eye brightened and his bearing and
look became prouder. He looked round to meet Eve's eye and
saw her and smiled upon her. She sprung forward, threw herself
upon his neck and embraced him and whispered with strange
calmness
,
Edward bear up! I will not be long separated from thee!
Remember thy promise to commit thy soul to God in Christ, in
thy last moment.
The moment came, and the young buccaneer chief was led to a
stage erected on the bow, and there was un-ironed and blindfolded.
There was a deep silence for a moment as he stood there left alone.
His lips moved, his face was uplifted a moment as if in prayer,
and he placed his hand on his breast as the signal! One
simultaneous
discharge of musketry, uprising high above which was
heard a wild piercing shriek, and Edward Carleton fell dead upon
the stage, his bosom pierced by a dozen balls. There were two
spirits released at that fatal discharge. Eve was raised from the
deck where she had fallen with a wild shriek as he fell, and lo!
she was dead also.
Thus tragically terminates our narrative of the subsequent
career of the Dancing Feather. If the perusal of it has made any
one better or happier, strengthened the love of morality and order
in Society and shown the evil consequences of vice and
immorality
,
the aim of the author will be attained.
THE END.My son
,
I am now near my endbut, as I believe death to be an
everlasting sleep, I feel no alarm. The grave is rest. I envy the
clod and the rock which are dead and feel not; and rejoice that
I shall soon be their fellow! But I would say a word to you before
I am annihilated. I wish you to know what you are ignorant of
respecting me. I am an Englishman descended of a noble family.
My grand-father was an Earl, my mother a Countess. A
step-mother
made my parental roof a hell, and at the age of sixteen I fled
from it. I shipped as a common seaman; and having a naturedly
vicious turn, (I conceal nothing now) I soon contracted the worst
vices. In my twentieth year, enraged by a blow inflicted by the
Captain, Iconspired, and heading a mutiny took possession of the
brig, killing the Captain with my own hands and so wiping out the
foul stain he had blackened me with. We steered for the coast
of Africa; and, tempted by the great wealth realized by
slave-stealing
,
we engaged in the traffic and took a cargo to the West Indies.
The immense returns by the way of profit, with the absence of all
principle, led me to engage in it for a long period, till at length,
after several years, my name was known throughout the West
Indies
and inspired terror all along the African coast. The wealth
I accumulated was enormous; and the guilt with which it was
obtained
was equally vast. But what is guilt but a name? The
grave hides alike evil and good: at least this is my belief, and at
this hour it is a consoling one. If there were a God I know
there would be a hell for me. But my conscience is calm and
gives me no warning of a hereafter; and so I die without fear. A
peaceful state, my son!
But I must be brief. Satiated with wealth I quit the traffic;
and, building a costly and swift sailing yacht, I cruised for
pleasure
many months in the Mediterrancam, visiting every port, and
every where received as a private gentleman. At Syracuse as I
was on the eve of sailing, I gave a colation to a select party on
board my vessel. Among the guests was an American gentleman
and his daughter. I need not describe her. She was perfectly
lovely. Eve Innes (for I have seen her
once
) is her counterpart.
I fell in love with her at a glance and delayed my departure for
weeks to woo and win her. I offered her my hand and was
rejected
!
Fierce and uncontrolable by nature, I was maddened and
demanded the reason of her refusal. She was, at first, silent but
at length pleaded her ignorace of me! Fool that I was! I
believed
she was attached to me and would have become mine; but the
truth she concealed. She was already betrothed. This I learned
by accident. I met her again at a ball and accused her of
duplicity
.
She treated me with insulting coolness; and haughtily
taking
the arm of a gentleman near her, left me. That gentleman
was her betrothed. Need I say it was Mr. Innes, then a young
gentleman on his travels? I sought him out, and picked a quarrel
with him. We met with small swords and I was disarmed The
next day I sailed. The week following they were married. I
heard of it at Naples. Settled gloom then took possession of me.
I traversed Asia and half India to banish the image of Eve Evelyn
(such was her name) from my mind. A year passed away, and in
Beyroot I met with a beautiful Jewish maiden. I was sick and she
nursed me till gratitude grew into love when I married her. She
possessed every grace and charm and gentle virtue of her sex. I
learned to adore her. You were the fruit of that blissful union
In giving you birth she died. I cursed my evil destiny; and,
leaving you with her relatives, I again became a wanderer. I
visited
Charleston in disguise, witnessed the happiness of Eve
Evelyn
in her own home; but she knew me not. I determined to
crush her happiness. She had two lovely sons and (shall I conceal
the truth?) they pined and died one after the other! I poisoned
them secretly and slowly! I felt a fiendish joy in seeing her
tears and in witnessing her anguish. At length I returned to
Beyroot
and found you a handsome boy of four years. I was
suddenly haunted with the fear that you would be poisoned and I
took you with me. Five years we wandered together, and at length
led by, I knew not what secret motive, I resolved to live near
Eve! I purchased this property and came hither. In the place
of her two boys she had a daughter. It was an infant of three
years. I beheld her in her home, when she knew it not. I stole
thither by nightand saw she wept over it and was not happy. So
I would not take it away from her lest she should smile again; and
I let it live. The child grew; and when it was six years of age,
I met it with its mother. They had wandered along the green
shores gathering flowers and were near the cascade! I came
suddenly
upon them! I took up the child! I was tempted to toss it
into the caldron of boiling foam amid the rocks, but it smiled on me
and looked so like its mother when first I saw and loved her, (for
now I hated her) that, instead, I kissed it and set it down. The
mother gazed on me; I knew she was searching memory! I was
willing she should know
who
stood before her and I turned a full
and expressive gaze upon her face; she met my glance and turned
deadly pale.
What would you here? she said hoarsely.
The bliss of being near you, Eve, I answered, ironically yet
haughtily.
You can mean no good.
No. I mean evil; I loved you when I thought you might have
been mine
I hate you, another's!
'Twas rumored in Syracuse, he was a pirate, she said
thinking
aloud.
Yes, lady, I was a pirateif you will; I am now the foe of
thyself
and thine.
She caught her child trembllng to her heart.
Nay fear not; it bears to much thine image when first I saw
thee. Thou hast lost two boys?
Yes, she gasped rather than spoke.
I poisoned them! said I approaching her and whispering close
her appalled ear.
!
she shrieked. I thought she would have sunk to the
earth with horror, while her beautiful eyes blazed upon me, like
those of a leopardess robbed of its young. I was awed for a mo
ment.
Yes.
I
lady! But fear not for this flower. I hate it, being
thine husband's. But I will harm it not, at least, while I see not
on her face thy scornful parting look.
Thou fiend! Thou shalt be  she could say no more;
but, overpowered, fell insensible upon the sward. I bore her to
the water and revived her; and then suddenly left her, satisfied
with the result. She knew not whence I come or whither I went;
for
no one had seen me, so secluded was my life. She reached
home, but spoke not after that hour. In three weeks she was
placed in the grave; and so I had my revenge!
No
not wholly;
I watched the young flower she had left to grow on earth. I
watched, unseen, her expanding loveliness, and only waited, when
there seemed most happiness garnered up in her father's bosom, to
crush it. But she grew up from spring to spring, even with that
gentle look of her mother's I love to recal; and I could never
make up my mind to destroy her. I saw your growing intimacy,
and in my heart resolved to make you in some way the instrument
of my hatred. But time passed on. She reached her sixteenth
year, and I saw that you
loved her!
Then all my hatred to her
blood returned, and I determined ere mine (dark and stained as it
was) should mingle in one stream with it
she should perish!
I had
formed my plan and the mode, and the hour was fixed by me,
when you left a note on your table saying that you had been insulted
by Mr. Innes and should leave the country. Your departure
saved her life. Now, I am near death! she yet lives, and I feel
no disposition to destroy her. But the curse of a father be upon
you, if you should return and
wed her!
My Will will express in
stronger terms my feeling on this subject. Curses rest upon your
head and upon the heads of your offspring, should you ever take
he daughter of Eve Evelyn to wife. Thy mistress she
may
be!
thy wife
never
, save with a father's curse!Anne
.
I would I knew thy heart.
Gloster
.
'Tis figur'd in my tongue.
Anne
.
I fear we both are false.
Gloster
.
Then man was never true.
Anne
.
Well, well put up your sword.
Gloster
.
Say then my peace is made.
Anne
.
That shall you know hereafter.
Gloster
.
But shall I live in hope?
Anne
.
All men, I hope, live so.
Gloster
.
Vouchsafe to wear this ring.
Anne
.
To take is not to give. [
She puts on the ring
.]
Gloster
.
Look, how this ring encompaseth thy finger,
Even so thy breast encloseth my poor heart.
Wear both of them for both of them are thine!
And if thy poor, devoted servant may
But beg one favor at thy gracious hand,
Thou dost confirm his happiness forever.
Anne
.
What is it?